Key	Id	English(en)	Russian(ru)	Arabic(ar)	Bulgarian(bg)	Catalan(ca)	Croatian(hr)	Czech(cs)	Danish(da)	Dutch(nl)	Estonian(et)	Finnish(fi)	French(fr)	German(de)	Greek(el)	Hebrew(he)	Hindi(hi)	Hungarian(hu)	Indonesian(id)	Italian(it)	Japanese(ja)	Korean(ko)	Latvian(lv)	Lithuanian(lt)	Malay(ms)	Norwegian(no)	Polish(pl)	Portuguese(pt)	Romanian(ro)	Serbian(sr)	Chinese (Simplified)(zh-Hans)	Slovak(sk)	Slovenian(sl)	Spanish(es)	Swedish(sv)	Filipino (Philippines)(fil-PH)	Thai(th)	Turkİsh(tr)	Ukrainian(uk)	Vietnamese(vi)
app_title	1	Coloring	Раскраска	تلوين	Оцветяване	Coloració	Bojanka	Omalovánky	Farvelægning	Kleuren	Värvimine	Väritys	Coloriage	Färbung	Χρωματισμός	צביעה	रंग भरना	Színezés	Pewarnaan	Colorazione	ぬりえ	색칠하기	Krāsošana	Dažymas	Mewarna	Fargelegging	Kolorowanie	Colorir	Colorat	Бојење	上色	Maľovanie	Barvanje	Colorear	Färgning	Pagkukulay	ระบายสี	Renklendİrme	Розфарбовування	Tô màu
for_parents	2	For Parents	Для родителей	للآباء	За родители	Per a pares	Za roditelje	Pro rodiče	Forældre	Voor ouders	Vanematele	Vanhemmille	Pour les parents	Für Eltern	Για γονείς	להורים	माता-पिता के लिए	Szülőknek	Untuk Orang Tua	Per i genitori	保護者向け	부모님을 위한	Vecākiem	Tėvams	Untuk ibu bapa	For foreldre	Dla rodziców	Para os pais	Pentru părinți	За родитеље	家长专用	Pre rodičov	Za starše	Para padres	Föräldrar	Para sa mga magulang	สำหรับผู้ปกครอง	Ebeveynler İçİn	Для батьків	Dành cho cha mẹ
category_ocean	3	Sea	Море	بحر	Море	Mar	More	Moře	Hav	Zee	Meri	Meri	Mer	Meer	Θάλασσα	ים	समुद्र	Tenger	Laut	Mare	海	바다	Jūra	Jūra	Laut	Hav	Morze	Mar	Mare	Море	海	More	Morje	Mar	Hav	Dagat	ทะเล	Denİz	Море	Biển
category_dino	4	Dinosaurs	Динозавры	ديناصورات	Динозаври	Dinosaures	Dinosaurusi	Dinosauři	Dinosaurer	Dinosaurussen	Dinosaurused	Dinosaurukset	Dinosaures	Dinosaurier	Δεινόσαυροι	דינוזאורים	डायनासोर	Dínók	Dinosaurus	Dinosauri	恐竜	공룡	Dinozauri	Dinozaurai	Dinosaur	Dinosaurer	Dinozaury	Dinossauros	Dinozauri	Диносауруси	恐龙	Dinosaury	Dinozavri	Dinosaurios	Dinosaurier	Dinosauryo	ไดโนเสาร์	Dİnozorlar	Динозаври	Khủng long
category_fairytales	5	Magic	Магия	سحر	Магия	Màgia	Magija	Magie	Magi	Magie	Maagia	Taikuus	Magie	Magie	Μαγεία	קסם	जादू	Mágia	Sihir	Magia	魔法	마법	Burvība	Magija	Sihir	Magi	Magia	Magia	Magie	Магија	魔法	Mágia	Magična	Magia	Magi	Mahika	มายากล	Büyü	Магія	Phép thuật
category_jungle	6	Jungle	Джунгли	أدغال	Джунгли	Selva	Džungla	Džungle	Jungle	Jungle	Džungel	Viidakko	Jungle	Dschungel	Ζούγκλα	ג׳ונגל	जंगल	Dzsungel	Hutan	Giungla	ジャングル	정글	Džungļi	Džiunglės	Hutan	Jungel	Dżungla	Selva	Junglă	Џунгла	丛林	Džungľa	Džungla	Selva	Djungel	Gubat	ป่า	Orman	Джунглі	Rừng nhiệt đới
category_seasons	7	Seasons	Времена года	فصول السنة	Сезони	Estacions	Godišnja doba	Roční období	Årstider	Seizoenen	Aastaajad	Vuodenajat	Saisons	Jahreszeiten	Εποχές	עונות	मौसम	Évszakok	Musim	Stagioni	四季	계절	Sezonas	Metų laikai	Musim	Årstider	Pory roku	Estações do ano	Sezoane	Годишња доба	季节	Ročné obdobia	Letni časi	Estaciones	Årstider	Mga panahon	ฤดูกาล	Mevsİmler	Пори року	Mùa
category_pets	8	Pets	Домашние животные	الحيوانات الأليفة	Домашни любимци	Mascotes	Kućni ljubimci	Domácí zvířata	Kæledyr	Huisdieren	Lemmikloomad	Lemmikit	Animaux domestiques	Haustiere	Κατοικίδια	חיות מחמד	पालतू जानवर	Háziállatok	Hewan peliharaan	Animali domestici	ペット	애완동물	Mājdzīvnieki	Augintiniai	Haiwan peliharaan	Kjæledyr	Zwierzęta domowe	Animais de estimação	Animale de companie	Питомци	宠物	Domáce zvieratá	Hišni ljubljenčki	Mascotas	Husdjur	Alagang hayop	สัตว์เลี้ยง	Evcİl hayvanlar	Домашні тварини	Thú cưng
category_musical	9	Music	Музыка	موسيقى	Музика	Música	Glazba	Hudba	Musik	Muziek	Muusika	Musiikki	Musique	Musik	Μουσική	מוזיקה	संगीत	Zene	Musik	Musica	音楽	음악	Mūzika	Muzika	Muzik	Musikk	Muzyka	Música	Muzică	Музика	音乐	Hudba	Glasba	Música	Musik	Musika	ดนตรี	Müzİk	Музика	Âm nhạc
category_birthdayparty	10	Birthday	День рождения	عيد ميلاد	Рожден ден	Aniversari	Rođendan	Narozeniny	Fødselsdag	Verjaardag	Sünnipäev	Syntymäpäivä	Anniversaire	Geburtstag	Γενέθλια	יום הולדת	जन्मदिन	Születésnap	Ulang tahun	Compleanno	誕生日	생일	Dzimšanas diena	Gimtadienis	Hari jadi	Bursdag	Urodziny	Aniversário	Zi de naștere	Рођендан	生日	Narodeniny	Rojstni dan	Cumpleaños	Födelsedag	Kaarawan	วันเกิด	Doğum günü	День народження	Sinh nhật
category_food	11	Food	Еда	طعام	Храна	Menjar	Hrana	Jídlo	Mad	Eten	Toit	Ruoka	Nourriture	Essen	Τροφή	מזון	भोजन	Étel	Makanan	Cibo	食べ物	음식	Ēdiens	Maistas	Makanan	Mat	Jedzenie	Comida	Mâncare	Храна	食物	Jedlo	Hrana	Comida	Mat	Pagkain	อาหาร	Yemek	Їжа	Thức ăn
category_farm	12	Farm	Ферма	مزرعة	Ферма	Granja	Farma	Farma	Gård	Boerderij	Talu	Maatila	Ferme	Bauernhof	Φάρμα	חווה	खेत	Tanya	Peternakan	Fattoria	農場	농장	Saimniecība	Ūkis	Ladang	Gård	Farma	Fazenda	Ferma	Фарма	农场	Farma	Kmetija	Granja	Gård	Sakahan	ฟาร์ม	Çİftlİk	Ферма	Trang trại
category_fruits	13	Fruits	Фрукты	فواكه	Плодове	Fruites	Voće	Ovoce	Frugter	Fruit	Puuviljad	Hedelmät	Fruits	Früchte	Φρούτα	פירות	फल	Gyümölcsök	Buah	Frutta	果物	과일	Augļi	Vaisiai	Buah-buahan	Frukt	Owoce	Frutas	Fructe	Воће	水果	Ovocie	Sadje	Frutas	Frukter	Prutas	ผลไม้	Meyveler	Фрукти	Trái cây
category_insects	14	Insects	Насекомые	حشرات	Насекоми	Insectes	Insekti	Hmyz	Insekter	Insecten	Putukad	Hyönteiset	Insectes	Insekten	Έντομα	חרקים	कीड़े	Rovarok	Serangga	Insetti	昆虫	곤충	Kukaiņi	Vabzdžiai	Serangga	Insekter	Owady	Insetos	Insecte	Инсекти	昆虫	Hmyz	Insekti	Insectos	Insekter	Insekto	แมลง	Böcekler	Комахи	Côn trùng
category_space	15	Space	Космос	الفضاء	Космос	Espai	Svemir	Vesmír	Rummet	Ruimte	Kosmos	Avaruus	Espace 	Weltraum 	Διάστημα 	חלל	अंतरिक्ष	Űr	Ruang angkasa	Spazio 	宇宙 	우주	Kosmoss	Kosmosas	Angkasa	Verdensrommet	Kosmos	Espaço	Spațiu	Свемир	太空	Vesmír	Vesolje	Espacio	Rymd	Kalawakan	อวกาศ	Uzay	Космос	Vũ trụ
category_robots	16	Robots	Роботы	روبوتات	Роботи	Robots	Roboti	Roboti	Robotter	Robots	Robotid	Robotit	Robots	Roboter	Ρομπότ	רובוטים	रोबोट	Robotok	Robot	Robot	ロボット	로봇	Roboti	Robotai	Robot	Roboter	Roboty	Robôs	Roboți	Роботи	机器人	Roboti	Roboti	Robots	Robotar	Robot	หุ่นยนต์	Robotlar	Роботи	Rô bốt
category_shapes	17	Shapes	Фигуры	أشكال	Форми	Formes	Oblici	Tvary	Former	Vormen	Kujundid	Muodot	Formes	Formen	Σχήματα	צורות	आकृतियाँ	Formák	Bentuk	Forme	形	도형	Formas	Formos	Bentuk	Former	Kształty	Formas	Forme	Облици	形状	Tvary	Oblike	Formas	Former	Hugis	รูปร่าง	Şekİller	Форми	Hình dạng
category_vehicles	18	Vehicles	Транспорт	مركبات	Превозни средства	Vehicles	Vozila	Vozidla	Køretøjer	Voertuigen	Sõidukid	Ajoneuvot	Véhicules	Fahrzeuge	Οχήματα	כלי רכב	वाहन	Járművek	Kendaraan	Veicoli	車両	차량	Transportlīdzekļi	Transporto priemonės	Kenderaan	Kjøretøy	Pojazdy	Veículos	Vehicule	Возила	车辆	Vozidlá	Vozila	Vehículos	Fordon	Sasakyan	ยานพาหนะ	Araçlar	Транспорт	Phương tiện
check_if_parent	19	Please calculate	вычислите решение	يرجى الحساب	Моля, изчислете	Si us plau, calcula	Molimo izračunajte	Prosím, vypočítejte	Venligst beregn	Gelieve te berekenen	Palun arvutage	Laske, ole hyvä	Veuillez calculer	Bitte berechnen	Παρακαλώ, υπολογίστε	בבקשה חישוב	कृपया गणना करें	Kérjük, számítsd ki	Silakan hitung	Per favore, calcola	計算してください	계산해 주세요	Lūdzu, aprēķiniet	Prašome apskaičiuoti	Sila kira	Vennligst beregn	Proszę, oblicz	Por favor, calcule	Te rog, calculează	Молим, израчунајте	请计算	Prosím, vypočítajte	Prosim, izračunaj	Por favor, calcula	Vänligen beräkna	Pakiusap, Kalkulahin	กรุณาคำนวณ	Lütfen hesaplayın	Будь ласка, обчисліть	Vui lòng tính toán
promo_in_free_ctgr	20	Get full access for $4.99	Получите полный доступ за $4.99	احصل على الوصول الكامل مقابل $4.99	Получете пълен достъп за $4.99	Obteniu accés complet per $4.99	Dobijte puni pristup za $4.99	Získejte plný přístup za $4.99	Få fuld adgang for $4.99	Verkrijg volledige toegang voor $4.99	Saate täisjuurdepääsu hinnaga $4.99	Hanki täysi pääsy hintaan $4.99	Obtenez un accès complet pour $4.99	Erhalte vollen Zugang für $4.99	Αποκτήστε πλήρη πρόσβαση για $4.99	קבל גישה מלאה עבור $4.99	पूर्ण पहुँच प्राप्त करें $4.99 में	Teljes hozzáférést kapsz $4.99-ért	Dapatkan akses penuh seharga $4.99	Ottieni accesso completo per $4.99	$4.99 でフルアクセスを取得	$4.99로 전체 액세스 얻기	Iegūstiet pilnu piekļuvi par $4.99	Gaukite visą prieigą už $4.99	Dapatkan akses penuh untuk $4.99	Få full tilgang for $4.99	Uzyskaj pełny dostęp za $4.99	Obtenha acesso completo por $4.99	Obține acces complet pentru $4.99	Остварите потпун приступ за $4.99	获取完整访问权限，价格为$4.99	Získajte plný prístup za $4.99	Pridobite popoln dostop za $4.99	Obtén acceso completo por $4.99	Få full åtkomst för $4.99	Kumuha ng buong access para sa $4.99	เข้าถึงเต็มรูปแบบในราคา $4.99	$4.99 İçİn tam erİşİm alın	Отримайте повний доступ за $4.99	Nhận quyền truy cập đầy đủ với giá $4.99
category_free	21	Free	Бесплатно	مجاني	Безплатно	Gratis	Besplatno	Zdarma	Gratis	Gratis	Tasuta	Ilmainen	Gratuit	Frei	Δωρεάν	חופשי	नि: शुल्क	Ingyenes	Gratis	Gratis	無料	무료	Bezmaksas	Nemokama	Percuma	Gratis	Darmowe	Grátis	Gratuit	Бесплатно	免费	Zadarmo	Brezplačno	Gratis	Gratis	Libre	ฟรี	Ücretsİz	Безкоштовно	Miễn phí
full_access	22	FULL ACCESS	ПОЛНЫЙ ДОСТУП	الوصول الكامل	ПЪЛЕН ДОСТЪП	ACCÉS COMPLET	PUNI PRISTUP	PLNÝ PŘÍSTUP	FULDT ADGANG	VOLLEDIGE TOEGANG	TÄIELIK JUURDEPÄÄS	TÄYSI PÄÄSY	ACCÈS COMPLET	VOLLER ZUGANG	ΠΛΗΡΗΣ ΠΡΟΣΒΑΣΗ	גישה מלאה	पूर्ण पहुँच	TELJES HOZZÁFÉRÉS	AKSES PENUH	ACCESSO COMPLETO	フルアクセス	전체 액세스	PILNA PIEKĻUVE	PILNA PRIEIGA	AKSES PENUH	FULL TILGANG	PEŁNY DOSTĘP	ACESSO COMPLETO	ACCES COMPLET	ПУН ПРИСТУП	完整访问	PLNÝ PRÍSTUP	POPOLN DOSTOP	ACCESO COMPLETO	FULL ÅTKOMST	BUONG ACCESS	การเข้าถึงทั้งหมด	TAM ERİŞİM	ПОВНИЙ ДОСТУП	QUYỀN TRUY CẬP ĐẦY ĐỦ
for_parents_about_us_titile	23	About us	О нас	من نحن	За нас	Sobre nosaltres	O nama	O nás	Om os	Over ons	Meist	Tietoa meistä	À propos de nous	Über uns	Σχετικά με εμάς	אודותינו	हमारे बारे में	Rólunk	Tentang Kami	Chi siamo	私たちについて	회사 소개	Par mums	Apie mus	Tentang Kami	Om oss	O nas	Sobre nós	Despre noi	О нама	关于我们	O nás	O nas	Acerca de nosotros	Om oss	Tungkol sa Amin	เกี่ยวกับเรา	Hakkımızda	Про нас	Giới thiệu về chúng tôi
for_parents_about_us_1	24	Meet the passionate minds behind Saratan Animations Studio. Our team is a diverse group of creative individuals dedicated to developing educational and entertaining apps for children. Our current app, Lalafun - Coloring for Kids, inspires young minds through fun and interactive activities. Join us on our journey towards creating joyful learning experiences for children worldwide.	Познакомьтесь с увлеченными профессионалами студии Saratan Animations. Наша команда — это группа творческих людей, посвятивших себя разработке образовательных и развлекательных приложений для детей. Наше текущее приложение, Lalafun - Раскраска для детей, вдохновляет юные умы через веселые и интерактивные занятия. Присоединяйтесь к нам в нашем пути создания радостных образовательных проектов для детей по всему миру.	تعرف على العقول المبدعة وراء استوديو Saratan Animations. فريقنا مجموعة متنوعة من الأفراد المبدعين الملتزمين بتطوير تطبيقات تعليمية وترفيهية للأطفال. تطبيقنا الحالي، Lalafun - التلوين للأطفال، يُلهم العقول الصغيرة من خلال أنشطة ممتعة وتفاعلية. انضم إلينا في رحلتنا نحو إنشاء تجارب تعلم مليئة بالفرح للأطفال حول العالم.	Запознайте се със страстните умове зад Saratan Animations Studio. Нашият екип е разнообразна група от креативни личности, посветени на разработването на образователни и развлекателни приложения за деца. Настоящото ни приложение, Lalafun - Оцветяване за деца, вдъхновява младите умове чрез забавни и интерактивни дейности. Присъединете се към нас в нашето пътешествие за създаване на радостни учебни преживявания за деца по целия свят.	Descobreix les ments apassionades darrere de Saratan Animations Studio. El nostre equip és un grup divers de persones creatives dedicades a desenvolupar aplicacions educatives i entretingudes per a nens. La nostra aplicació actual, Lalafun - Coloring for Kids, inspira les ments joves a través d'activitats divertides i interactives. Uneix-te a nosaltres en el nostre viatge per crear experiències d'aprenentatge plenes d'alegria per a nens d'arreu del món.	Upoznajte strastvene umove iza Saratan Animations Studija. Naš tim je raznolika skupina kreativnih pojedinaca posvećenih razvoju obrazovnih i zabavnih aplikacija za djecu. Naša trenutna aplikacija, Lalafun - Coloring for Kids, inspirira mlade umove kroz zabavne i interaktivne aktivnosti. Pridružite nam se na našem putu stvaranja radosnih iskustava učenja za djecu širom svijeta.	Seznamte se s vášnivými tvůrci ze studia Saratan Animations. Náš tým tvoří různorodá skupina kreativních jedinců, kteří se věnují vývoji vzdělávacích a zábavných aplikací pro děti. Naše aktuální aplikace, Lalafun - Omalovánky pro děti, inspiruje mladé mysli pomocí zábavných a interaktivních aktivit. Připojte se k nám na naší cestě za vytvářením radostných vzdělávacích zážitků pro děti po celém světě.	Mød de passionerede sjæle bag Saratan Animations Studio. Vores team består af en mangfoldig gruppe kreative personer, der er dedikeret til at udvikle uddannelses- og underholdningsapps til børn. Vores nuværende app, Lalafun - Farvelægning for børn, inspirerer unge sind gennem sjove og interaktive aktiviteter. Kom med os på vores rejse mod at skabe glædesfyldte læringsoplevelser for børn over hele verden.	Maak kennis met de gepassioneerde geesten achter Saratan Animations Studio. Ons team is een diverse groep creatieve individuen die zich toeleggen op het ontwikkelen van educatieve en vermakelijke apps voor kinderen. Onze huidige app, Lalafun - Kleuren voor Kinderen, inspireert jonge geesten door middel van leuke en interactieve activiteiten. Sluit je aan bij onze reis naar het creëren van vreugdevolle leerervaringen voor kinderen over de hele wereld.	Tutvu Saratan Animations Studio kirglike mõtetega. Meie meeskond koosneb loovatest inimestest, kes on pühendunud laste hariduslike ja meelelahutuslike rakenduste arendamisele. Meie praegune rakendus, Lalafun - värvimine lastele, inspireerib noori mõtteid lõbusate ja interaktiivsete tegevuste kaudu. Liitu meiega teekonnal, et luua rõõmutoovaid õppimiskogemusi lastele üle kogu maailma.	Tapaa intohimoiset mielet Saratan Animations Studiosta. Tiimimme on monimuotoinen ryhmä luovia yksilöitä, jotka ovat omistautuneet kehittämään opettavaisia ja viihdyttäviä sovelluksia lapsille. Nykyinen sovelluksemme, Lalafun - Coloring for Kids, inspiroi nuoria mieliä hauskojen ja vuorovaikutteisten aktiviteettien kautta. Liity matkallemme luomaan iloisia oppimiskokemuksia lapsille ympäri maailmaa.	Rencontrez les esprits passionnés derrière Saratan Animations Studio. Notre équipe est un groupe diversifié de créatifs dédiés au développement d'applications éducatives et divertissantes pour les enfants. Notre application actuelle, Lalafun - Coloring for Kids, inspire les jeunes esprits à travers des activités ludiques et interactives. Rejoignez-nous dans notre voyage pour créer des expériences d'apprentissage joyeuses pour les enfants du monde entier.	Lernen Sie die leidenschaftlichen Köpfe hinter Saratan Animations Studio kennen. Unser Team besteht aus einer vielfältigen Gruppe kreativer Individuen, die sich der Entwicklung von Bildungs- und Unterhaltungsapps für Kinder widmen. Unsere aktuelle App, Lalafun - Coloring for Kids, inspiriert junge Köpfe durch unterhaltsame und interaktive Aktivitäten. Begleiten Sie uns auf unserer Reise, um freudige Lernerfahrungen für Kinder weltweit zu schaffen.	Γνωρίστε τα παθιασμένα μυαλά πίσω από το Saratan Animations Studio. Η ομάδα μας είναι μια πολυσυλλεκτική ομάδα δημιουργικών ατόμων που είναι αφοσιωμένα στην ανάπτυξη εκπαιδευτικών και ψυχαγωγικών εφαρμογών για παιδιά. Η τρέχουσα εφαρμογή μας, Lalafun - Coloring for Kids, εμπνέει τους νέους μέσω διασκεδαστικών και διαδραστικών δραστηριοτήτων. Ελάτε μαζί μας στο ταξίδι μας για τη δημιουργία χαρούμενων μαθησιακών εμπειριών για παιδιά παγκοσμίως.	הכירו את המוחות המלאים בתשוקה שמאחורי Saratan Animations Studio. הצוות שלנו הוא קבוצה מגוונת של אנשים יצירתיים, המוקדשים לפיתוח אפליקציות חינוכיות ומבדרות לילדים. האפליקציה הנוכחית שלנו, Lalafun - Coloring for Kids, מעוררת השראה במוחות הצעירים דרך פעילויות מהנות ואינטראקטיביות. הצטרפו אלינו במסע שלנו ליצירת חוויות למידה שמחות לילדים ברחבי העולם.	Saratan Animations Studio के पीछे उत्साही दिमागों से मिलें। हमारी टीम विभिन्न रचनात्मक व्यक्तियों का एक समूह है जो बच्चों के लिए शैक्षिक और मनोरंजक ऐप्स विकसित करने के लिए समर्पित है। हमारा वर्तमान ऐप, Lalafun - Coloring for Kids, मजेदार और इंटरैक्टिव गतिविधियों के माध्यम से युवा दिमागों को प्रेरित करता है। हमारे साथ जुड़ें, जब हम बच्चों के लिए दुनिया भर में आनंदमय सीखने के अनुभव बनाने की यात्रा पर हैं।	Ismerje meg a Saratan Animations Studio szenvedélyes elméit. Csapatunk egy sokszínű, kreatív egyénekből álló csoport, akik elkötelezettek az oktató és szórakoztató alkalmazások fejlesztése iránt gyermekek számára. Jelenlegi alkalmazásunk, a Lalafun - Coloring for Kids, szórakoztató és interaktív tevékenységeken keresztül inspirálja a fiatalokat. Csatlakozzon hozzánk utunk során, hogy örömteli tanulási élményeket hozzunk létre gyerekeknek világszerte.	Temui pikiran penuh semangat di balik Saratan Animations Studio. Tim kami adalah kelompok kreatif yang beragam yang berdedikasi untuk mengembangkan aplikasi edukatif dan menghibur untuk anak-anak. Aplikasi kami saat ini, Lalafun - Coloring for Kids, menginspirasi anak-anak melalui kegiatan interaktif dan menyenangkan. Bergabunglah dengan kami dalam perjalanan kami menciptakan pengalaman belajar yang menyenangkan bagi anak-anak di seluruh dunia.	Incontra le menti appassionate dietro Saratan Animations Studio. Il nostro team è un gruppo eterogeneo di individui creativi, dedicati allo sviluppo di app educative e divertenti per bambini. La nostra app attuale, Lalafun - Coloring for Kids, ispira le giovani menti attraverso attività divertenti e interattive. Unisciti a noi nel nostro viaggio per creare esperienze di apprendimento gioiose per i bambini di tutto il mondo.	Saratan Animations Studioの情熱的なメンバーに会いましょう。私たちのチームは、子供向けの教育的で楽しいアプリを開発することに専念している、創造的な個々のメンバーで構成された多様なグループです。現在のアプリ「Lalafun - Coloring for Kids」は、楽しくインタラクティブなアクティビティを通じて、子供たちの若い心を刺激します。世界中の子供たちに楽しい学びの体験を提供するための私たちの旅に、ぜひ参加してください。	Saratan Animations Studio를 이끄는 열정적인 사람들을 만나보세요. 우리 팀은 창의적인 인재들로 구성된 다양한 그룹으로, 아이들을 위한 교육적이고 재미있는 앱을 개발하는 데 전념하고 있습니다. 현재 앱인 Lalafun - Coloring for Kids는 재미있고 상호작용적인 활동을 통해 어린 마음에 영감을 줍니다. 전 세계 아이들을 위한 즐거운 학습 경험을 창조하는 여정에 함께하세요.	Iepazīstieties ar aizrautīgajiem prātiem aiz Saratan Animations Studio. Mūsu komanda ir daudzveidīga radošu cilvēku grupa, kas veltīta izglītojošu un izklaidējošu lietotņu izstrādei bērniem. Mūsu pašreizējā lietotne Lalafun - Coloring for Kids iedvesmo jaunos prātus ar jautrām un interaktīvām aktivitātēm. Pievienojieties mums mūsu ceļojumā, lai radītu priecīgas mācību pieredzes bērniem visā pasaulē.	Susipažinkite su aistringais protais už Saratan Animations Studio. Mūsų komanda yra įvairialypė kūrybingų asmenų grupė, skirta kurti edukacines ir pramogines programėles vaikams. Mūsų dabartinė programėlė Lalafun - Coloring for Kids įkvepia jaunas mintis per linksmą ir interaktyvią veiklą. Prisijunkite prie mūsų kelionėje, kurdami džiugias mokymosi patirtis vaikams visame pasaulyje.	Temui individu-individu yang penuh semangat di sebalik Saratan Animations Studio. Pasukan kami adalah kumpulan kreatif yang berbilang latar belakang yang berdedikasi untuk membangunkan aplikasi pendidikan dan hiburan untuk kanak-kanak. Aplikasi semasa kami, Lalafun - Coloring for Kids, menginspirasi minda muda melalui aktiviti interaktif yang menyeronokkan. Sertai kami dalam perjalanan untuk mencipta pengalaman pembelajaran yang menggembirakan untuk kanak-kanak di seluruh dunia.	Møt de lidenskapelige hjernene bak Saratan Animations Studio. Teamet vårt er en mangfoldig gruppe kreative individer som er dedikert til å utvikle pedagogiske og underholdende apper for barn. Vår nåværende app, Lalafun - Coloring for Kids, inspirerer unge sinn gjennom morsomme og interaktive aktiviteter. Bli med oss på vår reise for å skape gledelige læringsopplevelser for barn over hele verden.	Poznaj pasjonatów stojących za Saratan Animations Studio. Nasz zespół to zróżnicowana grupa kreatywnych osób, które poświęcają się tworzeniu edukacyjnych i rozrywkowych aplikacji dla dzieci. Nasza aktualna aplikacja, Lalafun - Coloring for Kids, inspiruje młode umysły poprzez zabawne i interaktywne aktywności. Dołącz do nas w naszej podróży, aby tworzyć radosne doświadczenia edukacyjne dla dzieci na całym świecie.	Conheça as mentes apaixonadas por trás da Saratan Animations Studio. Nossa equipe é um grupo diversificado de indivíduos criativos dedicados ao desenvolvimento de aplicativos educativos e de entretenimento para crianças. Nosso aplicativo atual, Lalafun - Coloring for Kids, inspira jovens mentes por meio de atividades interativas e divertidas. Junte-se a nós em nossa jornada para criar experiências de aprendizado alegres para crianças em todo o mundo.	Întâlniți mințile pasionate din spatele Saratan Animations Studio. Echipa noastră este un grup divers de persoane creative, dedicate dezvoltării de aplicații educative și distractive pentru copii. Aplicația noastră actuală, Lalafun - Coloring for Kids, inspiră mințile tinere prin activități amuzante și interactive. Alăturați-vă nouă în călătoria noastră de a crea experiențe de învățare pline de bucurie pentru copiii din întreaga lume.	Upoznajte strastvene umove iza Saratan Animations Studio. Naš tim je raznolika grupa kreativnih pojedinaca posvećenih razvoju obrazovnih i zabavnih aplikacija za decu. Naša trenutna aplikacija, Lalafun - Coloring for Kids, inspiriše mlade umove kroz zabavne i interaktivne aktivnosti. Pridružite nam se na našem putovanju ka stvaranju radosnih iskustava u učenju za decu širom sveta.	认识 Saratan Animations Studio 背后的热情团队。我们的团队是由一群致力于为儿童开发教育和娱乐应用的创意人士组成的多元化团队。我们目前的应用程序 Lalafun - Coloring for Kids，通过有趣和互动的活动激发年轻人的想象力。加入我们的旅程，创造全球儿童的快乐学习体验。	Zoznámte sa s vášnivými mysľami za Saratan Animations Studio. Náš tím je rozmanitá skupina kreatívnych jedincov, ktorí sa venujú vývoju vzdelávacích a zábavných aplikácií pre deti. Naša súčasná aplikácia, Lalafun - Coloring for Kids, inšpiruje mladé mysle prostredníctvom zábavných a interaktívnych aktivít. Pridajte sa k nám na našej ceste k vytváraniu radostných vzdelávacích zážitkov pre deti na celom svete.	Spoznajte strastne ume, ki stojijo za Saratan Animations Studio. Naša ekipa je raznolika skupina ustvarjalnih posameznikov, posvečenih razvoju izobraževalnih in zabavnih aplikacij za otroke. Naša trenutna aplikacija, Lalafun - Coloring for Kids, navdihuje mlade ume z zabavnimi in interaktivnimi dejavnostmi. Pridružite se nam na naši poti ustvarjanja veselih učnih izkušenj za otroke po vsem svetu.	Conoce a las mentes apasionadas detrás de Saratan Animations Studio. Nuestro equipo es un grupo diverso de individuos creativos dedicados al desarrollo de aplicaciones educativas y entretenidas para niños. Nuestra aplicación actual, Lalafun - Coloring for Kids, inspira a las mentes jóvenes a través de actividades divertidas e interactivas. Únete a nosotros en nuestro viaje para crear experiencias de aprendizaje llenas de alegría para niños de todo el mundo.	Möt de passionerade hjärnorna bakom Saratan Animations Studio. Vårt team är en mångsidig grupp av kreativa individer som är dedikerade till att utveckla pedagogiska och underhållande appar för barn. Vår nuvarande app, Lalafun - Coloring for Kids, inspirerar unga sinnen genom roliga och interaktiva aktiviteter. Följ med oss på vår resa för att skapa glädjefyllda lärandeupplevelser för barn världen över.	Kilalanin ang mga masigasig na kaisipan sa likod ng Saratan Animations Studio. Ang aming koponan ay binubuo ng iba't ibang grupo ng mga malikhaing indibidwal na nakatuon sa pagbuo ng mga edukasyonal at nakakatuwang app para sa mga bata. Ang aming kasalukuyang app, Lalafun - Coloring for Kids, ay nagbibigay inspirasyon sa mga kabataang isipan sa pamamagitan ng mga masaya at interaktibong aktibidad. Sumama sa amin sa aming paglalakbay sa paglikha ng masasayang karanasan sa pag-aaral para sa mga bata sa buong mundo.	พบกับผู้ที่อยู่เบื้องหลังความหลงใหลใน Saratan Animations Studio ทีมของเราเป็นกลุ่มบุคคลที่มีความคิดสร้างสรรค์ซึ่งมีความหลากหลายและมุ่งมั่นในการพัฒนาแอปเพื่อการศึกษาและความบันเทิงสำหรับเด็ก แอปปัจจุบันของเรา Lalafun - Coloring for Kids สร้างแรงบันดาลใจให้กับเด็กๆ ผ่านกิจกรรมที่สนุกสนานและมีการโต้ตอบ ร่วมเดินทางไปกับเราสร้างประสบการณ์การเรียนรู้ที่สนุกสนานสำหรับเด็กๆ ทั่วโลก	Saratan Anİmatİons Studİo'nun arkasındakİ tutkulu zİhİnlerle tanışın. Ekİbİmİz, çocuklar İçİn eğİtİcİ ve eğlencelİ uygulamalar gelİştİrmeye kendİnİ adamış, yaratıcı bİreylerden oluşan çeşİtlİ bİr gruptur. Mevcut uygulamamız Lalafun - Colorİng for Kİds, eğlencelİ ve etkİleşİmlİ aktİvİtelerle genç zİhİnlere İlham verİyor. Dünya çapındakİ çocuklar İçİn neşelİ öğrenme deneyİmlerİ yaratma yolculuğumuzda bİze katılın.	Познайомтеся з пристрасними умами, що стоять за студією Saratan Animations. Наша команда – це різноманітна група креативних особистостей, які присвячують себе розробці освітніх і розважальних додатків для дітей. Наша поточна програма, Lalafun - Coloring for Kids, надихає молоді уми через веселі та інтерактивні заходи. Приєднуйтесь до нас у нашій подорожі зі створення радісного навчального досвіду для дітей у всьому світі.	Gặp gỡ những bộ óc đam mê đằng sau Saratan Animations Studio. Đội ngũ của chúng tôi là một nhóm đa dạng các cá nhân sáng tạo, tận tâm phát triển các ứng dụng giáo dục và giải trí cho trẻ em. Ứng dụng hiện tại của chúng tôi, Lalafun - Coloring for Kids, truyền cảm hứng cho những tâm hồn trẻ thông qua các hoạt động vui nhộn và tương tác. Hãy cùng chúng tôi trong hành trình tạo ra những trải nghiệm học tập vui vẻ cho trẻ em trên toàn thế giới.
for_parents_about_us_2	25	Why Parents Trust Us	Почему родители доверяют нам	لماذا يثق بنا الآباء	Защо родителите ни се доверяват	Per què confien en nosaltres els pares	Zašto nam roditelji vjeruju	Proč nám rodiče důvěřují	Hvorfor forældre stoler på os	Waarom ouders ons vertrouwen	Miks vanemad meid usaldavad	Miksi vanhemmat luottavat meihin	Pourquoi les parents nous font confiance	Warum Eltern uns vertrauen	Γιατί οι γονείς μας εμπιστεύονται	למה הורים סומכים עלינו	माता-पिता हम पर क्यों भरोसा करते हैं	Miért bíznak meg bennünk a szülők	Mengapa Orang Tua Mempercayai Kami	Perché i genitori si fidano di noi	保護者が私たちを信頼する理由	부모님이 우리를 신뢰하는 이유	Kāpēc vecāki mums uzticas	Kodėl tėvai mumis pasitiki	Mengapa Ibu Bapa Percayakan Kami	Hvorfor foreldre stoler på oss	Dlaczego rodzice nam ufają	Por que os pais confiam em nós	De ce părinții au încredere în noi	Зашто нам родитељи верују	为什么父母信任我们	Prečo nám rodičia dôverujú	Zakaj nam starši zaupajo	Por qué los padres confían en nosotros	Varför föräldrar litar på oss	Bakit Nagtitiwala sa Amin ang mga Magulang	ทำไมพ่อแม่ถึงไว้วางใจเรา	Ebeveynler neden bİze güvenİyor?	Чому батьки довіряють нам	Tại sao các bậc cha mẹ tin tưởng chúng tôi
for_parents_about_us_2_No_Ads	26	No Ads	Нет рекламы	بدون إعلانات	Без реклами	Sense anuncis	Bez oglasa	Bez reklam	Ingen annoncer	Geen advertenties	Reklaamid puuduvad	Ei mainoksia	Pas de publicités	Keine Werbung	Χωρίς διαφημίσεις	ללא פרסומות	कोई विज्ञापन नहीं	Nincs hirdetés	Tanpa Iklan	Nessuna pubblicità	広告なし	광고 없음	Bez reklāmām	Be reklamų	Tiada Iklan	Ingen annonser	Brak reklam	Sem anúncios	Fără reclame	Без реклама	无广告	Žiadne reklamy	Brez oglasov	Sin anuncios	Inga annonser	Walang Ads	ไม่มีโฆษณา	Reklam yok	Без реклами	Không có quảng cáo
for_parents_about_us_2_No_Ads_text	27	Our applications are ad-free, providing a secure and uninterrupted  learning experience for your child.	Наши приложения не содержат рекламы, что обеспечивает безопасный и непрерывный процесс обучения вашего ребенка.	تطبيقاتنا خالية من الإعلانات، مما يوفر تجربة تعلم آمنة وغير متقطعة لطفلك.	Нашите приложения са без реклами, осигурявайки безопасно и непрекъснато обучение за вашето дете.	Les nostres aplicacions no tenen anuncis, oferint una experiència d'aprenentatge segura i contínua per al vostre fill.	Naše aplikacije su bez oglasa, pružajući sigurno i neprekinuto iskustvo učenja za vaše dijete.	Naše aplikace neobsahují reklamy, což poskytuje bezpečný a nepřerušovaný zážitek z učení pro vaše dítě.	Vores apps er annoncefri og giver en sikker og uafbrudt læringsoplevelse for dit barn.	Onze apps zijn advertentievrij en bieden een veilige en ononderbroken leerervaring voor uw kind.	Meie rakendused on reklaamivabad, pakkudes teie lapsele turvalist ja katkematut õpikogemust.	Sovelluksemme ovat mainosvapaita, tarjoten turvallisen ja keskeytymättömän oppimiskokemuksen lapsellesi.	Nos applications sont sans publicité, offrant une expérience d'apprentissage sûre et ininterrompue pour votre enfant.	Unsere Apps sind werbefrei und bieten eine sichere und ununterbrochene Lernerfahrung für Ihr Kind.	Οι εφαρμογές μας δεν περιέχουν διαφημίσεις, προσφέροντας μια ασφαλή και απρόσκοπτη μαθησιακή εμπειρία για το παιδί σας.	האפליקציות שלנו נטולות פרסומות, ומספקות חווית למידה בטוחה ורציפה לילדכם.	हमारे ऐप्स विज्ञापन-मुक्त हैं, आपके बच्चे के लिए एक सुरक्षित और निर्बाध शिक्षण अनुभव प्रदान करते हैं।	Alkalmazásaink hirdetésmentesek, biztonságos és zavartalan tanulási élményt biztosítanak a gyermekednek.	Aplikasi kami bebas iklan, memberikan pengalaman belajar yang aman dan tidak terganggu untuk anak Anda.	Le nostre applicazioni sono prive di pubblicità, offrendo un'esperienza di apprendimento sicura e ininterrotta per il tuo bambino.	私たちのアプリは広告なしで、あなたのお子様に安全で途切れのない学習体験を提供します。	우리의 애플리케이션은 광고가 없으며, 자녀에게 안전하고 끊김 없는 학습 경험을 제공합니다.	Mūsu lietotnes ir bez reklāmām, nodrošinot drošu un nepārtrauktu mācību pieredzi jūsu bērnam.	Mūsų programos yra be reklamų, užtikrinančios saugų ir nepertraukiamą mokymosi patirtį jūsų vaikui.	Aplikasi kami bebas iklan, memberikan pengalaman pembelajaran yang selamat dan tidak terganggu untuk anak anda.	Våre apper er annonsefrie og gir en trygg og uavbrutt læringsopplevelse for barnet ditt.	Nasze aplikacje są wolne od reklam, zapewniając bezpieczne i nieprzerwane doświadczenie edukacyjne dla Twojego dziecka.	Nossos aplicativos não têm anúncios, oferecendo uma experiência de aprendizado segura e ininterrupta para seu filho.	Aplicațiile noastre nu au reclame, oferind o experiență de învățare sigură și neîntreruptă pentru copilul tău.	Наше апликације су без реклама, пружајући сигурно и неометано искуство учења за ваше дете.	我们的应用程序没有广告，确保您的孩子享有安全、无干扰的学习体验。	Naše aplikácie neobsahujú reklamy, čo zabezpečuje bezpečný a neprerušovaný zážitok z učenia pre vaše dieťa.	Naše aplikacije so brez oglasov, kar zagotavlja varno in neprekinjeno učno izkušnjo za vašega otroka.	Nuestras aplicaciones no tienen anuncios, proporcionando una experiencia de aprendizaje segura e ininterrumpida para su hijo.	Våra appar är reklamfria och ger en säker och oavbruten lärandeupplevelse för ditt barn.	Ang aming mga aplikasyon ay walang ads, nagbibigay ng ligtas at tuluy-tuloy na karanasan sa pag-aaral para sa iyong anak.	แอปพลิเคชันของเราไม่มีโฆษณา ให้ประสบการณ์การเรียนรู้ที่ปลอดภัยและไม่ถูกรบกวนสำหรับลูกของคุณ.	Uygulamalarımız reklamsızdır ve çocuğunuz İçİn güvenlİ ve kesİntİsİz bİr öğrenme deneyİmİ sağlar.	Наші додатки не містять реклами, що забезпечує безпечний та безперервний навчальний досвід для вашої дитини.	Ứng dụng của chúng tôi không có quảng cáo, mang đến trải nghiệm học tập an toàn và không bị gián đoạn cho con bạn.
for_parents_about_us_2_Safe_Content	28	Safe Content	Безопасный контент	محتوى آمن	Безопасно съдържание	Contingut segur	Siguran sadržaj	Bezpečný obsah	Sikkert indhold	Veilige inhoud	Turvaline sisu	Turvallinen sisältö	Contenu sûr	Sicherer Inhalt	Ασφαλές περιεχόμενο	תוכן בטוח	सुरक्षित सामग्री	Biztonságos tartalom	Konten Aman	Contenuti sicuri	安全なコンテンツ	안전한 콘텐츠	Drošs saturs	Saugus turinys	Kandungan Selamat	Trygt innhold	Bezpieczne treści	Conteúdo seguro	Conținut sigur	Безбедан садржај	安全内容	Bezpečný obsah	Varnost vsebin	Contenido seguro	Säkert innehåll	Ligtas na Nilalaman	เนื้อหาปลอดภัย	Güvenlİ İçerİk	Безпечний контент	Nội dung an toàn
for_parents_about_us_2_Safe_Content_text	29	Our content is meticulously designed to ensure it is both safe and suitable for children.	Наш контент тщательно разработан, чтобы гарантировать его безопасность и пригодность для детей.	تم تصميم محتوياتنا بعناية لضمان أنها آمنة ومناسبة للأطفال.	Нашето съдържание е внимателно проектирано, за да гарантира, че е безопасно и подходящо за деца.	El nostre contingut està dissenyat minuciosament per garantir que sigui segur i adequat per a nens.	Naš sadržaj je pažljivo osmišljen kako bi bio siguran i prikladan za djecu.	Náš obsah je pečlivě navržen tak, aby byl bezpečný a vhodný pro děti.	Vores indhold er omhyggeligt designet for at sikre, at det er både sikkert og egnet til børn.	Onze inhoud is zorgvuldig ontworpen om ervoor te zorgen dat het veilig en geschikt is voor kinderen.	Meie sisu on hoolikalt loodud tagamaks, et see on nii turvaline kui ka sobilik lastele.	Sisältömme on huolellisesti suunniteltu varmistamaan, että se on turvallinen ja sopiva lapsille.	Notre contenu est conçu avec soin pour garantir qu'il soit à la fois sûr et adapté aux enfants.	Unser Inhalt ist sorgfältig gestaltet, um sicherzustellen, dass er sowohl sicher als auch kindgerecht ist.	Το περιεχόμενό μας έχει σχεδιαστεί προσεκτικά για να διασφαλίζει ότι είναι ασφαλές και κατάλληλο για τα παιδιά.	התוכן שלנו מעוצב בקפידה כדי להבטיח שהוא בטוח ומתאים לילדים.	हमारी सामग्री को सावधानीपूर्वक डिजाइन किया गया है ताकि यह सुनिश्चित हो सके कि यह बच्चों के लिए सुरक्षित और उपयुक्त है।	Tartalmunkat gondosan terveztük meg annak érdekében, hogy az biztonságos és megfelelő legyen a gyermekek számára.	Konten kami dirancang dengan cermat untuk memastikan bahwa itu aman dan sesuai untuk anak-anak.	I nostri contenuti sono attentamente progettati per garantire che siano sicuri e adatti ai bambini.	私たちのコンテンツは、子供にとって安全で適切であることを保証するために慎重に設計されています。	우리의 콘텐츠는 자녀에게 안전하고 적합하다는 것을 보장하기 위해 신중하게 설계되었습니다.	Mūsu saturs ir rūpīgi izstrādāts, lai nodrošinātu, ka tas ir drošs un piemērots bērniem.	Mūsų turinys kruopščiai sukurtas, kad būtų užtikrinta, jog jis yra saugus ir tinkamas vaikams.	Kandungan kami direka dengan teliti untuk memastikan ia selamat dan sesuai untuk kanak-kanak.	Vårt innhold er nøye designet for å sikre at det er trygt og egnet for barn.	Nasze treści są starannie zaprojektowane, aby zapewnić ich bezpieczeństwo i odpowiedniość dla dzieci.	Nosso conteúdo é cuidadosamente projetado para garantir que seja seguro e adequado para as crianças.	Conținutul nostru este proiectat cu grijă pentru a asigura că este atât sigur, cât și potrivit pentru copii.	Наш садржај је пажљиво дизајниран како би се осигурало да је безбедан и погодан за децу.	我们的内容经过精心设计，确保它既安全又适合儿童。	Náš obsah je starostlivo navrhnutý tak, aby zabezpečil jeho bezpečnosť a vhodnosť pre deti.	Naša vsebina je skrbno zasnovana tako, da zagotavlja, da je varna in primerna za otroke.	Nuestro contenido está cuidadosamente diseñado para asegurar que sea seguro y adecuado para los niños.	Vårt innehåll är noggrant utformat för att säkerställa att det är både säkert och lämpligt för barn.	Ang aming nilalaman ay maingat na dinisenyo upang matiyak na ito ay ligtas at angkop para sa mga bata.	เนื้อหาของเราได้รับการออกแบบอย่างพิถีพิถันเพื่อให้แน่ใจว่าปลอดภัยและเหมาะสมสำหรับเด็ก	İçerİklerİmİz özenle tasarlanmıştır ve hem güvenlİ hem de çocuklar İçİn uygundur.	Наш контент ретельно розроблений, щоб бути безпечним і підходящим для дітей.	Nội dung của chúng tôi được thiết kế cẩn thận để đảm bảo an toàn và phù hợp với trẻ em.
for_parents_about_us_2_Preschool-Aged_Kids	30	Preschool-Aged Kids	Дошкольники	الأطفال في سن ما قبل المدرسة	Деца в предучилищна възраст	Nens en edat preescolar	Djeca predškolske dobi	Předškolní děti	Børnehavebørn	Kleuters	Eelkooliealised lapsed	Esikouluikäiset lapset	Enfants d'âge préscolaire	Kinder im Vorschulalter	Παιδιά προσχολικής ηλικίας	ילדים בגיל גן	प्राथमिक आयु के बच्चे	Óvodás korú gyerekek	Anak Usia Prasekolah	Bambini in età prescolare	未就学児	유치원 연령 어린이	Pirmskolas vecuma bērni	Ikimokyklinio amžiaus vaikai	Kanak-kanak Pra-Sekolah	Førskolebarn	Dzieci w wieku przedszkolnym	Crianças em idade pré-escolar	Copii de vârstă preșcolară	Деца предшколског узраста	学龄前儿童	Deti predškolského veku	Predšolski otroci	Niños en edad preescolar	Förskolebarn	Mga Bata sa Preschool	เด็กก่อนวัยเรียน	Okul öncesİ yaşındakİ çocuklar	Діти дошкільного віку	Trẻ mẫu giáo
for_parents_about_us_2_Preschool-Aged_Kids_text	31	Our apps are dedicated for children aged 2 to 5, making them perfect for preschool-aged kids.	Наши приложения предназначены для детей в возрасте от 2 до 5 лет, что делает их идеальными для дошкольников.	تطبيقاتنا مخصصة للأطفال الذين تتراوح أعمارهم بين 2 و 5 سنوات، مما يجعلها مثالية للأطفال في سن ما قبل المدرسة	Нашите приложения са предназначени за деца на възраст от 2 до 5 години, което ги прави идеални за деца в предучилищна възраст.	Les nostres aplicacions estan dedicades a nens d'entre 2 i 5 anys, cosa que les fa perfectes per a nens en edat preescolar.	Naše aplikacije su namijenjene djeci u dobi od 2 do 5 godina, što ih čini savršenima za djecu predškolske dobi.	Naše aplikace jsou určeny pro děti ve věku od 2 do 5 let, což je činí ideálními pro předškolní děti.	Vores apps er dedikeret til børn i alderen 2 til 5 år, hvilket gør dem perfekte til børnehavebørn.	Onze apps zijn speciaal gemaakt voor kinderen van 2 tot 5 jaar, wat ze perfect maakt voor kleuters.	Meie rakendused on pühendatud 2–5-aastastele lastele, mis teeb neist ideaalse valiku eelkooliealistele.	Sovelluksemme on suunnattu 2–5-vuotiaille lapsille, mikä tekee niistä täydellisiä esikouluikäisille.	Nos applications sont dédiées aux enfants âgés de 2 à 5 ans, ce qui les rend parfaites pour les enfants d'âge préscolaire.	Unsere Apps sind für Kinder im Alter von 2 bis 5 Jahren bestimmt, was sie perfekt für Vorschulkinder macht.	Οι εφαρμογές μας είναι αφιερωμένες σε παιδιά ηλικίας 2 έως 5 ετών, καθιστώντας τις ιδανικές για παιδιά προσχολικής ηλικίας.	האפליקציות שלנו מיועדות לילדים בגילאים 2 עד 5, מה שהופך אותן למושלמות לילדים בגיל גן.	हमारे ऐप्स 2 से 5 वर्ष के बच्चों के लिए समर्पित हैं, जो उन्हें प्राथमिक आयु के बच्चों के लिए आदर्श बनाते हैं।	Alkalmazásaink 2 és 5 év közötti gyermekeknek szólnak, így tökéletesek az óvodás korúak számára.	Aplikasi kami didedikasikan untuk anak-anak usia 2 hingga 5 tahun, menjadikannya sempurna untuk anak-anak prasekolah.	Le nostre app sono dedicate ai bambini dai 2 ai 5 anni, rendendole perfette per i bambini in età prescolare.	当社のアプリは、2歳から5歳の子供たちを対象としており、未就学児に最適です。	저희 앱은 2세에서 5세 사이의 어린이를 위해 만들어졌으며, 유치원 연령 어린이에게 적합합니다.	Mūsu lietotnes ir veltītas bērniem vecumā no 2 līdz 5 gadiem, padarot tās ideāli piemērotas pirmskolas vecuma bērniem.	Mūsų programėlės skirtos 2–5 metų vaikams, todėl jos puikiai tinka ikimokyklinio amžiaus vaikams.	Aplikasi kami didedikasikan untuk kanak-kanak berumur 2 hingga 5 tahun, menjadikannya sesuai untuk kanak-kanak pra-sekolah.	Appene våre er dedikert til barn i alderen 2 til 5 år, noe som gjør dem perfekte for førskolebarn.	Nasze aplikacje są przeznaczone dla dzieci w wieku od 2 do 5 lat, co sprawia, że są idealne dla dzieci w wieku przedszkolnym.	Nossos aplicativos são dedicados a crianças de 2 a 5 anos, tornando-os perfeitos para crianças em idade pré-escolar.	Aplicațiile noastre sunt dedicate copiilor cu vârste cuprinse între 2 și 5 ani, fiind perfecte pentru copiii de vârstă preșcolară.	Наше апликације су посвећене деци узраста од 2 до 5 година, што их чини савршеним за децу предшколског узраста.	我们的应用专为2至5岁的儿童设计，非常适合学龄前儿童。	Naše aplikácie sú určené pre deti vo veku od 2 do 5 rokov, čo ich robí ideálnymi pre deti predškolského veku.	Naše aplikacije so namenjene otrokom, starim od 2 do 5 let, zaradi česar so idealne za predšolske otroke.	Nuestras aplicaciones están dedicadas a niños de 2 a 5 años, lo que las hace perfectas para niños en edad preescolar.	Våra appar är tillägnade barn i åldern 2 till 5 år, vilket gör dem perfekta för förskolebarn.	Ang aming mga app ay nakatuon sa mga batang may edad na 2 hanggang 5, na ginagawa silang perpekto para sa mga bata sa preschool.	แอปพลิเคชันของเรามุ่งเน้นไปที่เด็กอายุ 2 ถึง 5 ปี ทำให้เหมาะสำหรับเด็กก่อนวัยเรียน	Uygulamalarımız 2 İla 5 yaşındakİ çocuklara yönelİk olup, okul öncesİ yaş grubundakİ çocuklar İçİn mükemmeldİr.	Наші програми призначені для дітей віком від 2 до 5 років, що робить їх ідеальними для дітей дошкільного віку.	Các ứng dụng của chúng tôi được thiết kế dành riêng cho trẻ em từ 2 đến 5 tuổi, phù hợp hoàn hảo cho trẻ mẫu giáo.
for_parents_about_us_2_Localization_in_Apps	32	Localization in Apps	Локализация в приложениях	التعريب في التطبيقات	Локализация в приложения	Localització a les aplicacions	Lokalizacija u aplikacijama	Lokalizace v aplikacích	Lokalisering i apps	Lokalisatie in apps	Rakenduste lokaliseerimine	Lokalisointi sovelluksissa	Localisation dans les applications	Lokalisierung in Apps	Εντοπισμός σε εφαρμογές	לוקליזציה באפליקציות	ऐप्स में स्थानीयकरण	Lokalizáció az alkalmazásokban	Lokalisasi di Aplikasi	Localizzazione nelle app	アプリのローカライズ	앱 현지화	Lokalizācija lietotnēs	Programėlių lokalizacija	Penterjemahan dalam Aplikasi	Lokalisering i apper	Lokalizacja w aplikacjach	Localização em aplicativos	Localizare în aplicații	Локализација у апликацијама	应用中的本地化	Lokalizácia v aplikáciách	Lokalizacija v aplikacijah	Localización en aplicaciones	Lokalisering i appar	Lokalization sa mga App	การแปลในแอป	Uygulamalarda yerelleştİrme	Локалізація в додатках	Địa phương hóa trong ứng dụng
for_parents_about_us_2_Localization_in_Apps_text	33	Our apps support multiple languages, making them accessible to children worldwide.	Наши приложения поддерживают несколько языков, что делает их доступными для детей по всему миру.	تدعم تطبيقاتنا عدة لغات، مما يجعلها متاحة للأطفال في جميع أنحاء العالم	Нашите приложения поддържат множество езици, което ги прави достъпни за деца по целия свят.	Les nostres aplicacions admeten diversos idiomes, cosa que les fa accessibles per a nens de tot el món.	Naše aplikacije podržavaju više jezika, što ih čini dostupnima djeci diljem svijeta.	Naše aplikace podporují více jazyků, což je činí přístupnými pro děti po celém světě.	Vores apps understøtter flere sprog, hvilket gør dem tilgængelige for børn over hele verden.	Onze apps ondersteunen meerdere talen, waardoor ze toegankelijk zijn voor kinderen wereldwijd.	Meie rakendused toetavad mitut keelt, muutes need kättesaadavaks lastele üle kogu maailma.	Sovelluksemme tukevat useita kieliä, mikä tekee niistä käytettävissä ympäri maailmaa.	Nos applications prennent en charge plusieurs langues, ce qui les rend accessibles aux enfants du monde entier.	Unsere Apps unterstützen mehrere Sprachen, was sie für Kinder weltweit zugänglich macht.	Οι εφαρμογές μας υποστηρίζουν πολλές γλώσσες, καθιστώντας τις προσβάσιμες σε παιδιά παγκοσμίως.	האפליקציות שלנו תומכות במספר שפות, מה שהופך אותן לנגישות לילדים ברחבי העולם.	हमारे ऐप्स कई भाषाओं का समर्थन करते हैं, जिससे वे दुनिया भर के बच्चों के लिए सुलभ हो जाते हैं।	Alkalmazásaink több nyelvet támogatnak, így világszerte elérhetők a gyermekek számára.	Aplikasi kami mendukung banyak bahasa, membuatnya dapat diakses oleh anak-anak di seluruh dunia.	Le nostre app supportano più lingue, rendendole accessibili ai bambini di tutto il mondo.	当社のアプリは複数の言語に対応しており、世界中の子供たちがアクセスできるようになっています。	저희 앱은 여러 언어를 지원하여 전 세계 어린이들이 접근할 수 있도록 하고 있습니다.	Mūsu lietotnes atbalsta vairākas valodas, padarot tās pieejamas bērniem visā pasaulē.	Mūsų programėlės palaiko kelias kalbas, todėl jos prieinamos vaikams visame pasaulyje.	Aplikasi kami menyokong pelbagai bahasa, menjadikannya mudah diakses oleh kanak-kanak di seluruh dunia.	Appene våre støtter flere språk, noe som gjør dem tilgjengelige for barn over hele verden.	Nasze aplikacje obsługują wiele języków, co sprawia, że są dostępne dla dzieci na całym świecie.	Nossos aplicativos suportam vários idiomas, tornando-os acessíveis a crianças em todo o mundo.	Aplicațiile noastre acceptă mai multe limbi, făcându-le accesibile copiilor din întreaga lume.	Наше апликације подржавају више језика, чинећи их доступним деци широм света.	我们的应用支持多种语言，使其能够为全球的儿童使用。	Naše aplikácie podporujú viacero jazykov, vďaka čomu sú dostupné deťom na celom svete.	Naše aplikacije podpirajo več jezikov, kar omogoča dostop otrokom po vsem svetu.	Nuestras aplicaciones son compatibles con varios idiomas, lo que las hace accesibles para niños de todo el mundo.	Våra appar stöder flera språk, vilket gör dem tillgängliga för barn över hela världen.	Ang aming mga app ay sumusuporta sa maraming wika, ginagawa itong naa-access ng mga bata sa buong mundo.	แอปของเรารองรับหลายภาษา ทำให้สามารถเข้าถึงได้สำหรับเด็กทั่วโลก	Uygulamalarımız bİrden fazla dİlİ destekleyerek, dünyanın her yerİndekİ çocuklar İçİn erİşİlebİlİr olmasını sağlar.	Наші додатки підтримують кілька мов, що робить їх доступними для дітей по всьому світу.	Các ứng dụng của chúng tôi hỗ trợ nhiều ngôn ngữ, giúp chúng có thể tiếp cận được với trẻ em trên toàn thế giới.
for_parents_about_us_2_Interactive_learning	34	Interactive Learning	Интерактивное обучение	التعلم التفاعلي	Интерактивно обучение	Aprenentatge interactiu	Interaktivno učenje	Interaktivní učení	Interaktiv læring	Interactief leren	Interaktiivne õppimine	Interaktiivinen oppiminen	Apprentissage interactif	Interaktives Lernen	Διαδραστική μάθηση	למידה אינטראקטיבית	इंटरएक्टिव लर्निंग	Interaktív tanulás	Pembelajaran Interaktif	Apprendimento interattivo	インタラクティブな学習	인터랙티브 학습	Interaktīva mācīšanās	Interaktyvus mokymasis	Pembelajaran Interaktif	Interaktiv læring	Interaktywne uczenie się	Aprendizagem interativa	Învățare interactivă	Интерактивно учење	互动学习	Interaktívne učenie	Interaktivno učenje	Aprendizaje interactivo	Interaktivt lärande	Interactive na Pag-aaral	การเรียนรู้แบบโต้ตอบ	Etkİleşİmlİ öğrenme	Інтерактивне навчання	Học tập tương tác
for_parents_about_us_2_Interactive_learning_text	35	Our apps are interactive and educational, promoting development and teaching essential skills.	Наши приложения интерактивные и образовательные, способствуют развитию и обучению основным навыкам.	تطبيقاتنا تفاعلية وتعليمية، وتساعد على تطوير المهارات الأساسية وتعليمها	Нашите приложения са интерактивни и образователни, подпомагат развитието и преподават основни умения.	Les nostres aplicacions són interactives i educatives, promouen el desenvolupament i ensenyen habilitats essencials.	Naše aplikacije su interaktivne i edukativne, promiču razvoj i podučavaju osnovnim vještinama.	Naše aplikace jsou interaktivní a vzdělávací, podporují rozvoj a výuku základních dovedností.	Vores apps er interaktive og uddannelsesmæssige, de fremmer udvikling og lærer vigtige færdigheder.	Onze apps zijn interactief en educatief, bevorderen de ontwikkeling en leren essentiële vaardigheden aan.	Meie rakendused on interaktiivsed ja harivad, soodustades arengut ja õpetades olulisi oskusi.	Sovelluksemme ovat interaktiivisia ja opettavaisia, edistävät kehitystä ja opettavat tärkeitä taitoja.	Nos applications sont interactives et éducatives, favorisant le développement et enseignant des compétences essentielles.	Unsere Apps sind interaktiv und lehrreich, fördern die Entwicklung und lehren grundlegende Fähigkeiten.	Οι εφαρμογές μας είναι διαδραστικές και εκπαιδευτικές, προωθώντας την ανάπτυξη και διδάσκοντας βασικές δεξιότητες.	האפליקציות שלנו הן אינטראקטיביות ולימודיות, מקדמות התפתחות ומלמדות כישורים בסיסיים.	हमारे ऐप्स इंटरएक्टिव और शैक्षिक हैं, जो विकास को प्रोत्साहित करते हैं और आवश्यक कौशल सिखाते हैं।	Alkalmazásaink interaktívak és oktató jellegűek, elősegítik a fejlődést és az alapvető készségeket tanítják.	Aplikasi kami interaktif dan edukatif, mempromosikan perkembangan dan mengajarkan keterampilan penting.	Le nostre app sono interattive ed educative, promuovendo lo sviluppo e insegnando abilità essenziali.	当社のアプリはインタラクティブで教育的であり、発達を促進し、基本的なスキルを教えます。	저희 앱은 상호작용적이고 교육적이며, 발달을 촉진하고 필수적인 기술을 가르칩니다.	Mūsu lietotnes ir interaktīvas un izglītojošas, veicina attīstību un māca būtiskas prasmes.	Mūsų programėlės yra interaktyvios ir edukacinės, skatinančios vystymąsi ir mokančios svarbiausių įgūdžių.	Aplikasi kami adalah interaktif dan pendidikan, menggalakkan perkembangan dan mengajar kemahiran penting.	Appene våre er interaktive og pedagogiske, fremmer utvikling og lærer viktige ferdigheter.	Nasze aplikacje są interaktywne i edukacyjne, wspierają rozwój i uczą niezbędnych umiejętności.	Nossos aplicativos são interativos e educacionais, promovendo o desenvolvimento e ensinando habilidades essenciais.	Aplicațiile noastre sunt interactive și educative, promovând dezvoltarea și predând abilități esențiale.	Наше апликације су интерактивне и едукативне, подстичу развој и уче основним вештинама.	我们的应用是互动的和教育性的，促进发展并教授基本技能。	Naše aplikácie sú interaktívne a vzdelávacie, podporujú rozvoj a učia základné zručnosti.	Naše aplikacije so interaktivne in izobraževalne, spodbujajo razvoj in poučujejo bistvene spretnosti.	Nuestras aplicaciones son interactivas y educativas, promoviendo el desarrollo y enseñando habilidades esenciales.	Våra appar är interaktiva och pedagogiska, främjar utveckling och lär ut grundläggande färdigheter.	Ang aming mga app ay interactive at pang-edukasyon, nagpapalaganap ng pag-unlad at nagtuturo ng mga mahahalagang kasanayan.	แอปของเราเป็นแบบโต้ตอบและให้การศึกษา ส่งเสริมการพัฒนาและสอนทักษะพื้นฐาน	Uygulamalarımız etkİleşİmlİ ve eğİtİcİ olup, gelİşİmİ teşvİk eder ve temel becerİlerİ öğretİr.	Наші програми є інтерактивними та освітніми, сприяють розвитку і навчають основним навичкам.	Ứng dụng của chúng tôi mang tính tương tác và giáo dục, thúc đẩy sự phát triển và dạy các kỹ năng cần thiết.
for_parents_about_us_2_Free_Games	36	Free Games	Бесплатные игры	ألعاب مجانية	Безплатни игри	Jocs gratuïts	Besplatne igre	Zdarma hry	Gratis spil	Gratis spellen	Tasuta mängud	Ilmaiset pelit	Jeux gratuits	Kostenlose Spiele	Δωρεάν παιχνίδια	משחקים חינם	फ्री गेम्स	Ingyenes játékok	Permainan Gratis	Giochi gratuiti	無料ゲーム	무료 게임	Bezmaksas spēles	Nemokami žaidimai	Permainan Percuma	Gratis spill	Darmowe gry	Jogos grátis	Jocuri gratuite	Бесплатне игре	免费游戏	Hry zadarmo	Brezplačne igre	Juegos gratuitos	Gratis spel	Mga Libreng Laro	เกมฟรี	Ücretsİz Oyunlar	Безкоштовні ігри	Trò chơi miễn phí
for_parents_about_us_2_Free_Games_text	37	Try our games for free and support your child's growth. Discover a world of fun and educational activities!	Попробуйте наши игры бесплатно и поддержите рост вашего ребенка. Откройте для себя мир весёлых и образовательных занятий!	جرّب ألعابنا مجانًا وادعم نمو طفلك. اكتشف عالماً من الأنشطة الممتعة والتعليمية!	Опитайте нашите игри безплатно и подкрепете развитието на вашето дете. Открийте свят на забавни и образователни дейности!	Prova els nostres jocs gratuïtament i dona suport al creixement del teu fill. Descobreix un món ple d'activitats divertides i educatives!	Isprobajte naše igre besplatno i podržite rast vašeg djeteta. Otkrijte svijet zabavnih i edukativnih aktivnosti!	Vyzkoušejte naše hry zdarma a podpořte růst vašeho dítěte. Objevte svět zábavných a vzdělávacích aktivit!	Prøv vores spil gratis og støt dit barns udvikling. Oplev en verden af sjove og læringsaktiviteter!	Probeer onze spellen gratis en ondersteun de groei van uw kind. Ontdek een wereld van leuke en educatieve activiteiten!	Proovige meie mänge tasuta ja toetage oma lapse kasvu. Avastage lõbusate ja harivate tegevuste maailm!	Kokeile pelejämme ilmaiseksi ja tue lapsesi kasvua. Löydä hauskojen ja opettavaisten aktiviteettien maailma!	Essayez nos jeux gratuitement et soutenez la croissance de votre enfant. Découvrez un monde d'activités amusantes et éducatives!	Probieren Sie unsere Spiele kostenlos aus und unterstützen Sie die Entwicklung Ihres Kindes. Entdecken Sie eine Welt voller Spaß und lehrreicher Aktivitäten!	Δοκιμάστε τα παιχνίδια μας δωρεάν και υποστηρίξτε την ανάπτυξη του παιδιού σας. Ανακαλύψτε έναν κόσμο διασκεδαστικών και εκπαιδευτικών δραστηριοτήτων!	נסו את המשחקים שלנו בחינם ותמכו בהתפתחות ילדכם. גלו עולם מלא בפעילויות מהנות ולימודיות!	हमारे खेलों को मुफ्त में आजमाएं और अपने बच्चे की वृद्धि का समर्थन करें। मज़ेदार और शैक्षिक गतिविधियों की दुनिया की खोज करें!	Próbálja ki játékainkat ingyenesen, és támogassa gyermeke fejlődését. Fedezze fel a szórakoztató és oktató tevékenységek világát!	Coba game kami secara gratis dan dukung pertumbuhan anak Anda. Temukan dunia kegiatan yang menyenangkan dan edukatif!	Prova i nostri giochi gratuitamente e supporta la crescita di tuo figlio. Scopri un mondo di attività divertenti ed educative!	無料でゲームをお試しください、お子様の成長をサポートします。楽しくて教育的な活動の世界を発見してください！	무료로 저희 게임을 시도해 보고 자녀의 성장을 지원하세요. 재미있고 교육적인 활동의 세계를 발견하세요!	Izmēģiniet mūsu spēles bez maksas un atbalstiet sava bērna izaugsmi. Atklājiet jautru un izglītojošu aktivitāšu pasauli!	Išbandykite mūsų žaidimus nemokamai ir palaikykite savo vaiko augimą. Atraskite linksmų ir edukacinių veiklų pasaulį!	Cuba permainan kami secara percuma dan sokong pertumbuhan anak anda. Terokai dunia aktiviti yang menyeronokkan dan mendidik!	Prøv spillene våre gratis og støtt barnets utvikling. Oppdag en verden av morsomme og lærerike aktiviteter!	Wypróbuj nasze gry za darmo i wspieraj rozwój swojego dziecka. Odkryj świat zabawnych i edukacyjnych zajęć!	Experimente nossos jogos gratuitamente e apoie o crescimento do seu filho. Descubra um mundo de atividades divertidas e educativas!	Încercați jocurile noastre gratuit și sprijiniți dezvoltarea copilului dvs. Descoperiți o lume de activități distractive și educative!	Пробајте наше игре бесплатно и подржите развој вашег детета. Откријте свет забавних и едукативних активности!	免费试用我们的游戏，支持孩子的成长。发现一个充满乐趣和教育活动的世界！	Vyskúšajte naše hry zadarmo a podporte rast vášho dieťaťa. Objavte svet zábavných a vzdelávacích aktivít!	Preizkusite naše igre brezplačno in podprite rast vašega otroka. Odkrijte svet zabavnih in izobraževalnih dejavnosti!	Prueba nuestros juegos de forma gratuita y apoya el crecimiento de tu hijo. ¡Descubre un mundo de actividades divertidas y educativas!	Prova våra spel gratis och stöd ditt barns utveckling. Upptäck en värld av roliga och pedagogiska aktiviteter!	Subukan ang aming mga laro nang libre at suportahan ang paglaki ng iyong anak. Tuklasin ang isang mundo ng masaya at pang-edukasyon na mga aktibidad!	ลองเล่นเกมของเราฟรีและสนับสนุนการเติบโตของลูกของคุณ ค้นพบโลกแห่งกิจกรรมที่สนุกสนานและให้การศึกษา!	Oyunlarımızı ücretsİz deneyİn ve çocuğunuzun gelİşİmİne destek olun. Eğlencelİ ve eğİtİcİ aktİvİteler dünyasını keşfedİn!	Спробуйте наші ігри безкоштовно та підтримайте розвиток вашої дитини. Відкрийте для себе світ веселих та освітніх заходів!	Hãy thử trò chơi của chúng tôi miễn phí và hỗ trợ sự phát triển của con bạn. Khám phá thế giới của các hoạt động vui chơi và giáo dục!
for_parents_about_us_3_question	38	Engjoying our apps?	Нравятся наши приложения?	هل تستمتع بتطبيقاتنا؟	Харесвате ли нашите приложения?	Gaudeixes de les nostres aplicacions?	Uživajte li u našim aplikacijama?	Bavíte se našimi aplikacemi?	Nyder du vores apps?	Geniet je van onze apps?	Kas naudite meie rakendusi?	Nautitko sovelluksistamme?	Vous aimez nos applications?	Genießen Sie unsere Apps?	Απολαμβάνετε τις εφαρμογές μας;	נהנים מהאפליקציות שלנו?	हमारे ऐप्स का आनंद ले रहे हैं?	Élvezi az alkalmazásainkat?	Menikmati aplikasi kami?	Ti stai divertendo con le nostre app?	アプリを楽しんでいますか？	저희 앱을 즐기고 있나요?	Vai jums patīk mūsu lietotnes?	Ar jums patinka mūsų programėlės?	Menikmati aplikasi kami?	Liker du appene våre?	Cieszy cię korzystanie z naszych aplikacji?	Está a gostar das nossas aplicações?	Vă place aplicațiile noastre?	Уживате у нашим апликацијама?	享受我们的应用吗？	Páčia sa vám naše aplikácie?	Uživajte v naših aplikacijah?	¿Disfrutas de nuestras aplicaciones?	Njut av våra appar?	Nasisiyahan sa aming mga app?	เพลิดเพลินกับแอปของเรา?	Uygulamalarımızdan memnun musunuz?	Вам подобаються наші додатки?	Thích ứng dụng của chúng tôi?
for_parents_about_us_3_help_us	39	Please help us to get better!	Пожалуйста, помогите нам стать лучше!	الرجاء مساعدتنا على التحسن!	Моля, помогнете ни да станем по-добри!	Ajuda'ns a millorar!	Molimo pomozite nam da budemo bolji!	Pomozte nám zlepšit se!	Hjælp os med at blive bedre!	Help ons beter te worden!	Aita meil paremaks saada!	Auta meitä parantamaan!	Aidez-nous à nous améliorer!	Helfen Sie uns, besser zu werden!	Βοηθήστε μας να βελτιωθούμε!	עזרו לנו להשתפר!	कृपया हमें बेहतर बनाने में मदद करें!	Kérem, segítsen jobbá válnunk!	Bantu kami menjadi lebih baik!	Aiutaci a migliorare!	もっと良くなるようにお手伝いください！	저희가 더 나아질 수 있도록 도와주세요!	Lūdzu, palīdziet mums kļūt labākiem!	Prašome padėti mums tapti geresniais!	Sila bantu kami menjadi lebih baik!	Vennligst hjelp oss å bli bedre!	Prosimy, pomóż nam stać się lepszymi!	Por favor, ajude-nos a melhorar!	Vă rugăm să ne ajutați să ne îmbunătățim!	Молимо вас, помозите нам да будемо бољи!	请帮助我们变得更好！	Pomôžte nám zlepšiť sa!	Prosimo, pomagajte nam postati boljši!	¡Ayúdanos a mejorar!	Hjälp oss att bli bättre!	Tulungan kaming maging mas mahusay!	ช่วยให้เราพัฒนาขึ้น!	Lütfen bİze daha İyİ olmamız İçİn yardım edİn!	Будь ласка, допоможіть нам стати кращими!	Hãy giúp chúng tôi cải thiện!
for_parents_about_us_3_rate_us	40	Rate Us	Оцените нас	قيم تطبيقنا	Оценете ни	Valora'ns	Ocijenite nas	Ohodnoťte nás	Bedøm os	Beoordeel ons	Hinda meid	Arvostele meitä	Évaluez-nous	Bewerten Sie uns	Βαθμολογήστε μας	דרגו אותנו	हमें रेट करें	Értékeljen minket	Beri Kami Penilaian	Valutaci	評価してください	평가해주세요	Novērtējiet mūs	Įvertinkite mus	Beri Kami Penilaian	Vurder oss	Oceń nas	Classifique-nos	Evaluați-ne	Оцените нас	给我们评分	Ohodnoťte nás	Ocenite nas	Califícanos	Betygsätt oss	I-rate Kami	ให้คะแนนเรา	Bİzİ değerlendİrİn	Оцініть нас	Đánh giá chúng tôi
for_parents_FAQ_title	41	FAQ	FAQ	الأسئلة الشائعة	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	常见问题 (FAQ)	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ	FAQ
for_parents_FAQ_Contact_Us	42	If you have any questions? please write us: {emailName}	Если у вас есть вопросы, пожалуйста, напишите нам: {emailName}	إذا كان لديك أي أسئلة، يرجى الكتابة إلينا: {emailName}	Ако имате въпроси, моля, пишете ни: {emailName}	Si tens alguna pregunta, escriu-nos: {emailName}	Ako imate bilo kakvih pitanja, napišite nam: {emailName}	Máte nějaké dotazy? Napište nám: {emailName}	Har du nogen spørgsmål? skriv venligst til os: {emailName}	Als je vragen hebt, schrijf ons dan: {emailName}	Kui teil on küsimusi, palun kirjutage meile: {emailName}	Jos sinulla on kysyttävää, kirjoita meille: {emailName}	Si vous avez des questions, veuillez nous écrire : {emailName}	Wenn Sie Fragen haben, schreiben Sie uns bitte: {emailName}	Αν έχετε ερωτήσεις, παρακαλούμε γράψτε μας: {emailName}	אם יש לך שאלות, אנא כתוב לנו: {emailName}	यदि आपके कोई प्रश्न हैं, तो कृपया हमें लिखें: {emailName}	Ha bármilyen kérdése van, kérjük, írjon nekünk: {emailName}	Jika Anda memiliki pertanyaan, silakan tulis kepada kami: {emailName}	Se hai domande, scrivici: {emailName}	ご質問がある場合は、こちらにご連絡ください: {emailName}	질문이 있으시면 저희에게 글을 남겨주세요: {emailName}	Ja jums ir kādi jautājumi, lūdzu, rakstiet mums: {emailName}	Jei turite klausimų, rašykite mums: {emailName}	Jika anda mempunyai sebarang soalan, sila tulis kepada kami: {emailName}	Hvis du har noen spørsmål, vennligst skriv til oss: {emailName}	Jeśli masz jakieś pytania, napisz do nas: {emailName}	Se você tiver alguma dúvida, escreva para nós: {emailName}	Dacă ai întrebări, te rugăm să ne scrii: {emailName}	Ако имате било каквих питања, молимо вас да нам пишете: {emailName}	如果你有任何问题，请写信给我们: {emailName}	Ak máte akékoľvek otázky, napíšte nám: {emailName}	Če imate kakršna koli vprašanja, nam prosim pišite: {emailName}	Si tienes alguna pregunta, por favor escríbenos: {emailName}	Om du har några frågor, skriv till oss: {emailName}	Kung mayroon kang mga tanong, mangyaring isulat ito sa amin: {emailName}	หากคุณมีคำถามใดๆ โปรดเขียนถึงเรา: {emailName}	Herhangİ bİr sorunuz varsa, lütfen bİze yazın: {emaİlName}	Якщо у вас є які-небудь питання, будь ласка, напишіть нам: {emailName}	Nếu bạn có bất kỳ câu hỏi nào, vui lòng viết cho chúng tôi: {emailName}
for_parents_FAQ_1_question	43	How can I purchase this app? 	Как я могу купить приложение?	كيف يمكنني شراء هذا التطبيق؟	Как мога да закупя това приложение?	Com puc comprar aquesta aplicació?	Kako mogu kupiti ovu aplikaciju?	Jak mohu zakoupit tuto aplikaci?	Hvordan kan jeg købe denne app?	Hoe kan ik deze app kopen?	Kuidas saan seda rakendust osta?	Miten voin ostaa tämän sovelluksen?	Comment puis-je acheter cette application ?	Wie kann ich diese App kaufen?	Πώς μπορώ να αγοράσω αυτή την εφαρμογή;	איך אני יכול לרכוש את האפליקציה הזו?	मैं इस ऐप को कैसे खरीद सकता हूँ?	Hogyan vásárolhatom meg ezt az alkalmazást?	Bagaimana cara membeli aplikasi ini?	Come posso acquistare questa app?	このアプリを購入するにはどうすればいいですか？	이 앱을 어떻게 구매할 수 있나요?	Kā es varu iegādāties šo lietotni?	Kaip galiu įsigyti šią programėlę?	Bagaimana saya boleh membeli aplikasi ini?	Hvordan kan jeg kjøpe denne appen?	Jak mogę zakupić tę aplikację?	Como posso comprar este aplicativo?	Cum pot achiziționa această aplicație?	Како могу купити ову апликацију?	如何购买这个应用程序？	Ako môžem zakúpiť túto aplikáciu?	Kako lahko kupim to aplikacijo?	¿Cómo puedo comprar esta aplicación?	Hur kan jag köpa den här appen?	Paano ko mabibili ang app na ito?	ฉันจะซื้อแอปนี้ได้อย่างไร?	Bu uygulamayı nasıl satın alabİlİrİm?	Як я можу придбати цей додаток?	Làm thế nào để tôi có thể mua ứng dụng này?
for_parents_FAQ_1_answer	44	Please ensure that you have a valid payment method and active internet connection prior to app launch. Then, tap on the locked content, pass through the parental gate and follow the standard purchasing flow. 	Пожалуйста, убедитесь, что у вас есть действующий способ оплаты и активное интернет-соединение перед запуском приложения. Затем нажмите на заблокированный контент, пройдите через родительский контроль и следуйте стандартной процедуре покупки.	يرجى التأكد من أن لديك وسيلة دفع صالحة واتصال بالإنترنت نشط قبل إطلاق التطبيق. ثم اضغط على المحتوى المغلق، مر عبر بوابة الوالدين واتبع عملية الشراء القياسية.	Моля, уверете се, че имате валиден метод на плащане и активна интернет връзка преди стартиране на приложението. След това докоснете заключеното съдържание, минете през родителската защита и следвайте стандартния процес за покупка.	Assegura't de tenir un mètode de pagament vàlid i connexió a internet activa abans de llançar l'aplicació. A continuació, toca el contingut bloquejat, passa pel control parental i segueix el procés estàndard de compra.	Molimo vas da osigurate valjan način plaćanja i aktivnu internetsku vezu prije pokretanja aplikacije. Zatim dodirnite zaključani sadržaj, prođite roditeljski prolaz i slijedite standardni postupak kupnje.	Nejprve se ujistěte, že máte platnou platební metodu a aktivní připojení k internetu před spuštěním aplikace. Poté klepněte na uzamčený obsah, projděte rodičovskou bránou a pokračujte standardním nákupním postupem.	Sørg venligst for, at du har en gyldig betalingsmetode og en aktiv internetforbindelse før appens lancering. Tryk derefter på det låste indhold, gå igennem forældreporten og følg den standard købsgang.	Zorg ervoor dat je een geldige betalingsmethode hebt en dat de internetverbinding actief is voordat je de app start. Tik vervolgens op de vergrendelde inhoud, ga door de ouderpoort en volg de standaard aankoopprocedure.	Palun veenduge, et teil oleks kehtiv makseviis ja aktiivne internetiühendus enne rakenduse käivitamist. Seejärel puudutage lukustatud sisu, läbige vanemakaitse ja järgige tavapärast ostuprotsessi.	Varmista, että sinulla on voimassa oleva maksutapa ja aktiivinen internetyhteys ennen sovelluksen avaamista. Napauta sitten lukittua sisältöä, kulje vanhempien portin läpi ja seuraa normaalia ostoprosessia.	Veuillez vous assurer que vous avez un mode de paiement valide et une connexion Internet active avant de lancer l'application. Ensuite, appuyez sur le contenu verrouillé, passez par la porte parentale et suivez le processus d'achat standard.	Bitte stellen Sie sicher, dass Sie über eine gültige Zahlungsmethode und eine aktive Internetverbindung verfügen, bevor Sie die App starten. Tippen Sie dann auf den gesperrten Inhalt, passieren Sie das Elternportal und folgen Sie dem Standard-Kaufprozess.	Παρακαλούμε βεβαιωθείτε ότι έχετε έγκυρο τρόπο πληρωμής και ενεργή σύνδεση στο διαδίκτυο πριν την εκκίνηση της εφαρμογής. Στη συνέχεια, πατήστε στο κλειδωμένο περιεχόμενο, περάστε την πύλη γονικού ελέγχου και ακολουθήστε την τυπική διαδικασία αγοράς.	בבקשה ודא שיש לך שיטת תשלום תקפה וחיבור לאינטרנט פעיל לפני הפעלת האפליקציה. לאחר מכן, לחץ על התוכן הנעול, עבר את שער ההורים ופעל לפי תהליך הרכישה הסטנדרטי.	कृपया ऐप लॉन्च करने से पहले यह सुनिश्चित करें कि आपके पास एक वैध भुगतान विधि और सक्रिय इंटरनेट कनेक्शन है। फिर, लॉक की गई सामग्री पर टैप करें, पैरेंटल गेट पास करें और सामान्य खरीदारी प्रक्रिया का पालन करें।	Győződjön meg arról, hogy érvényes fizetési módszerrel és aktív internetkapcsolattal rendelkezik az alkalmazás elindítása előtt. Ezután érintse meg a zárolt tartalmat, haladjon át a szülői kapun, és kövesse a szokásos vásárlási folyamatot.	Pastikan Anda memiliki metode pembayaran yang valid dan koneksi internet aktif sebelum meluncurkan aplikasi. Kemudian, ketuk konten yang terkunci, lewati gerbang orang tua, dan ikuti alur pembelian standar.	Assicurati di avere un metodo di pagamento valido e una connessione internet attiva prima di avviare l'app. Poi, tocca il contenuto bloccato, passa attraverso il gate parentale e segui il normale flusso di acquisto.	アプリを起動する前に、有効な支払い方法とアクティブなインターネット接続があることを確認してください。その後、ロックされたコンテンツをタップし、保護者ゲートを通過して、標準の購入手順に従ってください。	앱을 시작하기 전에 유효한 결제 방법과 활성 인터넷 연결이 있는지 확인하세요. 그런 다음 잠긴 콘텐츠를 누르고 부모 게이트를 통과한 후 일반 구매 절차를 따르세요.	Lūdzu, pārliecinieties, ka jums ir derīga maksājuma metode un aktīvs interneta savienojums pirms lietotnes palaišanas. Pēc tam pieskarieties bloķētajam saturam, izpildiet vecāku aizsardzības soļus un sekojiet standarta iegādes plūsmai.	Įsitikinkite, kad turite galiojantį mokėjimo būdą ir aktyvų interneto ryšį prieš paleisdami programėlę. Tada paspauskite užrakintą turinį, pereikite tėvų kontrolės vartus ir laikykitės įprasto pirkimo proceso.	Sila pastikan anda mempunyai kaedah pembayaran yang sah dan sambungan internet yang aktif sebelum melancarkan aplikasi. Kemudian, ketik pada kandungan yang dikunci, lalui pintu ibu bapa dan ikuti aliran pembelian standard.	Sørg for at du har en gyldig betalingsmetode og en aktiv internettforbindelse før du starter appen. Trykk deretter på det låste innholdet, pass gjennom foreldreporten og følg den vanlige kjøpsprosessen.	Upewnij się, że masz ważną metodę płatności i aktywne połączenie internetowe przed uruchomieniem aplikacji. Następnie dotknij zablokowanej treści, przejdź przez bramkę rodzicielską i postępuj zgodnie z typowym procesem zakupu.	Certifique-se de ter um método de pagamento válido e uma conexão à internet ativa antes de iniciar o aplicativo. Em seguida, toque no conteúdo bloqueado, passe pelo controle parental e siga o fluxo padrão de compra.	Asigură-te că ai o metodă de plată validă și o conexiune activă la internet înainte de a lansa aplicația. Apoi, atinge conținutul blocat, treci prin poarta parentală și urmează procesul standard de achiziție.	Уверите се да имате важећи начин плаћања и активну интернет конекцију пре покретања апликације. Затим тапните на закључани садржај, прођите кроз родитељску браву и пратите стандардни ток куповине.	请确保在启动应用程序之前，你有一个有效的支付方式和活跃的互联网连接。然后，点击被锁定的内容，进入家长门并按照标准购买流程进行操作。	Uistite sa, že máte platnú platobnú metódu a aktívne internetové pripojenie pred spustením aplikácie. Potom ťuknite na zamknutý obsah, prejdite cez rodičovskú bránu a postupujte podľa štandardného nákupného procesu.	Pred zagonom aplikacije se prepričajte, da imate veljavno plačilno sredstvo in aktivno internetno povezavo. Nato tapnite zaklenjeno vsebino, preidite skozi starševsko varnost in sledite standardnemu nakupnemu postopku.	Asegúrate de tener un método de pago válido y una conexión a internet activa antes de iniciar la aplicación. Luego, toca el contenido bloqueado, pasa por la puerta parental y sigue el flujo de compra estándar.	Se till att du har en giltig betalningsmetod och en aktiv internetanslutning innan du startar appen. Tryck sedan på det låsta innehållet, gå igenom föräldraporten och följ det vanliga köpprocessen.	Tiyakin na mayroon kang wastong paraan ng pagbabayad at aktibong koneksyon sa internet bago ilunsad ang app. Pagkatapos, pindutin ang naka-lock na nilalaman, dumaan sa parental gate, at sundin ang karaniwang proseso ng pagbili.	โปรดตรวจสอบให้แน่ใจว่าคุณมีวิธีการชำระเงินที่ถูกต้องและการเชื่อมต่ออินเทอร์เน็ตที่ใช้งานได้ก่อนเปิดแอป จากนั้นแตะที่เนื้อหาที่ถูกล็อก ผ่านประตูผู้ปกครอง และทำตามขั้นตอนการซื้อปกติ	Uygulamayı başlatmadan önce geçerlİ bİr ödeme yöntemİnİzİn ve aktİf bİr İnternet bağlantınızın olduğundan emİn olun. Ardından, kİlİtlİ İçerİğe dokunun, ebeveyn kapısından geçİn ve standart satın alma akışını İzleyİn.	Переконайтеся, що у вас є дійсний спосіб оплати та активне підключення до Інтернету перед запуском додатка. Потім натисніть на заблокований вміст, пройдіть через батьківський контроль і дотримуйтесь стандартного процесу купівлі.	Hãy đảm bảo rằng bạn có một phương thức thanh toán hợp lệ và kết nối Internet hoạt động trước khi khởi chạy ứng dụng. Sau đó, chạm vào nội dung bị khóa, vượt qua cổng dành cho phụ huynh và làm theo quy trình mua hàng tiêu chuẩn.
for_parents_FAQ_2_question	45	How can I restore/transfer my purchase?	Как восстановить/перенести покупку?	كيف يمكنني استعادة/نقل شرائي؟	Как мога да възстановя/прехвърля покупката си?	Com puc restaurar/transferir la meva compra?	Kako mogu vratiti/prenijeti svoju kupnju?	Jak mohu obnovit/přenést svůj nákup?	Hvordan kan jeg gendanne/overføre mit køb?	Hoe kan ik mijn aankoop herstellen/overdragen?	Kuidas saan oma ostu taastada/üle kanda?	Miten voin palauttaa/siirtää ostokseni?	Comment puis-je restaurer/transférer mon achat ?	Wie kann ich meinen Kauf wiederherstellen/übertragen?	Πώς μπορώ να επαναφέρω/μεταφέρω την αγορά μου;	איך אני יכול לשחזר/להעביר את הרכישה שלי?	मैं अपनी खरीदारी को कैसे पुनः प्राप्त/स्थानांतरित कर सकता हूँ?	Hogyan tudom visszaállítani/átvinni a vásárlásomat?	Bagaimana cara memulihkan/mentransfer pembelian saya?	Come posso ripristinare/trasferire il mio acquisto?	購入を復元/転送するにはどうすればいいですか？	구매를 복구/이전하려면 어떻게 해야 하나요?	Kā es varu atjaunot/pārvietot savu pirkumu?	Kaip galiu atkurti/perkelti savo pirkimą?	Bagaimana saya boleh memulihkan/memindahkan pembelian saya?	Hvordan kan jeg gjenopprette/overføre mitt kjøp?	Jak mogę przywrócić/przenieść mój zakup?	Como posso restaurar/transferir minha compra?	Cum pot restaura/transfera achiziția mea?	Како могу да вратим/пребацим куповину?	如何恢复/转移我的购买？	Ako môžem obnoviť/presunúť svoj nákup?	Kako lahko obnovim/prenesem svoj nakup?	¿Cómo puedo restaurar/transferir mi compra?	Hur kan jag återställa/överföra mitt köp?	Paano ko mare-restore/malilipat ang aking binili?	ฉันจะกู้คืน/โอนการซื้อของฉันได้อย่างไร?	Satın alımımı nasıl gerİ yükleyebİlİrİm/aktarabİlİrİm?	Як я можу відновити/передати свою покупку?	Làm thế nào tôi có thể khôi phục/chuyển giao mua hàng của mình?
for_parents_FAQ_2_answer	46	"Please follow these steps:
1. Set up the account from which the purchase was initially performed.
2. Download the app using that account.
3. Ensure internet connection is ON.
4. Launch the app.
Note: IAPs restoration is only possible within the original store"	"Пожалуйста, выполните следующие шаги:
1. Настройте учетную запись, с которой была произведена покупка.
2. Загрузите приложение, используя эту учетную запись.
3. Убедитесь, что интернет-соединение включено.
4. Запустите приложение.
Примечание: восстановление покупок возможно только в пределах оригинального магазина."	"يرجى اتباع الخطوات التالية:
1. قم بإعداد الحساب الذي تم من خلاله الشراء الأصلي.
2. قم بتنزيل التطبيق باستخدام هذا الحساب.
3. تأكد من أن الاتصال بالإنترنت مفعل.
4. قم بتشغيل التطبيق.
ملاحظة: يمكن استعادة عمليات الشراء داخل التطبيق فقط داخل المتجر الأصلي."	"Моля, следвайте следните стъпки:
1. Настройте акаунта, от който е направена първоначалната покупка.
2. Изтеглете приложението, използвайки този акаунт.
3. Уверете се, че интернет връзката е включена.
4. Стартирайте приложението.
Забележка: възстановяването на покупки в приложението е възможно само в оригиналния магазин."	"Segueix aquests passos:
1. Configura el compte des del qual es va fer la compra inicial.
2. Descarrega l'aplicació utilitzant aquest compte.
3. Assegura't que la connexió a internet estigui activada.
4. Lança l'aplicació.
Nota: la restauració de compres només és possible dins de la botiga original."	"Slijedite ove korake:
1. Postavite račun s kojeg je izvršena kupnja.
2. Preuzmite aplikaciju koristeći taj račun.
3. Provjerite je li internetska veza UKLJUČENA.
4. Pokrenite aplikaciju.
Napomena: obnova kupnji u aplikaciji moguća je samo unutar izvorne trgovine."	"Postupujte takto:
1. Nastavte účet, ze kterého byl původní nákup proveden.
2. Stáhněte aplikaci pomocí tohoto účtu.
3. Ujistěte se, že máte zapnuté připojení k internetu.
4. Spusťte aplikaci.
Poznámka: Obnova nákupů je možná pouze v původním obchodě."	"Følg venligst disse trin:
1. Opret kontoen, hvorfra købet oprindeligt blev foretaget.
2. Download appen ved hjælp af denne konto.
3. Sørg for, at internetforbindelsen er TÆNDT.
4. Start appen.
Bemærk: Genoprettelse af køb er kun muligt i den oprindelige butik."	"Volg deze stappen:
1. Stel het account in waarmee de aankoop oorspronkelijk is gedaan.
2. Download de app met dat account.
3. Zorg ervoor dat de internetverbinding AAN staat.
4. Start de app.
Opmerking: Het herstellen van in-app aankopen is alleen mogelijk binnen de oorspronkelijke winkel."	"Järgige neid samme:
1. Looge konto, millega ost algselt tehti.
2. Laadige rakendus alla selle kontoga.
3. Veenduge, et internetiühendus oleks sisse lülitatud.
4. Käivitage rakendus.
Märkus: Rakendusesiseste ostude taastamine on võimalik ainult algses poes."	"Seuraa näitä vaiheita:
1. Aseta tili, jolla osto alun perin tehtiin.
2. Lataa sovellus kyseisellä tilillä.
3. Varmista, että internetyhteys on päällä.
4. Käynnistä sovellus.
Huomaa: Sovelluksen sisäisten ostosten palautus on mahdollista vain alkuperäisessä kaupassa."	"Veuillez suivre ces étapes :
1. Configurez le compte à partir duquel l'achat a été effectué.
2. Téléchargez l'application en utilisant ce compte.
3. Assurez-vous que la connexion Internet est activée.
4. Lancez l'application.
Remarque : La restauration des achats intégrés est uniquement possible dans la boutique d'origine."	"Bitte folgen Sie diesen Schritten:
1. Richten Sie das Konto ein, über das der ursprüngliche Kauf getätigt wurde.
2. Laden Sie die App mit diesem Konto herunter.
3. Stellen Sie sicher, dass die Internetverbindung eingeschaltet ist.
4. Starten Sie die App.
Hinweis: Die Wiederherstellung von In-App-Käufen ist nur im ursprünglichen Store möglich."	"Ακολουθήστε τα εξής βήματα:
1. Ρυθμίστε τον λογαριασμό από τον οποίο πραγματοποιήθηκε η αρχική αγορά.
2. Κατεβάστε την εφαρμογή χρησιμοποιώντας αυτόν τον λογαριασμό.
3. Βεβαιωθείτε ότι η σύνδεση στο διαδίκτυο είναι ενεργοποιημένη.
4. Εκκινήστε την εφαρμογή.
Σημείωση: Η επαναφορά των αγορών εντός εφαρμογής είναι δυνατή μόνο εντός του αρχικού καταστήματος."	"בבקשה פעל לפי הצעדים הבאים:
1. הגדר את החשבון שממנו התבצעה הרכישה.
2. הורד את האפליקציה באמצעות אותו חשבון.
3. ודא שחיבור האינטרנט מופעל.
4. הפעל את האפליקציה.
הערה: שחזור רכישות בתוך האפליקציה אפשרי רק בתוך החנות המקורית."	"कृपया इन चरणों का पालन करें:
1. उस खाते को सेटअप करें जिससे प्रारंभिक खरीदारी की गई थी।
2. उस खाते का उपयोग करके ऐप डाउनलोड करें।
3. सुनिश्चित करें कि इंटरनेट कनेक्शन चालू है।
4. ऐप लॉन्च करें।
नोट: इन-ऐप खरीदारी की पुनः प्राप्ति केवल मूल स्टोर के भीतर संभव है।"	"Kérjük, kövesse az alábbi lépéseket:
1. Állítsa be azt a fiókot, amellyel az eredeti vásárlás történt.
2. Töltse le az alkalmazást azzal a fiókkal.
3. Győződjön meg róla, hogy az internetkapcsolat be van kapcsolva.
4. Indítsa el az alkalmazást.
Megjegyzés: Az alkalmazáson belüli vásárlások visszaállítása csak az eredeti áruházban lehetséges."	"Silakan ikuti langkah-langkah berikut:
1. Siapkan akun yang digunakan untuk melakukan pembelian awal.
2. Unduh aplikasi menggunakan akun tersebut.
3. Pastikan koneksi internet AKTIF.
4. Luncurkan aplikasi.
Catatan: Pemulihan pembelian dalam aplikasi hanya dapat dilakukan di toko asli."	"Segui questi passaggi:
1. Configura l'account da cui è stato effettuato l'acquisto iniziale.
2. Scarica l'app utilizzando quell'account.
3. Assicurati che la connessione internet sia ATTIVA.
4. Avvia l'app.
Nota: Il ripristino degli acquisti in-app è possibile solo all'interno dello store originale."	"次の手順に従ってください:
1. 最初に購入を行ったアカウントを設定します。
2. そのアカウントを使用してアプリをダウンロードします。
3. インターネット接続がオンになっていることを確認してください。
4. アプリを起動します。
注: アプリ内購入の復元は元のストア内でのみ可能です。"	"다음 단계를 따르세요:
1. 원래 구매가 이루어진 계정을 설정하세요.
2. 해당 계정을 사용하여 앱을 다운로드하세요.
3. 인터넷 연결이 활성화되어 있는지 확인하세요.
4. 앱을 실행하세요.
참고: 인앱 구매 복구는 원래의 스토어 내에서만 가능합니다."	"Lūdzu, izpildiet šos soļus:
1. Izveidojiet kontu, no kura tika veikts sākotnējais pirkums.
2. Lejupielādējiet lietotni, izmantojot šo kontu.
3. Pārliecinieties, ka interneta savienojums ir IESLĒGTS.
4. Palaidiet lietotni.
Piezīme: IAP atjaunošana ir iespējama tikai sākotnējā veikalā."	"Atlikite šiuos veiksmus:
1. Sukurkite paskyrą, iš kurios buvo atliktas pirminis pirkimas.
2. Atsisiųskite programėlę naudodami tą paskyrą.
3. Įsitikinkite, kad interneto ryšys yra įjungtas.
4. Paleiskite programėlę.
Pastaba: Pirkimų atkūrimas galimas tik pradiniame parduotuvėje."	"Sila ikuti langkah-langkah berikut:
1. Tetapkan akaun yang digunakan untuk pembelian asal.
2. Muat turun aplikasi menggunakan akaun tersebut.
3. Pastikan sambungan internet diaktifkan.
4. Lancarkan aplikasi.
Nota: Pemulihan pembelian dalam aplikasi hanya boleh dilakukan di kedai asal."	"Vennligst følg disse trinnene:
1. Sett opp kontoen som opprinnelig ble brukt til kjøpet.
2. Last ned appen ved å bruke den kontoen.
3. Sørg for at internettforbindelsen er PÅ.
4. Start appen.
Merk: Gjenoppretting av kjøp i appen er kun mulig i den opprinnelige butikken."	"Postępuj zgodnie z poniższymi krokami:
1. Skonfiguruj konto, z którego dokonano pierwotnego zakupu.
2. Pobierz aplikację, używając tego konta.
3. Upewnij się, że połączenie internetowe jest WŁĄCZONE.
4. Uruchom aplikację.
Uwaga: Przywracanie zakupów w aplikacji jest możliwe tylko w oryginalnym sklepie."	"Por favor, siga os seguintes passos:
1. Configure a conta usada para a compra inicial.
2. Baixe o aplicativo usando essa conta.
3. Certifique-se de que a conexão à internet esteja ATIVA.
4. Inicie o aplicativo.
Nota: A restauração de compras dentro do aplicativo só é possível na loja original."	"Te rugăm să urmezi acești pași:
1. Configurează contul de pe care s-a efectuat achiziția inițială.
2. Descarcă aplicația folosind acel cont.
3. Asigură-te că conexiunea la internet este ACTIVĂ.
4. Lansează aplicația.
Notă: Restaurarea achizițiilor în aplicație este posibilă doar în magazinul original."	"Молимо вас да следите ове кораке:
1. Подесите налог са ког је обављена почетна куповина.
2. Преузмите апликацију користећи тај налог.
3. Уверите се да је интернет конекција УКЉУЧЕНА.
4. Покрените апликацију.
Напомена: Враћање куповине у апликацији могуће је само у оригиналној продавници."	"请按以下步骤操作:
1. 设置最初购买时使用的账户。
2. 使用该账户下载应用程序。
3. 确保互联网连接已开启。
4. 启动应用程序。
注意: 应用内购买的恢复只能在原始商店中完成。"	"Postupujte podľa týchto krokov:
1. Nastavte si účet, z ktorého bol nákup pôvodne vykonaný.
2. Stiahnite si aplikáciu pomocou tohto účtu.
3. Uistite sa, že internetové pripojenie je ZAPNUTÉ.
4. Spustite aplikáciu.
Poznámka: Obnovenie nákupov v aplikácii je možné len v pôvodnom obchode."	"Sledite naslednjim korakom:
1. Nastavite račun, s katerega je bil prvotno opravljen nakup.
2. Prenesite aplikacijo z uporabo tega računa.
3. Prepričajte se, da je internetna povezava VKLOPLJENA.
4. Zaženite aplikacijo.
Opomba: Obnovitev nakupov znotraj aplikacije je možna samo v izvirni trgovini."	"Por favor, sigue estos pasos:
1. Configura la cuenta desde la que se realizó la compra inicialmente.
2. Descarga la aplicación utilizando esa cuenta.
3. Asegúrate de que la conexión a internet esté ACTIVADA.
4. Inicia la aplicación.
Nota: La restauración de compras dentro de la aplicación solo es posible en la tienda original."	"Följ dessa steg:
1. Ställ in kontot som användes vid det ursprungliga köpet.
2. Ladda ner appen med det kontot.
3. Se till att internetanslutningen är PÅ.
4. Starta appen.
Observera: Återställning av köp i appen är endast möjligt i den ursprungliga butiken."	"Mangyaring sundin ang mga hakbang na ito:
1. I-set up ang account na ginamit sa orihinal na pagbili.
2. I-download ang app gamit ang account na iyon.
3. Tiyakin na ang koneksyon sa internet ay NAKA-ON.
4. Ilunsad ang app.
Tandaan: Ang pag-restore ng mga in-app purchase ay posible lamang sa orihinal na tindahan."	"โปรดทำตามขั้นตอนเหล่านี้:
1. ตั้งค่าบัญชีที่ใช้ในการซื้อครั้งแรก
2. ดาวน์โหลดแอปโดยใช้บัญชีนั้น
3. ตรวจสอบให้แน่ใจว่าการเชื่อมต่ออินเทอร์เน็ตเปิดอยู่
4. เปิดแอป
หมายเหตุ: การกู้คืนการซื้อในแอปสามารถทำได้เฉพาะในร้านค้าเดิมเท่านั้น"	"Lütfen aşağıdakİ adımları İzleyİn:
1. Satın alımın başlangıçta yapıldığı hesabı ayarlayın.
2. Bu hesabı kullanarak uygulamayı İndİrİn.
3. İnternet bağlantısının AÇİK olduğundan emİn olun.
4. Uygulamayı başlatın.
Not: Uygulama İçİ satın alımların gerİ yüklenmesİ yalnızca orİjİnal mağazada mümkündür."	"Будь ласка, виконайте наступні дії:
1. Налаштуйте обліковий запис, за допомогою якого була здійснена початкова покупка.
2. Завантажте додаток, використовуючи цей обліковий запис.
3. Переконайтеся, що підключення до Інтернету ввімкнено.
4. Запустіть додаток.
Примітка: Відновлення покупок у додатку можливе лише в оригінальному магазині."	"Vui lòng làm theo các bước sau:
1. Thiết lập tài khoản mà từ đó bạn đã thực hiện mua hàng ban đầu.
2. Tải xuống ứng dụng bằng tài khoản đó.
3. Đảm bảo kết nối Internet đang BẬT.
4. Khởi chạy ứng dụng.
Lưu ý: Việc khôi phục mua hàng trong ứng dụng chỉ khả dụng trong cửa hàng ban đầu."
for_parents_FAQ_3_question	47	How can I share my in-app purchases using the Apple Family Sharing Program?	Как я могу поделиться своими внутриигровыми покупками с помощью программы Apple Family Sharing?	كيف يمكنني مشاركة مشترياتي داخل التطبيق باستخدام برنامج Apple Family Sharing؟	Как мога да споделя своите покупки в приложението с програмата Apple Family Sharing?	Com puc compartir les meves compres dins l'aplicació mitjançant el programa Apple Family Sharing?	Kako mogu podijeliti svoje kupnje unutar aplikacije koristeći Apple Family Sharing?	Jak mohu sdílet své nákupy v aplikaci pomocí programu Apple Family Sharing?	Hvordan kan jeg dele mine køb i appen ved hjælp af Apple Family Sharing-programmet?	Hoe kan ik mijn in-app aankopen delen met het Apple Family Sharing-programma?	Kuidas saan oma rakendusesisesed ostud jagada Apple Family Sharing programmi kaudu?	Miten voin jakaa sovelluksen sisäiset ostoni Apple Family Sharing -ohjelman avulla?	Comment puis-je partager mes achats intégrés en utilisant le programme Apple Family Sharing ?	Wie kann ich meine In-App-Käufe über das Apple Family Sharing-Programm teilen?	Πώς μπορώ να μοιραστώ τις αγορές μου εντός της εφαρμογής μέσω του προγράμματος Apple Family Sharing;	איך אני יכול לשתף את הרכישות שלי באפליקציה באמצעות תוכנית Apple Family Sharing?	मैं अपने इन-ऐप खरीदारी को Apple Family Sharing प्रोग्राम का उपयोग करके कैसे साझा कर सकता हूँ?	Hogyan oszthatom meg az alkalmazáson belüli vásárlásaimat az Apple Family Sharing program segítségével?	Bagaimana saya bisa membagikan pembelian dalam aplikasi saya menggunakan program Apple Family Sharing?	Come posso condividere i miei acquisti in-app utilizzando il programma Apple Family Sharing?	Apple Family Sharingプログラムを使ってアプリ内購入を共有するにはどうすればいいですか？	Apple Family Sharing 프로그램을 사용하여 앱 내 구매를 공유하려면 어떻게 해야 하나요?	Kā es varu koplietot savus pirkumus lietotnē, izmantojot Apple Family Sharing programmu?	Kaip galiu bendrinti savo programėlėje įsigytus pirkinius naudodamasis Apple Family Sharing programa?	Bagaimana saya boleh berkongsi pembelian dalam aplikasi saya menggunakan program Apple Family Sharing?	Hvordan kan jeg dele kjøpene mine i appen ved hjelp av Apple Family Sharing-programmet?	Jak mogę udostępniać zakupy w aplikacji za pomocą programu Apple Family Sharing?	Como posso compartilhar minhas compras no aplicativo usando o programa Apple Family Sharing?	Cum pot să partajez achizițiile mele din aplicație folosind programul Apple Family Sharing?	Kako mogu da podelim svoje kupovine u aplikaciji koristeći Apple Family Sharing program?	我如何通过 Apple Family Sharing 计划共享我的应用内购买？	Ako môžem zdieľať svoje nákupy v aplikácii pomocou programu Apple Family Sharing?	Kako lahko delim svoje nakupe v aplikaciji s programom Apple Family Sharing?	¿Cómo puedo compartir mis compras dentro de la aplicación utilizando el programa Apple Family Sharing?	Hur kan jag dela mina köp i appen med Apple Family Sharing-programmet?	Paano ko maibabahagi ang aking mga in-app purchase gamit ang Apple Family Sharing program?	ฉันจะแชร์การซื้อในแอปของฉันโดยใช้โปรแกรม Apple Family Sharing ได้อย่างไร?	Apple Family Sharing programını kullanarak uygulama içi satın alımlarımı nasıl paylaşabilirim?	Як я можу поділитися своїми покупками в додатку за допомогою програми Apple Family Sharing?	Làm thế nào để tôi chia sẻ các giao dịch mua trong ứng dụng của mình bằng chương trình Apple Family Sharing?
for_parents_FAQ_3_answer	48	"To set up Family Sharing:
1. Open Settings.
2. Tap your name.
3. Select Family Sharing.
4. Choose ""Set Up Your Family.""
Follow the onscreen instructions to set up your family and invite members. "	"Для настройки Family Sharing:
1 - Откройте Настройки.
2 - Нажмите на своё имя.
3 - Выберите ""Семейный доступ"".
4 - Нажмите ""Настроить семейный доступ"".
Следуйте инструкциям на экране для настройки семьи и приглашения участников."	"لإعداد Family Sharing:
1 - افتح الإعدادات.
2 - اضغط على اسمك.
3 - اختر مشاركة العائلة.
4 - اختر ""إعداد عائلتك"".
اتبع التعليمات التي تظهر على الشاشة لإعداد العائلة ودعوة الأعضاء."	"За да настроите Family Sharing:
1 - Отворете Настройки.
2 - Докоснете името си.
3 - Изберете Family Sharing.
4 - Изберете „Настройка на вашето семейство“.
Следвайте инструкциите на екрана, за да настроите вашето семейство и да поканите членове."	"Per configurar Family Sharing:
1 - Obre Configuració.
2 - Toca el teu nom.
3 - Selecciona Compartició en família.
4 - Tria ""Configura la teva família"".
Segueix les instruccions en pantalla per configurar la teva família i convidar membres."	"Za postavljanje Family Sharinga:
1 - Otvorite Postavke.
2 - Dodirnite svoje ime.
3 - Odaberite Dijeljenje s obitelji.
4 - Odaberite ""Postavite svoju obitelj"".
Slijedite upute na zaslonu za postavljanje obitelji i pozivanje članova."	"Pro nastavení Family Sharing:
1 - Otevřete Nastavení.
2 - Klepněte na své jméno.
3 - Vyberte Sdílení s rodinou.
4 - Vyberte ""Nastavit vaši rodinu"".
Postupujte podle pokynů na obrazovce k nastavení rodiny a pozvání členů."	"For at opsætte Family Sharing:
1 - Åbn Indstillinger.
2 - Tryk på dit navn.
3 - Vælg Familiedeling.
4 - Vælg ""Opsæt din familie"".
Følg instruktionerne på skærmen for at opsætte din familie og invitere medlemmer."	"Om Family Sharing in te stellen:
1 - Open Instellingen.
2 - Tik op je naam.
3 - Selecteer Delen met gezin.
4 - Kies ""Stel je gezin in"".
Volg de instructies op het scherm om je gezin in te stellen en leden uit te nodigen."	"Family Sharing seadistamiseks:
Ava Seaded.
Puuduta oma nime.
Vali Family Sharing.
Vali ""Seadista oma pere"".
Järgi ekraanil kuvatavaid juhiseid, et seadistada oma pere ja kutsuda liikmeid."	"Family Sharingin määrittäminen:
1 - Avaa Asetukset.
2 - Napauta nimeäsi.
3 - Valitse Perhejako.
4 - Valitse ""Määritä perheesi"".
Noudata näytön ohjeita perheen perustamiseksi ja jäsenten kutsumiseksi."	"Pour configurer le Partage familial :
1 - Ouvrez Réglages.
2 - Appuyez sur votre nom.
3 - Sélectionnez Partage familial.
4 - Choisissez ""Configurer votre famille"".
Suivez les instructions à l'écran pour configurer votre famille et inviter des membres."	"So richten Sie Family Sharing ein:
1 - Öffnen Sie Einstellungen.
2 - Tippen Sie auf Ihren Namen.
3 - Wählen Sie Familienfreigabe.
4 - Wählen Sie ""Ihre Familie einrichten"".
Befolgen Sie die Anweisungen auf dem Bildschirm, um Ihre Familie einzurichten und Mitglieder einzuladen."	"Για να ρυθμίσετε το Family Sharing:
1 - Ανοίξτε τις Ρυθμίσεις.
2 - Πατήστε στο όνομά σας.
3 - Επιλέξτε Οικογενειακή Κοινοποίηση.
4 - Επιλέξτε ""Ρυθμίστε την οικογένειά σας"".
Ακολουθήστε τις οδηγίες στην οθόνη για να ρυθμίσετε την οικογένειά σας και να προσκαλέσετε μέλη."	"כדי להגדיר שיתוף משפחתי:
1 - פתח את ההגדרות.
2 - הקש על שמך.
3 - בחר שיתוף משפחתי.
4 - בחר ""הגדר את המשפחה שלך"".
עקוב אחר ההוראות שעל המסך כדי להגדיר את המשפחה ולהזמין חברים."	"Family Sharing सेट करने के लिए:
1 - सेटिंग्स खोलें।
2 - अपने नाम पर टैप करें।
3 - फैमिली शेयरिंग चुनें।
4 - ""अपना परिवार सेट करें"" चुनें।
परिवार सेट करने और सदस्यों को आमंत्रित करने के लिए ऑन-स्क्रीन निर्देशों का पालन करें।"	"A Family Sharing beállítása:
1 - Nyissa meg a Beállítások alkalmazást.
2 - Érintse meg a nevét.
3 - Válassza a Családi megosztás lehetőséget.
4 - Válassza a ""Családja beállítása"" lehetőséget.
Kövesse a képernyőn megjelenő utasításokat a család beállításához és a tagok meghívásához."	"Untuk mengatur Family Sharing:
1 - Buka Pengaturan.
2 - Ketuk nama Anda.
3 - Pilih Berbagi Keluarga.
4 - Pilih ""Siapkan Keluarga Anda"".
Ikuti petunjuk di layar untuk mengatur keluarga Anda dan mengundang anggota."	"Per configurare Family Sharing:
1 - Apri Impostazioni.
2 - Tocca il tuo nome.
3 - Seleziona Condivisione familiare.
4 - Scegli ""Configura la tua famiglia"".
Segui le istruzioni sullo schermo per configurare la tua famiglia e invitare i membri."	"Family Sharingを設定するには:
1 - 設定を開きます。
2 - 自分の名前をタップします。
3 - ファミリー共有を選択します。
4 - 「ファミリーを設定」を選択します。
画面の指示に従って家族を設定し、メンバーを招待してください。"	"Family Sharing 설정 방법:
1 - 설정을 엽니다.
2 - 이름을 탭합니다.
3 - 가족 공유를 선택합니다.
4 - ""가족 설정""을 선택합니다.
화면의 지침에 따라 가족을 설정하고 구성원을 초대합니다."	"Lai iestatītu Family Sharing:
1 - Atveriet Iestatījumi.
2 - Pieskarieties savam vārdam.
3 - Izvēlieties Family Sharing.
4 - Izvēlieties ""Iestatīt savu ģimeni"".
Sekojiet ekrānā redzamajiem norādījumiem, lai iestatītu ģimeni un uzaicinātu locekļus."	"Norėdami nustatyti Family Sharing:
1 - Atidarykite Nustatymai.
2 - Paspauskite savo vardą.
3 - Pasirinkite Family Sharing.
4 - Pasirinkite ""Nustatyti savo šeimą"".
Vadovaukitės ekrane pateiktais nurodymais, kad nustatytumėte šeimą ir pakviestumėte narius."	"Untuk menetapkan Family Sharing:
1 - Buka Tetapan.
2 - Ketik nama anda.
3 - Pilih Perkongsian Keluarga.
4 - Pilih ""Tetapkan Keluarga Anda"".
Ikuti arahan pada skrin untuk menetapkan keluarga anda dan menjemput ahli."	"For å sette opp Family Sharing:
1 - Åpne Innstillinger.
2 - Trykk på navnet ditt.
3 - Velg Familiedeling.
4 - Velg ""Sett opp familien din"".
Følg instruksjonene på skjermen for å sette opp familien din og invitere medlemmer."	"Aby skonfigurować Family Sharing:
1 - Otwórz Ustawienia.
2 - Dotknij swojego imienia.
3 - Wybierz Udostępnianie rodzinne.
4 - Wybierz ""Skonfiguruj swoją rodzinę"".
Postępuj zgodnie z instrukcjami wyświetlanymi na ekranie, aby skonfigurować rodzinę i zaprosić członków."	"Para configurar o Family Sharing:
1 - Abra Configurações.
2 - Toque no seu nome.
3 - Selecione Compartilhamento Familiar.
4 - Escolha ""Configurar sua família"".
Siga as instruções na tela para configurar sua família e convidar membros."	"Pentru a configura Family Sharing:
1 - Deschideți Setări.
2 - Atingeți numele dvs.
3 - Selectați Partajare familială.
4 - Alegeți ""Configurați-vă familia"".
Urmați instrucțiunile de pe ecran pentru a vă configura familia și a invita membri."	"Da biste podesili Family Sharing:
1 - Otvorite Podešavanja.
2 - Dodirnite svoje ime.
3 - Izaberite Porodično deljenje.
4 - Izaberite ""Podesite svoju porodicu"".
Pratite uputstva na ekranu kako biste podesili porodicu i pozvali članove."	"要设置 Family Sharing：
1 - 打开“设置”。
2 - 点击您的名字。
3 - 选择“家人共享”。
4 - 选择“设置您的家庭”。
按照屏幕上的说明设置家庭并邀请成员。"	"Na nastavenie Family Sharing:
1 - Otvorte Nastavenia.
2 - Klepnite na svoje meno.
3 - Vyberte Rodinné zdieľanie.
4 - Vyberte ""Nastaviť svoju rodinu"".
Postupujte podľa pokynov na obrazovke na nastavenie rodiny a pozvanie členov."	"Za nastavitev Family Sharing:
1 - Odprite Nastavitve.
2 - Tapnite svoje ime.
3 - Izberite Družinsko skupno rabo.
4 - Izberite ""Nastavite svojo družino"".
Sledite navodilom na zaslonu za nastavitev družine in povabite člane."	"Para configurar Family Sharing:
1 - Abre Configuración.
2 - Toca tu nombre.
3 - Selecciona Compartir en Familia.
4 - Elige ""Configura tu familia"".
Sigue las instrucciones en pantalla para configurar tu familia e invitar a miembros."	"För att ställa in Family Sharing:
1 - Öppna Inställningar.
2 - Tryck på ditt namn.
3 - Välj Familjedelning.
4 - Välj ""Ställ in din familj"".
Följ instruktionerna på skärmen för att ställa in din familj och bjuda in medlemmar."	"Para i-setup ang Family Sharing:
1 - Buksan ang Settings.
2 - I-tap ang iyong pangalan.
3 - Piliin ang Family Sharing.
4 - Piliin ang ""I-set up ang Iyong Pamilya"".
Sundin ang mga instruksyon sa screen para i-set up ang iyong pamilya at imbitahin ang mga miyembro."	"ในการตั้งค่า Family Sharing:
1 - เปิดการตั้งค่า
2 - แตะที่ชื่อของคุณ
3 - เลือก Family Sharing
4 - เลือก ""ตั้งค่าครอบครัวของคุณ""
ทำตามคำแนะนำบนหน้าจอเพื่อตั้งค่าครอบครัวและเชิญสมาชิก."	"Family Sharing’i ayarlamak için:
1 - Ayarları açın.
2 - İsminize dokunun.
3 - Aile Paylaşımı’nı seçin.
4 - ""Ailenizi Ayarlayın"" seçeneğini seçin.
Ailenizi ayarlamak ve üyeleri davet etmek için ekrandaki talimatları izleyin."	"Щоб налаштувати Family Sharing:
1 - Відкрийте Налаштування.
2 - Натисніть на своє ім’я.
3 - Оберіть Сімейний доступ.
4 - Виберіть ""Налаштувати вашу сім’ю"".
Дотримуйтесь інструкцій на екрані, щоб налаштувати сім’ю та запросити учасників."	"Để thiết lập Family Sharing:
1 - Mở Cài đặt.
2 - Nhấn vào tên của bạn.
3 - Chọn Family Sharing.
4 - Chọn ""Thiết lập gia đình của bạn"".
Làm theo hướng dẫn trên màn hình để thiết lập gia đình và mời thành viên."
for_parents_FAQ_4_question	49	How do I get a refund for an accidental purchase?	Как я могу вернуть деньги за случайную покупку?	كيف يمكنني استرداد الأموال مقابل عملية شراء خاطئة؟	Как мога да получа възстановяване за случайна покупка?	Com puc obtenir un reemborsament per una compra accidental?	Kako mogu dobiti povrat novca za slučajnu kupnju?	Jak mohu získat vrácení peněz za náhodný nákup?	Hvordan får jeg refunderet et utilsigtet køb?	Hoe kan ik een terugbetaling krijgen voor een per ongeluk gemaakte aankoop?	Kuidas ma saan juhusliku ostu eest raha tagasi?	Kuinka saan hyvityksen vahingossa tehdystä ostosta?	Comment puis-je obtenir un remboursement pour un achat accidentel ?	Wie bekomme ich eine Rückerstattung für einen versehentlichen Kauf?	Πώς μπορώ να λάβω επιστροφή χρημάτων για τυχαία αγορά;	כיצד ניתן לקבל החזר על רכישה שנעשתה בטעות?	गलती से की गई खरीदारी के लिए मैं रिफंड कैसे प्राप्त कर सकता हूँ?	Hogyan kérhetek visszatérítést véletlen vásárlás esetén?	Bagaimana cara mendapatkan pengembalian dana untuk pembelian yang tidak disengaja?	Come posso ottenere un rimborso per un acquisto effettuato per errore?	誤って購入した場合、返金を受けるにはどうすればよいですか？	실수로 구매한 항목에 대해 환불을 받으려면 어떻게 해야 하나요?	Kā es varu saņemt kompensāciju par nejaušu pirkumu?	Kaip gauti pinigų grąžinimą už atsitiktinį pirkimą?	Bagaimana saya boleh mendapatkan bayaran balik untuk pembelian yang tidak disengajakan?	Hvordan kan jeg få refusjon for et utilsiktet kjøp?	Jak mogę uzyskać zwrot pieniędzy za przypadkowy zakup?	Como posso obter um reembolso para uma compra acidental?	Cum pot obține o rambursare pentru o achiziție accidentală?	Како могу да добијем повраћај новца за случајну куповину?	我如何获得意外购买的退款?	Ako môžem získať vrátenie peňazí za náhodný nákup?	Kako lahko dobim povračilo za nenameren nakup?	¿Cómo puedo obtener un reembolso por una compra accidental?	Hur får jag en återbetalning för ett oavsiktligt köp?	Paano ako makakakuha ng refund para sa isang aksidenteng pagbili?	ฉันจะขอคืนเงินสำหรับการซื้อโดยไม่ตั้งใจได้อย่างไร?	Yanlışlıkla yapılan bİr satın alma İçİn nasıl para İadesİ alabİlİrİm?	Як отримати повернення коштів за випадкову покупку?	Làm thế nào để tôi được hoàn tiền cho một giao dịch mua vô tình?
for_parents_FAQ_4_answer	50	We have no authority over any payment-related procedures. Please, refer to the store's refund policy and contact the App Store support team for payment-related issues or refund requests.	Мы не имеем полномочий в вопросах, связанных с оплатой. Пожалуйста, обратитесь к политике возврата средств магазина и свяжитесь с поддержкой App Store для решения вопросов, связанных с оплатой, или для запросов на возврат.	ليس لدينا أي سلطة على الإجراءات المتعلقة بالدفع. يرجى الرجوع إلى سياسة استرداد الأموال الخاصة بالمتجر والتواصل مع فريق دعم App Store للمسائل المتعلقة بالدفع أو طلبات الاسترداد.	Нямаме правомощия по отношение на процедурите, свързани с плащания. Моля, запознайте се с политиката за възстановяване на средства на магазина и се свържете с поддръжката на App Store за въпроси, свързани с плащания или заявки за възстановяване.	No tenim autoritat sobre els procediments relacionats amb els pagaments. Consulta la política de reemborsament de la botiga i contacta amb el servei d'assistència de l'App Store per a problemes de pagament o sol·licituds de reemborsament.	Nemamo ovlasti nad postupcima vezanim za plaćanje. Molimo vas da pogledate politiku povrata trgovine i kontaktirate tim za podršku App Storea za pitanja vezana za plaćanje ili zahtjeve za povrat.	Nemáme žádnou pravomoc nad platebními procedurami. Obraťte se prosím na zásady vrácení peněz obchodu a kontaktujte tým podpory App Store ohledně platebních problémů nebo žádostí o vrácení peněz.	Vi har ingen myndighed over betalinger. Se venligst butikkens refusionspolitik og kontakt App Stores supportteam for betalingsproblemer eller refusionsanmodninger.	Wij hebben geen controle over betaling gerelateerde procedures. Raadpleeg het restitutiebeleid van de winkel en neem contact op met het supportteam van de App Store voor betalingsproblemen of restitutieverzoeken.	Meil pole pädevust maksetega seotud protseduuride üle. Palun tutvuge poe tagasimaksepoliitikaga ja võtke makseküsimuste või tagasimaksetaotluste osas ühendust App Store'i tugitiimiga.	Meillä ei ole valtuuksia maksuihin liittyviin toimiin. Tarkista kaupan palautuskäytäntö ja ota yhteyttä App Storen tukitiimiin maksuihin liittyvissä kysymyksissä tai hyvityspyyntöjen osalta.	Nous n'avons aucune autorité sur les procédures liées aux paiements. Veuillez consulter la politique de remboursement de la boutique et contacter l'équipe de support de l'App Store pour tout problème lié au paiement ou demande de remboursement.	Wir haben keine Kontrolle über zahlungsbezogene Verfahren. Bitte beachten Sie die Rückerstattungsrichtlinien des Stores und kontaktieren Sie das Support-Team des App Stores bei Fragen zu Zahlungen oder Rückerstattungen.	Δεν έχουμε αρμοδιότητα σχετικά με διαδικασίες πληρωμών. Ανατρέξτε στην πολιτική επιστροφής χρημάτων του καταστήματος και επικοινωνήστε με την υποστήριξη του App Store για ζητήματα πληρωμών ή αιτήματα επιστροφής.	אין לנו סמכות על נהלי תשלום. אנא עיין במדיניות ההחזרים של החנות ופנה לצוות התמיכה של חנות האפליקציות בנוגע לבעיות תשלום או בקשות להחזר.	भुगतान संबंधी प्रक्रियाओं पर हमारा कोई अधिकार नहीं है। कृपया स्टोर की रिफंड नीति देखें और भुगतान संबंधी समस्याओं या रिफंड अनुरोधों के लिए App Store सहायता टीम से संपर्क करें।	Nincs jogosultságunk a fizetésekkel kapcsolatos eljárások felett. Kérjük, tekintse meg az áruház visszatérítési szabályzatát, és forduljon az App Store ügyfélszolgálatához fizetési problémák vagy visszatérítési kérelmek esetén.	Kami tidak memiliki otoritas atas prosedur pembayaran. Silakan merujuk ke kebijakan pengembalian dana toko dan hubungi tim dukungan App Store untuk masalah pembayaran atau permintaan pengembalian dana.	Non abbiamo autorità sulle procedure relative ai pagamenti. Si prega di consultare la politica di rimborso del negozio e di contattare il team di supporto dell'App Store per problemi di pagamento o richieste di rimborso.	支払いに関する手続きについては権限がありません。ストアの返金ポリシーを確認し、支払い関連の問題や返金のリクエストについてはApp Storeサポートチームにお問い合わせください。	결제 관련 절차에 대해 저희는 관여할 권한이 없습니다. 스토어 환불 정책을 참조하시고, 결제 문제 또는 환불 요청에 대해서는 App Store 지원팀에 문의하십시오.	Mums nav tiesību uz maksājumu procedūrām. Lūdzu, skatiet veikala atmaksas politiku un sazinieties ar App Store atbalsta komandu, lai risinātu maksājumu problēmas vai iesniegtu atmaksas pieprasījumus.	Mes neturime galios spręsti mokėjimų procedūrų. Prašome susipažinti su parduotuvės pinigų grąžinimo politika ir susisiekti su App Store palaikymo komanda dėl mokėjimų klausimų ar prašymų grąžinti pinigus.	Kami tidak mempunyai kuasa ke atas prosedur berkaitan pembayaran. Sila rujuk dasar pemulangan wang kedai dan hubungi pasukan sokongan App Store untuk isu pembayaran atau permintaan pemulangan wang.	Vi har ingen myndighet over betalingsrelaterte prosedyrer. Vennligst se butikkens refusjonspolicy og kontakt App Store-supportteamet for betalingsrelaterte problemer eller refusjonsforespørsler.	Nie mamy żadnych uprawnień w zakresie procedur związanych z płatnościami. Zapoznaj się z polityką zwrotów sklepu i skontaktuj się z zespołem wsparcia App Store w sprawach dotyczących płatności lub wniosków o zwrot pieniędzy.	Não temos autoridade sobre os procedimentos relacionados a pagamentos. Por favor, consulte a política de reembolso da loja e entre em contato com a equipe de suporte da App Store para problemas relacionados a pagamentos ou solicitações de reembolso.	Nu avem autoritate asupra procedurilor legate de plăți. Vă rugăm să consultați politica de rambursare a magazinului și să contactați echipa de asistență a App Store pentru probleme legate de plăți sau solicitări de rambursare.	Nemamo ovlašćenja nad procedurama vezanim za plaćanje. Molimo vas da pogledate politiku povraćaja prodavnice i kontaktirate tim za podršku App Store-a za probleme vezane za plaćanje ili zahteve za povraćaj novca.	我们无权处理与付款相关的程序。请参阅商店的退款政策，并联系 App Store 支持团队以解决付款相关问题或退款请求。	Nemáme žiadnu právomoc nad postupmi súvisiacimi s platbami. Pozrite si zásady vrátenia peňazí obchodu a kontaktujte tím podpory App Store v prípade problémov s platbami alebo žiadostí o vrátenie peňazí.	Nimamo pooblastil za postopke, povezane s plačili. Preverite politiko vračil trgovine in se obrnite na podporo za App Store za težave, povezane s plačili, ali zahteve za vračilo denarja.	No tenemos autoridad sobre los procedimientos relacionados con pagos. Por favor, consulta la política de reembolsos de la tienda y contacta al equipo de soporte de App Store para problemas de pago o solicitudes de reembolso.	Vi har ingen kontroll över betalningsrelaterade procedurer. Vänligen se butikens återbetalningspolicy och kontakta App Stores supportteam för betalningsfrågor eller återbetalningsförfrågningar.	Wala kaming kapangyarihan sa mga proseso na may kaugnayan sa pagbabayad. Pakibasa ang refund policy ng tindahan at makipag-ugnayan sa App Store support team para sa mga isyu sa pagbabayad o refund requests.	เราไม่มีอำนาจเหนือขั้นตอนที่เกี่ยวข้องกับการชำระเงิน โปรดดูนโยบายการคืนเงินของร้านค้าและติดต่อทีมสนับสนุนของ App Store สำหรับปัญหาเกี่ยวกับการชำระเงินหรือคำขอคืนเงิน.	Ödeme ile ilgili işlemler üzerinde herhangi bir yetkimiz yoktur. Lütfen mağazanın iade politikasını inceleyin ve ödeme sorunları veya iade talepleri için App Store destek ekibiyle iletişime geçin.	Ми не маємо повноважень щодо процедур, пов’язаних із оплатою. Будь ласка, ознайомтеся з політикою повернення коштів магазину та зв’яжіться з командою підтримки App Store з питань оплати або запитів на повернення коштів.	Chúng tôi không có thẩm quyền đối với các quy trình liên quan đến thanh toán. Vui lòng tham khảo chính sách hoàn tiền của cửa hàng và liên hệ với đội ngũ hỗ trợ App Store để được hỗ trợ về các vấn đề thanh toán hoặc yêu cầu hoàn tiền.
for_parents_FAQ_5_question	51	How can I cancel my subscription?	Как я могу отменить подписку?	كيف يمكنني إلغاء اشتراكي؟	Как мога да анулирам абонамента си?	Com puc cancel·lar la meva subscripció?	Kako mogu otkazati pretplatu?	Jak mohu zrušit své předplatné?	Hvordan kan jeg annullere mit abonnement?	Hoe kan ik mijn abonnement opzeggen?	Kuidas ma saan oma tellimuse tühistada?	Kuinka voin peruuttaa tilaukseni?	Comment puis-je annuler mon abonnement ?	Wie kann ich mein Abonnement kündigen?	Πώς μπορώ να ακυρώσω τη συνδρομή μου;	כיצד אוכל לבטל את המנוי שלי?	मैं अपनी सदस्यता कैसे रद्द कर सकता हूं?	Hogyan mondhatom le az előfizetésemet?	Bagaimana cara membatalkan langganan saya?	Come posso annullare il mio abbonamento?	サブスクリプションをキャンセルするには？	내 구독을 취소하려면 어떻게 하나요?	Kā es varu atcelt savu abonementu?	Kaip galiu atšaukti savo prenumeratą?	Bagaimana saya boleh membatalkan langganan saya?	Hvordan kan jeg kansellere abonnementet mitt?	Jak mogę anulować subskrypcję?	Como posso cancelar minha assinatura?	Cum îmi pot anula abonamentul?	Kako mogu otkazati svoju pretplatu?	我如何取消我的订阅?	Ako môžem zrušiť svoje predplatné?	Kako lahko prekličem svojo naročnino?	¿Cómo puedo cancelar mi suscripción?	Hur kan jag avbryta min prenumeration?	Paano ko makakansela ang aking subscription?	ฉันจะยกเลิกการสมัครได้อย่างไร?	Aboneliğimi nasıl iptal edebilirim?	Як я можу скасувати свою підписку?	Làm cách nào để hủy đăng ký của tôi?
for_parents_FAQ_5_answer	52	"In this application, there is no subscription option. The 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' app offers a one-time purchase to unlock all content and tools for lifetime access. For our other apps that include subscription plans, please follow these instructions to cancel a subscription:
1. Open Settings app.
2. Tap your name, then Subscriptions.
3. Select the subscription to manage.
4. Choose a new option or tap Cancel Subscription.
Follow the instructions."	"В этом приложении нет подписки. Приложение ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" предлагает одноразовую покупку для разблокировки всего контента и инструментов с пожизненным доступом. Для других наших приложений с подписками, выполните следующие действия для отмены подписки:
1 - Откройте приложение Настройки.
2 - Нажмите на своё имя, затем на Подписки.
3 - Выберите подписку для управления.
4 - Выберите новый вариант или нажмите Отменить подписку.
Следуйте инструкциям."	"في هذا التطبيق، لا يوجد خيار اشتراك. يقدم تطبيق ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" عملية شراء لمرة واحدة لفتح جميع المحتويات والأدوات للوصول مدى الحياة. بالنسبة لتطبيقاتنا الأخرى التي تشمل خطط اشتراك، يرجى اتباع التعليمات التالية لإلغاء الاشتراك:
1 - افتح تطبيق الإعدادات.
2 - اضغط على اسمك، ثم الاشتراكات.
3 - حدد الاشتراك لإدارته.
4 - اختر خيارًا جديدًا أو اضغط على إلغاء الاشتراك.
اتبع التعليمات."	"В това приложение няма опция за абонамент. Приложението ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" предлага еднократна покупка за отключване на цялото съдържание и инструменти с доживотен достъп. За други наши приложения с абонаментни планове, моля, следвайте тези инструкции, за да отмените абонамент:
1 - Отворете приложението Настройки.
2 - Докоснете името си, след това Абонаменти.
3 - Изберете абонамента за управление.
4 - Изберете нова опция или натиснете Отмени абонамента.
Следвайте инструкциите."	"En aquesta aplicació no hi ha opció de subscripció. L'aplicació ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" ofereix una compra única per desbloquejar tot el contingut i les eines amb accés de per vida. Per a altres aplicacions nostres que inclouen plans de subscripció, segueix aquestes instruccions per cancel·lar una subscripció:
1 - Obre l'aplicació Configuració.
2 - Toca el teu nom i després Subscripcions.
3 - Selecciona la subscripció per gestionar.
4 - Tria una nova opció o toca Cancel·lar subscripció.
Segueix les instruccions."	"U ovoj aplikaciji ne postoji opcija pretplate. Aplikacija ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" nudi jednokratnu kupnju za otključavanje cjelokupnog sadržaja i alata za doživotni pristup. Za ostale naše aplikacije koje uključuju planove pretplate, slijedite ove upute za otkazivanje pretplate:
1 - Otvorite aplikaciju Postavke.
2 - Dodirnite svoje ime, zatim Pretplate.
3 - Odaberite pretplatu za upravljanje.
4 - Odaberite novu opciju ili dodirnite Otkaži pretplatu.
Slijedite upute."	"V této aplikaci není možnost předplatného. Aplikace ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" nabízí jednorázový nákup k odemčení veškerého obsahu a nástrojů s celoživotním přístupem. U našich dalších aplikací, které zahrnují předplatné, postupujte podle těchto pokynů pro zrušení předplatného:
1 - Otevřete aplikaci Nastavení.
2 - Klepněte na své jméno, poté Předplatné.
3 - Vyberte předplatné k úpravě.
4 - Vyberte novou možnost nebo klepněte na Zrušit předplatné.
Postupujte podle pokynů."	"I denne app er der ingen abonnementsmulighed. Appen ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" tilbyder et engangskøb for at låse alt indhold og værktøjer op med livstidsadgang. For vores andre apps, der inkluderer abonnementer, skal du følge disse instruktioner for at annullere et abonnement:
1 - Åbn Indstillinger.
2 - Tryk på dit navn og derefter Abonnementer.
3 - Vælg abonnementet for at administrere det.
4 - Vælg en ny mulighed, eller tryk på Annuller abonnement.
Følg instruktionerne."	"In deze app is er geen abonnementsoptie. De app ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" biedt een eenmalige aankoop om alle inhoud en tools te ontgrendelen voor levenslange toegang. Voor onze andere apps met abonnementen volg je deze instructies om een abonnement op te zeggen:
1 - Open de Instellingen-app.
2 - Tik op je naam en vervolgens op Abonnementen.
3 - Selecteer het abonnement dat je wilt beheren.
4 - Kies een nieuwe optie of tik op Abonnement annuleren.
Volg de instructies."	"Selles rakenduses pole tellimisvõimalust. ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" rakendus pakub ühekordset ostu, et avada kogu sisu ja tööriistad eluaegseks kasutamiseks. Meie teiste rakenduste puhul, millel on tellimisplaanid, järgige neid juhiseid tellimuse tühistamiseks:
1 - Ava rakendus Seaded.
2 - Puuduta oma nime, seejärel Tellimused.
3 - Vali hallatav tellimus.
4 - Vali uus võimalus või puuduta Tellimusest loobu.
Järgi juhiseid."	"Tässä sovelluksessa ei ole tilausvaihtoehtoa. ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" -sovellus tarjoaa kertamaksun, jolla saa käyttöoikeuden kaikkeen sisältöön ja työkaluihin pysyvästi. Muissa sovelluksissamme, jotka sisältävät tilausvaihtoehtoja, toimi näin tilauksen perumiseksi:
1 - Avaa Asetukset-sovellus.
2 - Napauta nimeäsi ja sitten Tilaukset.
3 - Valitse hallittava tilaus.
4 - Valitse uusi vaihtoehto tai napauta Peruuta tilaus.
Noudata ohjeita."	"Dans cette application, il n'y a pas d'option d'abonnement. L'application ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" propose un achat unique pour débloquer tout le contenu et les outils avec un accès à vie. Pour nos autres applications avec des abonnements, veuillez suivre ces instructions pour annuler un abonnement :
1 - Ouvrez l'application Réglages.
2 - Appuyez sur votre nom, puis sur Abonnements.
3 - Sélectionnez l'abonnement à gérer.
4 - Choisissez une nouvelle option ou appuyez sur Annuler l'abonnement.
Suivez les instructions."	"In dieser App gibt es keine Abonnementoption. Die App ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" bietet einen einmaligen Kauf, um alle Inhalte und Werkzeuge für den lebenslangen Zugriff freizuschalten. Für unsere anderen Apps mit Abonnementplänen folgen Sie bitte diesen Anweisungen, um ein Abonnement zu kündigen:
1 - Öffnen Sie die App Einstellungen.
2 - Tippen Sie auf Ihren Namen und dann auf Abonnements.
3 - Wählen Sie das zu verwaltende Abonnement aus.
4 - Wählen Sie eine neue Option oder tippen Sie auf Abonnement kündigen.
Befolgen Sie die Anweisungen."	"Στην εφαρμογή αυτή δεν υπάρχει επιλογή συνδρομής. Η εφαρμογή ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" προσφέρει εφάπαξ αγορά για πρόσβαση σε όλο το περιεχόμενο και τα εργαλεία εφ' όρου ζωής. Για άλλες εφαρμογές μας που περιλαμβάνουν σχέδια συνδρομών, ακολουθήστε τις εξής οδηγίες για ακύρωση συνδρομής:
1 - Ανοίξτε την εφαρμογή Ρυθμίσεις.
2 - Πατήστε στο όνομά σας και στη συνέχεια Συνδρομές.
3 - Επιλέξτε τη συνδρομή που θέλετε να διαχειριστείτε.
4 - Επιλέξτε μια νέα επιλογή ή πατήστε Ακύρωση Συνδρομής.
Ακολουθήστε τις οδηγίες."	"באפליקציה זו אין אפשרות למנוי. האפליקציה ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" מציעה רכישה חד פעמית לפתיחת כל התוכן והכלים לשימוש לכל החיים. לאפליקציות אחרות שלנו הכוללות תוכניות מנוי, פעל לפי ההוראות הבאות לביטול מנוי:
1 - פתח את אפליקציית ההגדרות.
2 - הקש על שמך ואז על מנויים.
3 - בחר את המנוי שברצונך לנהל.
4 - בחר באפשרות חדשה או הקש על בטל מנוי.
עקוב אחר ההוראות."	"इस एप्लिकेशन में कोई सब्सक्रिप्शन विकल्प नहीं है। ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" ऐप सभी सामग्री और उपकरणों को आजीवन एक्सेस के लिए अनलॉक करने के लिए एक बार की खरीदारी प्रदान करता है। अन्य ऐप्स जिनमें सब्सक्रिप्शन योजनाएँ शामिल हैं, उनके लिए सब्सक्रिप्शन रद्द करने के लिए निम्नलिखित निर्देशों का पालन करें:
1 - सेटिंग्स ऐप खोलें।
2 - अपने नाम पर टैप करें, फिर सब्सक्रिप्शन पर।
3 - प्रबंधित करने के लिए सब्सक्रिप्शन चुनें।
4 - एक नया विकल्प चुनें या सब्सक्रिप्शन रद्द करें पर टैप करें।
निर्देशों का पालन करें।"	"Ebben az alkalmazásban nincs előfizetési lehetőség. A ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" alkalmazás egyszeri vásárlást kínál az összes tartalom és eszköz élettartamra történő feloldásához. Más alkalmazásainkban, amelyek előfizetési terveket tartalmaznak, kövesse az alábbi utasításokat az előfizetés lemondásához:
1 - Nyissa meg a Beállítások alkalmazást.
2 - Érintse meg a nevét, majd az Előfizetések lehetőséget.
3 - Válassza ki a kezelni kívánt előfizetést.
4 - Válasszon új opciót, vagy érintse meg az Előfizetés lemondása lehetőséget.
Kövesse az utasításokat."	"Dalam aplikasi ini, tidak ada opsi langganan. Aplikasi ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" menawarkan pembelian satu kali untuk membuka semua konten dan alat dengan akses seumur hidup. Untuk aplikasi lain kami yang menyertakan rencana berlangganan, ikuti petunjuk ini untuk membatalkan langganan:
1 - Buka aplikasi Pengaturan.
2 - Ketuk nama Anda, lalu Langganan.
3 - Pilih langganan yang ingin Anda kelola.
4 - Pilih opsi baru atau ketuk Batalkan Langganan.
Ikuti petunjuknya."	"In questa applicazione non c'è un'opzione di abbonamento. L'app ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" offre un acquisto unico per sbloccare tutti i contenuti e gli strumenti con accesso a vita. Per le altre nostre app che includono piani di abbonamento, segui queste istruzioni per annullare un abbonamento:
1 - Apri l'app Impostazioni.
2 - Tocca il tuo nome, quindi Abbonamenti.
3 - Seleziona l'abbonamento da gestire.
4 - Scegli una nuova opzione o tocca Annulla abbonamento.
Segui le istruzioni."	"このアプリにはサブスクリプションオプションはありません。「Lalafun Coloring For Kids」アプリは、全てのコンテンツとツールを一括購入で生涯アクセス可能にします。他のサブスクリプションプランを含むアプリの場合、以下の手順に従ってサブスクリプションをキャンセルしてください：
1 - 設定アプリを開きます。
2 - 自分の名前をタップし、サブスクリプションを選択します。
3 - 管理するサブスクリプションを選択します。
4 - 新しいオプションを選択するか、「サブスクリプションをキャンセル」をタップします。
指示に従ってください。"	"이 앱에는 구독 옵션이 없습니다. ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" 앱은 모든 콘텐츠와 도구를 평생 접근할 수 있도록 단일 구매 옵션을 제공합니다. 구독 플랜이 포함된 다른 앱의 경우 구독을 취소하려면 다음 지침을 따르세요:
1 - 설정 앱을 엽니다.
2 - 이름을 탭하고, 구독을 선택합니다.
3 - 관리하려는 구독을 선택합니다.
4 - 새로운 옵션을 선택하거나 구독 취소를 탭합니다.
지침을 따르세요."	"Šajā lietotnē nav abonēšanas opcijas. Lietotne ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" piedāvā vienreizēju pirkumu, lai atbloķētu visu saturu un rīkus ar mūža piekļuvi. Citu mūsu lietotņu gadījumā, kas ietver abonēšanas plānus, lūdzu, sekojiet šīm instrukcijām, lai atceltu abonementu:
1 - Atveriet lietotni Iestatījumi.
2 - Pieskarieties savam vārdam, pēc tam Abonementi.
3 - Izvēlieties abonementu, kuru vēlaties pārvaldīt.
4 - Izvēlieties jaunu opciju vai pieskarieties Atcelt abonementu.
Sekojiet norādījumiem."	"Šioje programėlėje nėra prenumeratos pasirinkimo. Programėlė ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" siūlo vienkartinį pirkimą, leidžiantį atrakinti visą turinį ir įrankius visam gyvenimui. Kitoms mūsų programėlėms, kuriose yra prenumeratos planų, atšaukti prenumeratą atlikite šiuos veiksmus:
1 - Atidarykite programėlę Nustatymai.
2 - Paspauskite savo vardą, tada Prenumeratos.
3 - Pasirinkite prenumeratą, kurią norite valdyti.
4 - Pasirinkite naują parinktį arba paspauskite Atšaukti prenumeratą.
Vadovaukitės nurodymais."	"Dalam aplikasi ini, tiada pilihan langganan. Aplikasi ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" menawarkan pembelian satu kali untuk membuka semua kandungan dan alat untuk akses sepanjang hayat. Untuk aplikasi kami yang lain yang mempunyai rancangan langganan, ikuti arahan berikut untuk membatalkan langganan:
1 - Buka aplikasi Tetapan.
2 - Ketik nama anda, kemudian Langganan.
3 - Pilih langganan untuk diurus.
4 - Pilih pilihan baru atau ketik Batalkan Langganan.
Ikuti arahan."	"I denne appen er det ingen abonnementsmulighet. Appen ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" tilbyr et engangskjøp for å låse opp alt innhold og alle verktøy for livstidsbruk. For andre apper vi har som inkluderer abonnementer, følg disse instruksjonene for å kansellere et abonnement:
1 - Åpne Innstillinger-appen.
2 - Trykk på navnet ditt, deretter Abonnementer.
3 - Velg abonnementet du vil administrere.
4 - Velg et nytt alternativ eller trykk på Avslutt abonnement.
Følg instruksjonene."	"W tej aplikacji nie ma opcji subskrypcji. Aplikacja ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" oferuje jednorazowy zakup, aby odblokować całą zawartość i narzędzia z dożywotnim dostępem. W przypadku innych naszych aplikacji, które obejmują plany subskrypcji, wykonaj poniższe kroki, aby anulować subskrypcję:
1 - Otwórz aplikację Ustawienia.
2 - Dotknij swojego imienia, a następnie Subskrypcje.
3 - Wybierz subskrypcję, którą chcesz zarządzać.
4 - Wybierz nową opcję lub dotknij Anuluj subskrypcję.
Postępuj zgodnie z instrukcjami."	"Neste aplicativo, não há opção de assinatura. O aplicativo ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" oferece uma compra única para desbloquear todo o conteúdo e ferramentas com acesso vitalício. Para nossos outros aplicativos que incluem planos de assinatura, siga estas instruções para cancelar uma assinatura:
1 - Abra o aplicativo Configurações.
2 - Toque no seu nome, depois em Assinaturas.
3 - Selecione a assinatura para gerenciar.
4 - Escolha uma nova opção ou toque em Cancelar Assinatura.
Siga as instruções."	"În această aplicație, nu există opțiune de abonament. Aplicația ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" oferă o achiziție unică pentru a debloca tot conținutul și uneltele pentru acces pe viață. Pentru celelalte aplicații ale noastre care includ planuri de abonament, urmați aceste instrucțiuni pentru a anula un abonament:
1 - Deschideți aplicația Setări.
2 - Atingeți numele dvs., apoi Abonamente.
3 - Selectați abonamentul de gestionat.
4 - Alegeți o nouă opțiune sau atingeți Anulați abonamentul.
Urmați instrucțiunile."	"U ovoj aplikaciji ne postoji opcija pretplate. Aplikacija ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" nudi jednokratnu kupovinu za otključavanje celokupnog sadržaja i alata sa doživotnim pristupom. Za druge naše aplikacije koje uključuju planove pretplate, pratite ova uputstva za otkazivanje pretplate:
1 - Otvorite aplikaciju Podešavanja.
2 - Dodirnite svoje ime, a zatim Pretplate.
3 - Izaberite pretplatu koju želite da upravljate.
4 - Izaberite novu opciju ili dodirnite Otkaži pretplatu.
Pratite uputstva."	"此应用程序没有订阅选项。""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" 应用提供一次性购买，以解锁所有内容和工具，终身访问。对于包含订阅计划的其他应用程序，请按照以下说明取消订阅：
1 - 打开“设置”应用。
2 - 点击您的名字，然后点击“订阅”。
3 - 选择要管理的订阅。
4 - 选择新选项或点击“取消订阅”。
按照说明操作。"	"V tejto aplikácii nie je možnosť predplatného. Aplikácia ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" ponúka jednorazový nákup na odomknutie všetkého obsahu a nástrojov na doživotný prístup. Pre naše ostatné aplikácie, ktoré zahŕňajú predplatné plány, postupujte podľa týchto pokynov na zrušenie predplatného:
1 - Otvorte aplikáciu Nastavenia.
2 - Klepnite na svoje meno a potom na Predplatné.
3 - Vyberte predplatné na správu.
4 - Vyberte novú možnosť alebo klepnite na Zrušiť predplatné.
Postupujte podľa pokynov."	"V tej aplikaciji ni možnosti naročnine. Aplikacija ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" ponuja enkratni nakup za odklepanje vsebine in orodij z doživljenjskim dostopom. Za druge aplikacije z naročniškimi načrti sledite tem navodilom za preklic naročnine:
1 - Odprite aplikacijo Nastavitve.
2 - Tapnite svoje ime in nato Naročnine.
3 - Izberite naročnino za upravljanje.
4 - Izberite novo možnost ali tapnite Prekliči naročnino.
Sledite navodilom."	"En esta aplicación no hay opción de suscripción. La aplicación ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" ofrece una compra única para desbloquear todo el contenido y las herramientas con acceso de por vida. Para nuestras otras aplicaciones que incluyen planes de suscripción, sigue estas instrucciones para cancelar una suscripción:
1 - Abre la aplicación Configuración.
2 - Toca tu nombre y luego Suscripciones.
3 - Selecciona la suscripción que deseas gestionar.
4 - Elige una nueva opción o toca Cancelar Suscripción.
Sigue las instrucciones."	"I denna app finns det inget abonnemangsalternativ. Appen ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" erbjuder ett engångsköp för att låsa upp allt innehåll och alla verktyg med livstidsåtkomst. För våra andra appar som inkluderar abonnemangsplaner, följ dessa instruktioner för att säga upp ett abonnemang:
1 - Öppna Inställningar-appen.
2 - Tryck på ditt namn och sedan Abonnemang.
3 - Välj det abonnemang du vill hantera.
4 - Välj ett nytt alternativ eller tryck på Avsluta abonnemang.
Följ instruktionerna."	"Sa app na ito, walang opsyon para sa subscription. Ang ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" app ay nag-aalok ng isang beses na pagbili para ma-unlock ang lahat ng content at tools na may lifetime access. Para sa iba pa naming apps na may kasamang subscription plans, sundin ang mga instruksyon na ito para kanselahin ang subscription:
1 - Buksan ang Settings app.
2 - I-tap ang iyong pangalan, pagkatapos ay Subscriptions.
3 - Piliin ang subscription na gusto mong i-manage.
4 - Piliin ang bagong opsyon o i-tap ang Cancel Subscription.
Sundin ang mga instruksyon."	"ในแอปนี้ไม่มีตัวเลือกการสมัครสมาชิก แอป ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" มีการซื้อเพียงครั้งเดียวเพื่อปลดล็อกเนื้อหาและเครื่องมือทั้งหมดสำหรับการเข้าถึงตลอดชีวิต สำหรับแอปอื่น ๆ ที่รวมแผนการสมัครสมาชิก โปรดทำตามคำแนะนำเหล่านี้เพื่อยกเลิกการสมัครสมาชิก:
1 - เปิดแอปการตั้งค่า
2 - แตะที่ชื่อของคุณ จากนั้นสมัครสมาชิก
3 - เลือกการสมัครสมาชิกเพื่อจัดการ
4 - เลือกตัวเลือกใหม่หรือแตะยกเลิกการสมัครสมาชิก
ทำตามคำแนะนำ."	"Bu uygulamada abonelik seçeneği yoktur. ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" uygulaması, tüm içerik ve araçlara ömür boyu erişim için tek seferlik bir satın alma sunar. Abonelik planları içeren diğer uygulamalarımız için, bir aboneliği iptal etmek üzere şu talimatları izleyin:
1 - Ayarlar uygulamasını açın.
2 - İsminize dokunun, ardından Abonelikler’e gidin.
3 - Yönetmek istediğiniz aboneliği seçin.
4 - Yeni bir seçenek seçin veya Aboneliği İptal Et’e dokunun.
Talimatları izleyin."	"У цьому додатку немає опції підписки. Додаток ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" пропонує одноразову покупку для розблокування всього контенту та інструментів з довічним доступом. Для наших інших додатків із підписками дотримуйтесь наступних інструкцій для скасування підписки:
1 - Відкрийте додаток Налаштування.
2 - Натисніть на своє ім’я, потім Переглянути підписки.
3 - Оберіть підписку для керування.
4 - Виберіть новий варіант або натисніть Скасувати підписку.
Дотримуйтесь інструкцій."	"Trong ứng dụng này, không có tùy chọn đăng ký. Ứng dụng ""Lalafun Coloring For Kids"" cung cấp một lần mua để mở khóa tất cả nội dung và công cụ với quyền truy cập trọn đời. Đối với các ứng dụng khác của chúng tôi có kế hoạch đăng ký, vui lòng làm theo các hướng dẫn sau để hủy đăng ký:
1 - Mở ứng dụng Cài đặt.
2 - Nhấn vào tên của bạn, sau đó vào Đăng ký.
3 - Chọn đăng ký mà bạn muốn quản lý.
4 - Chọn một tùy chọn mới hoặc nhấn vào Hủy đăng ký.
Làm theo hướng dẫn."
for_parents_FAQ_6_question	53	Are your apps available for a single payment or are they subscription-based?	Ваши приложения доступны для разовой оплаты или на основе подписки?	هل تطبيقاتكم متاحة للدفع لمرة واحدة أم تعتمد على الاشتراك؟	Предлагат ли се вашите приложения за еднократно плащане или са на абонаментна основа?	Els vostres aplicacions estan disponibles per un sol pagament o són basades en subscripció?	Jesu li vaše aplikacije dostupne za jednokratno plaćanje ili su na temelju pretplate?	Jsou vaše aplikace k dispozici za jednorázovou platbu nebo na základě předplatného?	Er dine apps tilgængelige for en engangsbetaling, eller er de abonnementsbaserede?	Zijn uw apps beschikbaar voor een eenmalige betaling of zijn ze abonnement-gebaseerd?	Kas teie rakendused on saadaval ühekordse maksega või on need tellimuspõhised?	Ovatko sovelluksenne saatavilla kertamaksulla vai perustuvatko ne tilaukseen?	Vos applications sont-elles disponibles via un paiement unique ou sont-elles basées sur un abonnement ?	Sind Ihre Apps mit einer einmaligen Zahlung erhältlich oder basieren sie auf einem Abonnement?	Οι εφαρμογές σας είναι διαθέσιμες με μία εφάπαξ πληρωμή ή βασίζονται σε συνδρομή;	האם האפליקציות שלכם זמינות בתשלום חד פעמי או מבוססות על מנוי?	क्या आपकी ऐप्स एकल भुगतान के साथ उपलब्ध हैं या ये सदस्यता आधारित हैं?	Az alkalmazásaik egyszeri fizetéssel elérhetők, vagy előfizetés-alapúak?	Apakah aplikasi Anda tersedia dengan pembayaran satu kali atau berbasis langganan?	Le vostre app sono disponibili con un pagamento singolo o sono basate su abbonamento?	アプリは一度きりの支払いで利用できますか、それともサブスクリプションベースですか？	앱은 단일 결제로 이용할 수 있나요, 아니면 구독 기반인가요?	Vai jūsu lietotnes ir pieejamas ar vienreizēju maksājumu vai tās ir balstītas uz abonementu?	Ar jūsų programėlės prieinamos už vienkartinį mokestį, ar jos paremtos prenumerata?	Adakah aplikasi anda tersedia dengan bayaran sekali sahaja atau berasaskan langganan?	Er appene deres tilgjengelig for engangsbetaling, eller er de abonnementsbasert?	Czy wasze aplikacje są dostępne za jednorazową opłatą, czy są oparte na subskrypcji?	Os seus aplicativos estão disponíveis para pagamento único ou são baseados em assinatura?	Aplicațiile dvs. sunt disponibile pentru o singură plată sau sunt bazate pe abonament?	Да ли су ваше апликације доступне за једнократну уплату или су засноване на претплати?	您的应用是单次付费的还是基于订阅的?	Sú vaše aplikácie dostupné na jednorazovú platbu alebo sú založené na predplatnom?	Ali so vaše aplikacije na voljo za enkratno plačilo ali so naročniško osnovane?	¿Están disponibles sus aplicaciones con un pago único o son basadas en suscripciones?	Är era appar tillgängliga för en engångsbetalning eller är de prenumerationsbaserade?	Ang mga app niyo ba ay available para sa isang beses na pagbabayad o nakabatay sa subscription?	แอปของคุณพร้อมใช้งานสำหรับการชำระเงินครั้งเดียวหรือเป็นการสมัครสมาชิกรายเดือน?	Uygulamalarınız tek seferlik ödemelerle mi yoksa abonelik tabanlı mı sunuluyor?	Ваші додатки доступні для одноразової покупки чи вони на основі підписки?	Các ứng dụng của bạn có sẵn cho một lần thanh toán hay là dựa trên đăng ký?
for_parents_FAQ_6_answer	54	Most of our apps offer one-time in-app purchases, granting you unlimited access without any additional charges. This application - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' offers one-time purchase. However, we do have (or will have in the future) some apps that utilize a subscription model.	Большинство наших приложений предлагают разовую покупку внутри приложения, предоставляя вам неограниченный доступ без дополнительных затрат. Это приложение - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' предлагает разовую покупку. Однако у нас есть (или в будущем будут) приложения, которые используют модель подписки.	توفر معظم تطبيقاتنا عمليات شراء داخل التطبيق لمرة واحدة، مما يتيح لك الوصول غير المحدود دون رسوم إضافية. هذا التطبيق - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' يقدم عملية شراء لمرة واحدة. ومع ذلك، لدينا (أو سيكون لدينا في المستقبل) بعض التطبيقات التي تستخدم نموذج الاشتراك.	Повечето от нашите приложения предлагат еднократни покупки в приложението, които ви предоставят неограничен достъп без допълнителни такси. Това приложение - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' предлага еднократна покупка. Въпреки това, имаме (или ще имаме в бъдеще) някои приложения, които използват модел на абонамент.	La majoria de les nostres aplicacions ofereixen compres úniques dins de l'aplicació, que et permeten accés il·limitat sense càrrecs addicionals. Aquesta aplicació - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' ofereix una compra única. Tanmateix, tenim (o tindrem en el futur) algunes aplicacions que utilitzen un model de subscripció.	Većina naših aplikacija nudi jednokratne kupnje unutar aplikacije koje vam omogućuju neograničen pristup bez dodatnih troškova. Ova aplikacija - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' nudi jednokratnu kupnju. Međutim, imamo (ili ćemo imati u budućnosti) neke aplikacije koje koriste model pretplate.	Většina našich aplikací nabízí jednorázové nákupy, které vám poskytnou neomezený přístup bez dalších poplatků. Tato aplikace - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' nabízí jednorázový nákup. Nicméně, máme (nebo budeme mít v budoucnu) některé aplikace, které používají model předplatného.	De fleste af vores apps tilbyder engangskøb i appen, hvilket giver dig ubegrænset adgang uden ekstra gebyrer. Denne applikation - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' tilbyder et engangskøb. Men vi har (eller vil have i fremtiden) nogle apps, der benytter et abonnementsmodel.	De meeste van onze apps bieden eenmalige in-app aankopen, die je onbeperkte toegang geven zonder extra kosten. Deze applicatie - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' biedt een eenmalige aankoop. We hebben echter (of zullen in de toekomst hebben) enkele apps die gebruik maken van een abonnementsmodel.	Enamik meie rakendusi pakub ühekordseid rakendusesiseseid oste, mis annavad teile piiramatu juurdepääsu ilma lisatasuta. See rakendus - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' pakub ühekordset ostu. Kuid meil on (või tulevikus on) mõned rakendused, mis kasutavad tellimismudelit.	Useimmat sovelluksemme tarjoavat kertaluonteisia sovelluksen sisäisiä ostoksia, jotka antavat sinulle rajoittamattoman pääsyn ilman lisämaksuja. Tämä sovellus - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' tarjoaa kertamaksun. Meillä on kuitenkin (tai tulemme tulevaisuudessa saamaan) joitakin sovelluksia, jotka käyttävät tilausmallia.	La plupart de nos applications proposent des achats uniques intégrés, vous offrant un accès illimité sans frais supplémentaires. Cette application - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' propose un achat unique. Cependant, nous avons (ou aurons à l'avenir) certaines applications qui utilisent un modèle d'abonnement.	Die meisten unserer Apps bieten einmalige In-App-Käufe, die Ihnen unbegrenzten Zugang ohne zusätzliche Kosten ermöglichen. Diese Anwendung - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' bietet einen einmaligen Kauf. Wir haben jedoch (oder werden in Zukunft haben) einige Apps, die ein Abonnementmodell verwenden.	Οι περισσότερες από τις εφαρμογές μας προσφέρουν εφάπαξ αγορές εντός εφαρμογής, προσφέροντάς σας απεριόριστη πρόσβαση χωρίς επιπλέον χρεώσεις. Αυτή η εφαρμογή - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' προσφέρει εφάπαξ αγορά. Ωστόσο, έχουμε (ή θα έχουμε στο μέλλον) μερικές εφαρμογές που χρησιμοποιούν μοντέλο συνδρομής.	רוב האפליקציות שלנו מציעות רכישות חד-פעמיות בתוך האפליקציה, המעניקות לך גישה בלתי מוגבלת ללא חיובים נוספים. אפליקציה זו - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' מציעה רכישה חד-פעמית. עם זאת, יש לנו (או יהיו לנו בעתיד) אפליקציות מסוימות המשתמשות במודל מנוי.	हमारे अधिकांश ऐप्स में एक बार की इन-ऐप खरीदारी का विकल्प है, जो आपको बिना किसी अतिरिक्त शुल्क के असीमित एक्सेस प्रदान करता है। यह ऐप - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' एक बार की खरीदारी प्रदान करता है। हालांकि, हमारे पास कुछ ऐप्स हैं (या भविष्य में होंगे) जो सदस्यता मॉडल का उपयोग करते हैं।	Az alkalmazásaink többsége egyszeri vásárlási lehetőséget kínál, amely korlátlan hozzáférést biztosít további költségek nélkül. Ez az alkalmazás - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' egyszeri vásárlást kínál. Ugyanakkor van (vagy a jövőben lesz) néhány alkalmazásunk, amely előfizetési modellt alkalmaz.	Sebagian besar aplikasi kami menawarkan pembelian satu kali di dalam aplikasi, memberikan Anda akses tak terbatas tanpa biaya tambahan. Aplikasi ini - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' menawarkan pembelian satu kali. Namun, kami memiliki (atau akan memiliki di masa depan) beberapa aplikasi yang menggunakan model langganan.	La maggior parte delle nostre app offre acquisti una tantum, consentendoti accesso illimitato senza costi aggiuntivi. Questa applicazione - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' offre un acquisto una tantum. Tuttavia, abbiamo (o avremo in futuro) alcune app che utilizzano un modello di abbonamento.	ほとんどのアプリは一度限りのアプリ内購入を提供しており、追加料金なしで無制限にアクセスできます。このアプリ - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' は一度限りの購入を提供します。ただし、いくつかのアプリは（または将来、サブスクリプションモデルを使用する予定があります）。	대부분의 앱은 일회성 인앱 구매를 제공하여 추가 비용 없이 무제한 액세스를 제공합니다. 이 애플리케이션 - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids'는 일회성 구매를 제공합니다. 그러나 일부 앱은 (또는 앞으로 구독 모델을 사용할 예정입니다).	Lielākā daļa mūsu lietotņu piedāvā vienreizēju pirkumu lietotnē, nodrošinot jums neierobežotu piekļuvi bez papildu maksām. Šī lietotne - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' piedāvā vienreizēju pirkumu. Tomēr mums ir (vai būs nākotnē) dažas lietotnes, kuras izmanto abonēšanas modeli.	Dauguma mūsų programų siūlo vienkartinius pirkimus, suteikiančius neribotą prieigą be papildomų mokesčių. Ši programa - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' siūlo vienkartinį pirkimą. Tačiau turime (arba ateityje turėsime) kai kurias programas, naudojančias prenumeratos modelį.	Kebanyakan aplikasi kami menawarkan pembelian dalam aplikasi sekali sahaja, memberikan anda akses tanpa had tanpa sebarang bayaran tambahan. Aplikasi ini - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' menawarkan pembelian sekali sahaja. Walau bagaimanapun, kami mempunyai (atau akan mempunyai pada masa hadapan) beberapa aplikasi yang menggunakan model langganan.	De fleste av våre apper tilbyr engangskjøp i appen, noe som gir deg ubegrenset tilgang uten ekstra kostnader. Denne applikasjonen - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' tilbyr et engangskjøp. Vi har imidlertid (eller vil ha i fremtiden) noen apper som bruker en abonnementsmodell.	Większość naszych aplikacji oferuje jednorazowe zakupy w aplikacji, co zapewnia nieograniczony dostęp bez dodatkowych opłat. Ta aplikacja - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' oferuje jednorazowy zakup. Niemniej mamy (lub będziemy mieć w przyszłości) kilka aplikacji, które korzystają z modelu subskrypcyjnego.	A maioria dos nossos aplicativos oferece compras únicas no aplicativo, proporcionando acesso ilimitado sem cobranças adicionais. Este aplicativo - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' oferece uma compra única. No entanto, temos (ou teremos no futuro) alguns aplicativos que utilizam um modelo de assinatura.	Majoritatea aplicațiilor noastre oferă achiziții unice în aplicație, oferindu-vă acces nelimitat fără costuri suplimentare. Această aplicație - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' oferă o achiziție unică. Totuși, avem (sau vom avea în viitor) câteva aplicații care utilizează un model de abonament.	Većina naših aplikacija nudi jednokratne kupovine u aplikaciji, omogućavajući vam neograničen pristup bez dodatnih troškova. Ova aplikacija - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' nudi jednokratnu kupovinu. Međutim, imamo (ili ćemo imati u budućnosti) neke aplikacije koje koriste model pretplate.	我们的大多数应用都提供一次性应用内购买，使您无需额外费用即可获得无限访问权限。该应用程序 - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' 提供一次性购买。然而，我们有（或将来会有）一些使用订阅模式的应用。	Väčšina našich aplikácií ponúka jednorazové nákupy, ktoré vám poskytujú neobmedzený prístup bez ďalších poplatkov. Táto aplikácia - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' ponúka jednorazový nákup. Napriek tomu máme (alebo budeme mať v budúcnosti) niektoré aplikácie, ktoré používajú predplatné.	Večina naših aplikacij ponuja enkratne nakupe v aplikaciji, kar vam omogoča neomejen dostop brez dodatnih stroškov. Ta aplikacija - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' ponuja enkratni nakup. Vendar imamo (ali bomo imeli v prihodnosti) nekaj aplikacij, ki uporabljajo naročninski model.	La mayoría de nuestras aplicaciones ofrecen compras únicas dentro de la aplicación, dándote acceso ilimitado sin cargos adicionales. Esta aplicación - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' ofrece una compra única. Sin embargo, tenemos (o tendremos en el futuro) algunas aplicaciones que utilizan un modelo de suscripción.	De flesta av våra appar erbjuder engångsköp inom appen, vilket ger dig obegränsad åtkomst utan extra avgifter. Denna app - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' erbjuder ett engångsköp. Vi har dock (eller kommer att ha i framtiden) vissa appar som använder en prenumerationsmodell.	Karamihan sa aming mga app ay nag-aalok ng isang beses na pagbili sa loob ng app, na nagbibigay sa iyo ng walang limitasyong access nang walang karagdagang bayad. Ang app na ito - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' ay nag-aalok ng isang beses na pagbili. Gayunpaman, mayroon kami (o magkakaroon sa hinaharap) ng ilang app na gumagamit ng subscription model.	แอปส่วนใหญ่ของเรามีการซื้อในแอปเพียงครั้งเดียว ซึ่งช่วยให้คุณเข้าถึงได้ไม่จำกัดโดยไม่มีค่าใช้จ่ายเพิ่มเติม แอปนี้ - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' มีการซื้อเพียงครั้งเดียว อย่างไรก็ตาม เรามี (หรือจะมีในอนาคต) แอปบางตัวที่ใช้รูปแบบการสมัครใช้งาน.	Çoğu uygulamamız, ekstra ücret olmadan sınırsız erişim sağlayan tek seferlik uygulama içi satın alma seçeneği sunar. Bu uygulama - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' tek seferlik bir satın alma sunar. Ancak, bazı uygulamalarımız (veya gelecekte sahip olacağımız) abonelik modeli kullanmaktadır.	Більшість наших додатків пропонують одноразову покупку, яка надає вам необмежений доступ без додаткових витрат. Цей додаток - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' пропонує одноразову покупку. Проте, у нас є (або будуть у майбутньому) деякі додатки, які використовують модель підписки.	Hầu hết các ứng dụng của chúng tôi cung cấp mua một lần trong ứng dụng, mang đến cho bạn quyền truy cập không giới hạn mà không tính thêm phí. Ứng dụng này - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' cung cấp mua một lần. Tuy nhiên, chúng tôi có (hoặc sẽ có trong tương lai) một số ứng dụng sử dụng mô hình đăng ký.
for_parents_FAQ_7_question	55	Is an active internet connection required to use your apps?	Требуется ли активное интернет-соединение для использования ваших приложений?	هل يتطلب الاتصال بالإنترنت لاستخدام تطبيقاتكم؟	Необходимо ли е активна интернет връзка за използване на вашите приложения?	Es necessita una connexió a internet activa per utilitzar les vostres aplicacions?	Je li potrebna aktivna internetska veza za korištenje vaših aplikacija?	Je nutné mít aktivní internetové připojení pro používání vašich aplikací?	Kræver det en aktiv internetforbindelse at bruge dine apps?	Is een actieve internetverbinding vereist om uw apps te gebruiken?	Kas teie rakenduste kasutamiseks on vajalik aktiivne internetiühendus?	Vaatiiko sovelluksenne aktiivisen internetyhteyden?	Une connexion Internet active est-elle nécessaire pour utiliser vos applications ?	Ist eine aktive Internetverbindung erforderlich, um Ihre Apps zu nutzen?	Απαιτείται ενεργή σύνδεση στο διαδίκτυο για να χρησιμοποιήσω τις εφαρμογές σας;	האם נדרשת חיבור אינטרנט פעיל כדי להשתמש באפליקציות שלכם?	क्या आपकी ऐप्स का उपयोग करने के लिए सक्रिय इंटरनेट कनेक्शन की आवश्यकता होती है?	Szükséges-e aktív internetkapcsolat az alkalmazásaik használatához?	Apakah koneksi internet aktif diperlukan untuk menggunakan aplikasi Anda?	È necessaria una connessione internet attiva per utilizzare le vostre app?	アプリを使用するにはインターネット接続が必要ですか？	앱을 사용하려면 인터넷 연결이 필요합니까?	Vai, lai izmantotu jūsu lietotnes, ir nepieciešams aktīvs interneta savienojums?	Ar reikia aktyvaus interneto ryšio, norint naudotis jūsų programėlėmis?	Adakah sambungan internet aktif diperlukan untuk menggunakan aplikasi anda?	Krever appene deres en aktiv internettforbindelse?	Czy korzystanie z waszych aplikacji wymaga aktywnego połączenia z internetem?	É necessário ter uma conexão ativa com a internet para usar seus aplicativos?	Este necesară o conexiune activă la internet pentru a utiliza aplicațiile dvs.?	Да ли је потребна активна интернет веза за коришћење ваших апликација?	使用您的应用是否需要始终连接网络?	Vyžaduje používanie vašich aplikácií aktívne pripojenie na internet?	Ali je za uporabo vaših aplikacij potrebno aktivno internetno povezavo?	¿Es necesaria una conexión activa a Internet para utilizar sus aplicaciones?	Krävs en aktiv internetanslutning för att använda era appar?	Kinakailangan ba ang isang aktibong koneksyon sa internet upang magamit ang iyong mga app?	จำเป็นต้องเชื่อมต่ออินเทอร์เน็ตเพื่อใช้แอปของคุณหรือไม่?	Uygulamalarınızı kullanmak İçİn aktİf bİr İnternet bağlantısı gereklİ mİ?	Чи потрібне активне підключення до Інтернету для використання ваших додатків?	Có cần kết nối internet hoạt động để sử dụng ứng dụng của bạn không?
for_parents_FAQ_7_answer	56	An active internet connection is required to download and install our apps from the application stores. However, once the app is installed on your device, you can turn OFF the internet connection and use it. Exceptions: Some of our apps may need internet connection to sync game progress, to get updates or to get new content.	Активное интернет-соединение требуется для загрузки и установки наших приложений из магазинов приложений. Однако, после установки приложения на ваше устройство, вы можете отключить интернет и использовать его. Исключения: Некоторые наши приложения могут требовать подключения к интернету для синхронизации игрового прогресса, получения обновлений или нового контента.	يتطلب الاتصال بالإنترنت لتنزيل وتثبيت تطبيقاتنا من متاجر التطبيقات. ومع ذلك، بعد تثبيت التطبيق على جهازك، يمكنك إيقاف تشغيل الاتصال بالإنترنت واستخدامه. الاستثناءات: قد تتطلب بعض تطبيقاتنا الاتصال بالإنترنت لمزامنة تقدم اللعبة أو للحصول على التحديثات أو المحتوى الجديد.	Активна интернет връзка е необходима за изтегляне и инсталиране на нашите приложения от магазините за приложения. Въпреки това, след като приложението е инсталирано на вашето устройство, можете да изключите интернет връзката и да го използвате. Изключения: Някои от нашите приложения може да изискват интернет връзка за синхронизиране на напредъка в играта, за получаване на актуализации или за ново съдържание.	Es necessita una connexió a internet activa per descarregar i instal·lar les nostres aplicacions des de les botigues d'aplicacions. Tanmateix, un cop l'aplicació estigui instal·lada al vostre dispositiu, podeu desactivar la connexió a internet i utilitzar-la. Excepcions: Algunes de les nostres aplicacions poden necessitar connexió a internet per sincronitzar el progrés del joc, obtenir actualitzacions o obtenir contingut nou.	Aktivna internetska veza potrebna je za preuzimanje i instaliranje naših aplikacija iz trgovina aplikacija. Međutim, nakon što je aplikacija instalirana na vaš uređaj, možete isključiti internetsku vezu i koristiti je. Izuzeci: Neke od naših aplikacija mogu trebati internetsku vezu za sinkronizaciju napretka igre, dobivanje ažuriranja ili preuzimanje novog sadržaja.	Aktivní internetové připojení je nutné pro stažení a instalaci našich aplikací z obchodů s aplikacemi. Nicméně, jakmile je aplikace nainstalována na vašem zařízení, můžete internet vypnout a aplikaci používat. Výjimky: Některé naše aplikace mohou vyžadovat internetové připojení k synchronizaci herního pokroku, pro aktualizace nebo pro nový obsah.	En aktiv internetforbindelse er påkrævet for at downloade og installere vores apps fra appbutikkerne. Når appen er installeret på din enhed, kan du dog slå internetforbindelsen fra og bruge den. Undtagelser: Nogle af vores apps kan kræve internetforbindelse til at synkronisere spilfremskridt, modtage opdateringer eller få nyt indhold.	Een actieve internetverbinding is nodig om onze apps te downloaden en te installeren uit de appstores. Zodra de app echter op uw apparaat is geïnstalleerd, kunt u de internetverbinding uitschakelen en de app gebruiken. Uitzonderingen: Sommige van onze apps kunnen een internetverbinding vereisen om de voortgang van het spel te synchroniseren, updates te ontvangen of nieuwe inhoud te krijgen.	Aktiivne internetiühendus on vajalik meie rakenduste allalaadimiseks ja installimiseks rakenduste poest. Kui rakendus on aga teie seadmesse installitud, saate internetiühenduse välja lülitada ja rakendust kasutada. Erandid: Mõned meie rakendused võivad vajada internetiühendust mängu edenemise sünkroonimiseks, värskenduste või uue sisu saamiseks.	Aktiivinen internetyhteys tarvitaan sovellustemme lataamiseen ja asentamiseen sovelluskaupoista. Kun sovellus on asennettu laitteellesi, voit kytkeä internetyhteyden pois päältä ja käyttää sitä. Poikkeukset: Jotkut sovelluksemme voivat vaatia internetyhteyttä pelin etenemisen synkronoimiseksi, päivitysten saamiseksi tai uuden sisällön lataamiseksi.	Une connexion Internet active est requise pour télécharger et installer nos applications depuis les magasins d'applications. Cependant, une fois l'application installée sur votre appareil, vous pouvez désactiver la connexion Internet et l'utiliser. Exceptions : Certaines de nos applications peuvent nécessiter une connexion Internet pour synchroniser la progression du jeu, obtenir des mises à jour ou du nouveau contenu.	Eine aktive Internetverbindung ist erforderlich, um unsere Apps aus den App-Stores herunterzuladen und zu installieren. Sobald die App jedoch auf Ihrem Gerät installiert ist, können Sie die Internetverbindung ausschalten und sie verwenden. Ausnahmen: Einige unserer Apps benötigen möglicherweise eine Internetverbindung, um den Spielfortschritt zu synchronisieren, Updates zu erhalten oder neue Inhalte zu beziehen.	Απαιτείται ενεργή σύνδεση στο διαδίκτυο για να κατεβάσετε και να εγκαταστήσετε τις εφαρμογές μας από τα καταστήματα εφαρμογών. Ωστόσο, μόλις εγκατασταθεί η εφαρμογή στη συσκευή σας, μπορείτε να απενεργοποιήσετε τη σύνδεση στο διαδίκτυο και να τη χρησιμοποιήσετε. Εξαιρέσεις: Ορισμένες από τις εφαρμογές μας μπορεί να απαιτούν σύνδεση στο διαδίκτυο για συγχρονισμό της προόδου του παιχνιδιού, για λήψη ενημερώσεων ή νέου περιεχομένου.	חיבור אינטרנט פעיל נדרש כדי להוריד ולהתקין את האפליקציות שלנו מחנויות האפליקציות. עם זאת, לאחר שהאפליקציה מותקנת במכשיר שלך, ניתן לכבות את החיבור לאינטרנט ולהשתמש בה. יוצאים מן הכלל: חלק מהאפליקציות שלנו עשויות לדרוש חיבור אינטרנט כדי לסנכרן את ההתקדמות במשחק, לקבל עדכונים או תוכן חדש.	हमारी ऐप्स को ऐप स्टोर से डाउनलोड और इंस्टॉल करने के लिए सक्रिय इंटरनेट कनेक्शन की आवश्यकता होती है। हालाँकि, एक बार ऐप आपके डिवाइस पर इंस्टॉल हो जाने के बाद, आप इंटरनेट कनेक्शन को बंद कर सकते हैं और इसका उपयोग कर सकते हैं। अपवाद: हमारी कुछ ऐप्स को गेम प्रगति को सिंक करने, अपडेट प्राप्त करने या नए सामग्री को प्राप्त करने के लिए इंटरनेट कनेक्शन की आवश्यकता हो सकती है।	Aktív internetkapcsolat szükséges az alkalmazások letöltéséhez és telepítéséhez az alkalmazásboltokból. Miután az alkalmazás telepítve van a készülékre, kikapcsolhatja az internetkapcsolatot és használhatja az alkalmazást. Kivételek: Egyes alkalmazásaink internetkapcsolatot igényelhetnek a játék előrehaladásának szinkronizálásához, frissítésekhez vagy új tartalmak fogadásához.	Koneksi internet aktif diperlukan untuk mengunduh dan menginstal aplikasi kami dari toko aplikasi. Namun, setelah aplikasi diinstal di perangkat Anda, Anda dapat mematikan koneksi internet dan menggunakannya. Pengecualian: Beberapa aplikasi kami mungkin memerlukan koneksi internet untuk menyinkronkan kemajuan permainan, menerima pembaruan, atau mendapatkan konten baru.	È necessaria una connessione internet attiva per scaricare e installare le nostre app dagli store delle applicazioni. Tuttavia, una volta che l'app è installata sul dispositivo, puoi disattivare la connessione internet e utilizzarla. Eccezioni: alcune delle nostre app potrebbero richiedere una connessione internet per sincronizzare i progressi del gioco, ricevere aggiornamenti o ottenere nuovi contenuti.	アプリストアからアプリをダウンロードおよびインストールするにはインターネット接続が必要です。ただし、アプリがデバイスにインストールされた後は、インターネット接続をオフにして使用できます。例外：一部のアプリでは、ゲームの進行状況を同期したり、アップデートや新しいコンテンツを取得したりするためにインターネット接続が必要な場合があります。	앱 스토어에서 앱을 다운로드하고 설치하려면 인터넷 연결이 필요합니다。그러나 앱이 기기에 설치된 후에는 인터넷 연결을 끊고 사용할 수 있습니다。예외: 일부 앱은 게임 진행을 동기화하거나 업데이트를 받거나 새로운 콘텐츠를 받기 위해 인터넷 연결이 필요할 수 있습니다。	Aktīvs interneta savienojums ir nepieciešams, lai lejupielādētu un instalētu mūsu lietotnes no lietotņu veikaliem. Kad lietotne ir instalēta ierīcē, varat izslēgt interneta savienojumu un to izmantot. Izņēmumi: dažām mūsu lietotnēm var būt nepieciešams interneta savienojums, lai sinhronizētu spēles progresu, saņemtu atjauninājumus vai iegūtu jaunu saturu.	Aktyvus interneto ryšys reikalingas norint atsisiųsti ir įdiegti mūsų programėles iš programėlių parduotuvių. Tačiau, kai programėlė įdiegta į jūsų įrenginį, galite išjungti interneto ryšį ir ja naudotis. Išimtys: kai kurioms mūsų programėlėms gali prireikti interneto ryšio, kad sinchronizuotų žaidimo progresą, gautų atnaujinimus ar naują turinį.	Sambungan internet aktif diperlukan untuk memuat turun dan memasang aplikasi kami dari kedai aplikasi. Walau bagaimanapun, sebaik sahaja aplikasi dipasang pada peranti anda, anda boleh mematikan sambungan internet dan menggunakannya. Pengecualian: Beberapa aplikasi kami mungkin memerlukan sambungan internet untuk menyegerakkan kemajuan permainan, mendapatkan kemas kini atau mendapatkan kandungan baharu.	En aktiv internettforbindelse er nødvendig for å laste ned og installere våre apper fra app-butikker. Når appen er installert på enheten din, kan du slå av internettforbindelsen og bruke den. Unntak: Noen av appene våre kan kreve internettforbindelse for å synkronisere spillprogresjon, få oppdateringer eller få nytt innhold.	Aktywne połączenie z internetem jest wymagane do pobrania i zainstalowania naszych aplikacji z app store. Po zainstalowaniu aplikacji na urządzeniu, można wyłączyć połączenie z internetem i korzystać z niej. Wyjątki: niektóre nasze aplikacje mogą wymagać połączenia z internetem do synchronizacji postępu gry, otrzymywania aktualizacji lub uzyskiwania nowej zawartości.	Uma conexão ativa com a internet é necessária para baixar e instalar nossos aplicativos das lojas de aplicativos. No entanto, depois que o aplicativo estiver instalado no seu dispositivo, você pode desligar a conexão com a internet e usá-lo. Exceções: alguns dos nossos aplicativos podem precisar de uma conexão com a internet para sincronizar o progresso do jogo, obter atualizações ou novos conteúdos.	Este necesară o conexiune activă la internet pentru a descărca și instala aplicațiile noastre din magazinele de aplicații. Cu toate acestea, odată ce aplicația este instalată pe dispozitivul dvs., puteți opri conexiunea la internet și să o utilizați. Excepții: Unele dintre aplicațiile noastre pot necesita o conexiune la internet pentru a sincroniza progresul jocului, a obține actualizări sau a obține conținut nou.	Активна интернет веза је потребна за преузимање и инсталацију наших апликација из продавница апликација. Међутим, када је апликација инсталирана на вашем уређају, можете искључити интернет везу и користити је. Изузеци: Неке наше апликације могу захтевати интернет везу за синхронизацију напретка у игри, добијање ажурирања или добијање новог садржаја.	需要网络连接来从应用商店下载和安装我们的应用程序。然而，一旦应用安装到您的设备上，您可以关闭网络连接并使用它。例外：我们的一些应用可能需要网络连接来同步游戏进度、获取更新或新内容。	Aktívne pripojenie na internet je potrebné na stiahnutie a inštaláciu našich aplikácií z obchodov s aplikáciami. Keď je aplikácia nainštalovaná na vašom zariadení, môžete pripojenie na internet vypnúť a aplikáciu používať. Výnimky: Niektoré z našich aplikácií môžu vyžadovať pripojenie na internet na synchronizáciu herného postupu, získanie aktualizácií alebo nového obsahu.	Aktivno internetno povezavo je potrebno za prenos in namestitev naših aplikacij iz trgovin z aplikacijami. Ko je aplikacija nameščena na vašo napravo, lahko izklopite internetno povezavo in jo uporabljate. Izjeme: Nekatere naše aplikacije lahko zahtevajo internetno povezavo za sinhronizacijo napredka igre, pridobivanje posodobitev ali nove vsebine.	Es necesaria una conexión activa a Internet para descargar e instalar nuestras aplicaciones desde las tiendas de aplicaciones. Sin embargo, una vez que la aplicación está instalada en tu dispositivo, puedes apagar la conexión a Internet y seguir usándola. Excepciones: Algunas de nuestras aplicaciones pueden necesitar conexión a Internet para sincronizar el progreso del juego, obtener actualizaciones o recibir nuevo contenido.	En aktiv internetanslutning krävs för att ladda ner och installera våra appar från appbutikerna. När appen är installerad på din enhet kan du stänga av internetanslutningen och använda den. Undantag: Vissa av våra appar kan behöva internetanslutning för att synkronisera spelprogression, få uppdateringar eller hämta nytt innehåll.	Kinakailangan ang aktibong koneksyon sa internet upang i-download at i-install ang aming mga app mula sa mga tindahan ng app. Gayunpaman, kapag naka-install na ang app sa iyong device, maaari mong patayin ang koneksyon sa internet at gamitin ito. Mga exception: Ang ilan sa aming mga app ay maaaring mangailangan ng koneksyon sa internet upang i-sync ang progreso ng laro, makakuha ng mga update o makakuha ng bagong nilalaman.	การเชื่อมต่ออินเทอร์เน็ตที่ใช้งานอยู่จำเป็นสำหรับการดาวน์โหลดและติดตั้งแอปจากร้านแอป อย่างไรก็ตามเมื่อแอปติดตั้งแล้ว คุณสามารถปิดการเชื่อมต่ออินเทอร์เน็ตและยังคงใช้งานได้ ยกเว้น: แอปบางส่วนของเราอาจต้องการการเชื่อมต่ออินเทอร์เน็ตเพื่อซิงค์ความคืบหน้าของเกม รับการอัปเดต หรือรับเนื้อหาใหม่	Uygulamalarımızı uygulama mağazalarından İndİrmek ve yüklemek İçİn aktİf bİr İnternet bağlantısı gereklİdİr. Ancak, uygulama cİhazınıza yüklendİkten sonra İnternet bağlantısını kapatabİlİr ve kullanabİlİrsİnİz. İstİsnalar: Bazı uygulamalarımız oyun İlerlemesİnİ senkronİze etmek, güncellemelerİ almak veya yenİ İçerİk almak İçİn İnternet bağlantısına İhtİyaç duyabİlİr.	Активне підключення до Інтернету потрібне для завантаження та встановлення наших додатків із магазинів додатків. Однак після встановлення програми на ваш пристрій ви можете вимкнути Інтернет і використовувати її. Винятки: Деякі з наших додатків можуть потребувати підключення до Інтернету для синхронізації прогресу в грі, отримання оновлень або нового контенту.	Cần có kết nối internet để tải xuống và cài đặt ứng dụng của chúng tôi từ cửa hàng ứng dụng. Tuy nhiên, khi ứng dụng đã được cài đặt trên thiết bị của bạn, bạn có thể tắt kết nối internet và sử dụng nó. Ngoại lệ: Một số ứng dụng của chúng tôi có thể cần kết nối internet để đồng bộ tiến độ trò chơi, nhận cập nhật hoặc nhận nội dung mới.
for_parents_FAQ_8_question	57	Do you have any advertisements within your apps?	Есть ли у ваших приложений реклама?	هل تحتوي تطبيقاتكم على إعلانات؟	Имат ли вашите приложения реклами?	Tenen els vostres aplicacions anuncis?	Imate li oglase u svojim aplikacijama?	Obsahují vaše aplikace reklamy?	Har dine apps reklamer?	Hebben uw apps advertenties?	Kas teie rakendustes on reklaame?	Onko sovelluksissanne mainoksia?	Y a-t-il des publicités dans vos applications ?	Gibt es in Ihren Apps Werbung?	Υπάρχουν διαφημίσεις στις εφαρμογές σας;	האם יש פרסומות באפליקציות פתח גרסה מלאה	क्या आपकी ऐप्स में विज्ञापन होते हैं?	Van reklám az alkalmazásaikban?	Apakah ada iklan dalam aplikasi Anda?	Ci sono annunci pubblicitari nelle vostre app?	アプリに広告はありますか？	앱에 광고가 있습니까?	Vai jūsu lietotnēs ir reklāmas?	Ar jūsų programėlėse yra reklamos?	Adakah aplikasi anda mempunyai iklan?	Har appene deres annonser?	Czy wasze aplikacje mają reklamy?	Os seus aplicativos têm anúncios?	Aplicațiile dvs. au reclame?	Да ли ваше апликације имају огласе?	您的应用有广告吗?	Majú vaše aplikácie reklamy?	Ali imajo vaše aplikacije oglase?	¿Sus aplicaciones tienen anuncios?	Har era appar annonser?	Mayroon bang mga advertisement sa iyong mga app?	แอปของคุณมีโฆษณาหรือไม่?	Uygulamalarınızda reklam var mı?	Чи є у ваших додатках реклама?	Ứng dụng của bạn có quảng cáo không?
for_parents_FAQ_8_answer	58	Our apps are completely ad-free. There is only the "More Apps" section, which is protected by a parental gate, making it inaccessible to children. You can disable this section by turning off the internet connection before launching the app. 	Наши приложения полностью свободны от рекламы. Есть только раздел "Другие приложения", который защищен родительским контролем, что делает его недоступным для детей. Вы можете отключить этот раздел, отключив интернет перед запуском приложения.	تطبيقاتنا خالية تمامًا من الإعلانات. يوجد فقط قسم "المزيد من التطبيقات"، وهو محمي بواسطة بوابة الوالدين، مما يجعله غير متاح للأطفال. يمكنك تعطيل هذا القسم عن طريق إيقاف تشغيل الاتصال بالإنترنت قبل تشغيل التطبيق.	Нашите приложения са напълно без реклами. Има само секция "Още приложения", която е защитена от родителска защита, правейки я недостъпна за деца. Можете да деактивирате тази секция, като изключите интернет връзката преди стартиране на приложението.	Les nostres aplicacions estan completament lliures d'anuncis. Només hi ha la secció "Més aplicacions", que està protegida per una porta parental, fent-la inaccessible per als nens. Podeu desactivar aquesta secció desactivant la connexió a internet abans de llançar l'aplicació.	Naše aplikacije su potpuno bez oglasa. Postoji samo dio "Više aplikacija", koji je zaštićen roditeljskim zaključavanjem, čime je nedostupan djeci. Ovaj dio možete onemogućiti isključivanjem internetske veze prije pokretanja aplikacije.	Naše aplikace jsou zcela bez reklam. Je zde pouze sekce "Další aplikace", která je chráněna rodičovskou branou, což ji činí nepřístupnou pro děti. Můžete tuto sekci deaktivovat tím, že před spuštěním aplikace vypnete internetové připojení.	Vores apps er helt uden reklamer. Der er kun sektionen "Flere apps", som er beskyttet af en forældreport, hvilket gør den utilgængelig for børn. Du kan deaktivere denne sektion ved at slukke for internetforbindelsen, inden du starter appen.	Onze apps zijn volledig advertentievrij. Er is alleen de sectie "Meer apps", die beschermd is door een ouderpoort, waardoor deze niet toegankelijk is voor kinderen. U kunt deze sectie uitschakelen door de internetverbinding uit te schakelen voordat u de app start.	Meie rakendused on täiesti reklaamivabad. On ainult jaotis "Veel rakendusi", mis on kaitstud vanemaluku abil, muutes selle lastele kättesaamatuks. Saate selle jaotise keelata, lülitades enne rakenduse käivitamist välja internetiühenduse.	Sovelluksemme ovat täysin mainosvapaita. Ainoa "Lisää sovelluksia" -osio on suojattu vanhemmuuden portilla, mikä tekee siitä lasten ulottumattomissa. Voit poistaa tämän osion käytöstä katkaisemalla internetyhteyden ennen sovelluksen käynnistämistä.	Nos applications sont totalement exemptes de publicités. Il n'y a que la section "Plus d'applications", qui est protégée par une porte parentale, la rendant inaccessible aux enfants. Vous pouvez désactiver cette section en désactivant la connexion Internet avant de lancer l'application.	Unsere Apps sind komplett werbefrei. Es gibt nur den Abschnitt "Weitere Apps", der durch eine Kindersicherung geschützt ist und somit für Kinder unzugänglich ist. Sie können diesen Abschnitt deaktivieren, indem Sie die Internetverbindung ausschalten, bevor Sie die App starten.	Οι εφαρμογές μας είναι εντελώς χωρίς διαφημίσεις. Υπάρχει μόνο η ενότητα "Περισσότερες εφαρμογές", η οποία προστατεύεται από γονικό κλείδωμα, καθιστώντας την απρόσιτη για τα παιδιά. Μπορείτε να απενεργοποιήσετε αυτή την ενότητα απενεργοποιώντας τη σύνδεση στο διαδίκτυο πριν εκκινήσετε την εφαρμογή.	האפליקציות שלנו חסרות פרסומות לחלוטין. יש רק את החלק "עוד אפליקציות", המוגן על ידי שער הורים, כך שהוא לא נגיש לילדים. ניתן להשבית את החלק הזה על ידי ניתוק חיבור האינטרנט לפני הפעלת האפליקציה.	हमारी ऐप्स पूरी तरह से विज्ञापन-मुक्त हैं। केवल "और ऐप्स" अनुभाग है, जो पैरेंटल गेट द्वारा संरक्षित है, जिससे यह बच्चों के लिए अप्राप्य है। आप इस अनुभाग को ऐप लॉन्च करने से पहले इंटरनेट कनेक्शन बंद करके अक्षम कर सकते हैं।	Alkalmazásaink teljesen reklámmentesek. Csak a "További alkalmazások" szakasz található, amelyet szülői zár véd, így a gyermekek számára nem elérhető. Letilthatja ezt a szakaszt, ha az alkalmazás indítása előtt kikapcsolja az internetkapcsolatot.	Aplikasi kami sepenuhnya bebas iklan. Hanya ada bagian "Aplikasi Lainnya", yang dilindungi oleh gerbang orang tua, sehingga tidak dapat diakses oleh anak-anak. Anda dapat menonaktifkan bagian ini dengan mematikan koneksi internet sebelum meluncurkan aplikasi.	Le nostre app sono completamente prive di annunci. C'è solo la sezione "Altre app", che è protetta da un parental gate, rendendola inaccessibile ai bambini. Puoi disabilitare questa sezione disattivando la connessione internet prima di avviare l'app.	私たちのアプリは完全に広告なしです。「他のアプリ」セクションのみがあり、これはペアレンタルゲートによって保護されており、子供がアクセスできないようになっています。アプリを起動する前にインターネット接続をオフにすることで、このセクションを無効にすることができます。	저희 앱은 완전히 광고가 없습니다。"추가 앱" 섹션만 있으며, 이는 부모 게이트에 의해 보호되어 있어 아이들이 접근할 수 없습니다。앱을 시작하기 전에 인터넷 연결을 끊으면 이 섹션을 비활성화할 수 있습니다。	Mūsu lietotnes ir pilnīgi bez reklāmām. Ir tikai sadaļa "Vairāk lietotņu", kas ir aizsargāta ar vecāku vārtiem, padarot to nepieejamu bērniem. Varat atspējot šo sadaļu, pirms lietotnes palaišanas izslēdzot interneta savienojumu.	Mūsų programėlės yra visiškai be reklamų. Yra tik skiltis "Daugiau programėlių", kuri yra apsaugota tėvų vartais, todėl vaikai negali prie jos prieiti. Šią skiltį galite išjungti, išjungdami interneto ryšį prieš paleisdami programėlę.	Aplikasi kami bebas daripada iklan sepenuhnya. Hanya terdapat bahagian "Lebih Banyak Aplikasi", yang dilindungi oleh pintu ibu bapa, menjadikannya tidak dapat diakses oleh kanak-kanak. Anda boleh menyahaktifkan bahagian ini dengan mematikan sambungan internet sebelum melancarkan aplikasi.	Appene våre er helt annonseløse. Det er bare en "Flere apper"-seksjon som er beskyttet av en foreldreport, noe som gjør den utilgjengelig for barn. Du kan deaktivere denne seksjonen ved å slå av internettforbindelsen før du starter appen.	Nasze aplikacje są całkowicie wolne od reklam. Jest tylko sekcja "Więcej aplikacji", która jest chroniona przez bramkę rodzicielską, co uniemożliwia dostęp dzieciom. Możesz wyłączyć tę sekcję, wyłączając połączenie z internetem przed uruchomieniem aplikacji.	Nossos aplicativos são completamente livres de anúncios. Há apenas a seção "Mais Aplicativos", que é protegida por um controle parental, tornando-a inacessível às crianças. Você pode desativar essa seção desligando a conexão com a internet antes de iniciar o aplicativo.	Aplicațiile noastre sunt complet fără reclame. Există doar secțiunea "Mai multe aplicații", care este protejată de un control parental, făcând-o inaccesibilă copiilor. Puteți dezactiva această secțiune dezactivând conexiunea la internet înainte de a lansa aplicația.	Наше апликације су потпуно без огласа. Постоји само одељак „Више апликација“, који је заштићен родитељском заштитом, чиме је недоступан деци. Можете онемогућити овај одељак искључивањем интернет везе пре покретања апликације.	我们的应用完全没有广告。只有“更多应用”部分，受到家长控制保护，不允许儿童访问。您可以在启动应用之前关闭网络连接以禁用此部分。	Naše aplikácie sú úplne bez reklám. Existuje len sekcia „Viac aplikácií“, ktorá je chránená rodičovskou bránou a je tak neprístupná deťom. Túto sekciu môžete vypnúť vypnutím pripojenia na internet pred spustením aplikácie.	Naše aplikacije so popolnoma brez oglasov. Obstaja samo razdelek „Več aplikacij“, ki je zaščiten z varovalom za starše, zaradi česar je nedostopen otrokom. Ta razdelek lahko onemogočite tako, da izklopite internetno povezavo pred zagonom aplikacije.	Nuestras aplicaciones están completamente libres de anuncios. Solo hay una sección de "Más aplicaciones", que está protegida por una puerta parental, lo que la hace inaccesible para los niños. Puedes desactivar esta sección apagando la conexión a Internet antes de iniciar la aplicación.	Våra appar är helt annonsfria. Det finns bara avsnittet "Fler appar", som skyddas av en föräldraportal och därmed är otillgängligt för barn. Du kan inaktivera detta avsnitt genom att stänga av internetanslutningen innan du startar appen.	Ang aming mga app ay ganap na walang mga advertisement. Mayroon lamang seksyon na "Higit pang mga App", na protektado ng parental gate, kaya't hindi ito ma-access ng mga bata. Maaari mong i-disable ang seksyon na ito sa pamamagitan ng pag-patay sa koneksyon sa internet bago ilunsad ang app.	แอปของเราปราศจากโฆษณาโดยสมบูรณ์ มีเพียงส่วนของ "แอปเพิ่มเติม" ที่ได้รับการป้องกันด้วยเกตสำหรับผู้ปกครอง ทำให้เด็กไม่สามารถเข้าถึงได้ คุณสามารถปิดใช้งานส่วนนี้ได้โดยการปิดการเชื่อมต่ออินเทอร์เน็ตก่อนเปิดแอป	Uygulamalarımız tamamen reklamsızdır. Sadece ebeveyn kontrolü İle korunan "Daha Fazla Uygulama" bölümü vardır ve bu, çocuklar tarafından erİşİlemez. Bu bölümü devre dışı bırakmak İçİn uygulamayı başlatmadan önce İnternet bağlantısını kapatabİlİrsİnİz.	Наші додатки повністю без реклами. Є лише розділ "Більше додатків", який захищений батьківським контролем, що робить його недоступним для дітей. Ви можете вимкнути цей розділ, вимкнувши Інтернет перед запуском додатку.	Các ứng dụng của chúng tôi hoàn toàn không có quảng cáo. Chỉ có phần "Ứng dụng khác", được bảo vệ bằng cổng cha mẹ, làm cho trẻ em không thể truy cập. Bạn có thể tắt phần này bằng cách tắt kết nối internet trước khi khởi động ứng dụng.
subscription_title	61	UNLOCK FULL VERSION	ОТКРЫТЬ ПОЛНУЮ ВЕРСИЮ	افتح النسخة الكاملة	ОТКЛЮЧЕТЕ ПЪЛНАТА ВЕРСИЯ	DESBLOQUEJA VERSIÓ COMPLETA	OTKLJUČAJ PUNU VERZIJU	ODOMKNOUT PLNOU VERZI	LÅS OP FOR FULD VERSION	ONTGRENDEL VOLLEDIGE VERSIE	AVAGE TÄISVERSIOON	AVAA KOKO VERSIO	DÉVERROUILLER LA VERSION COMPLÈTE	VOLLVERSION FREISCHALTEN	ΞΕΚΛΕΙΔΩΣΤΕ ΠΛΗΡΗ ΕΚΔΟΣΗ	פתח גרסה מלאה	पूर्ण संस्करण अनलॉक करें	TELJES VERZIÓ FELTÁRÁSA	BUKA VERSI PENUH	SBLOCCA VERSIONE COMPLETA	フルバージョンをアンロック	전체 버전 잠금 해제	ATSLĒGT PILNO VERSIJU	ATRASKITE PILNĄ VERSIJĄ	BUKA VERSI PENUH	LÅS OPP FULL VERSJON	ODBLOKUJ PEŁNĄ WERSJĘ	DESBLOQUEAR VERSÃO COMPLETA	DEBLOCAȚI VERSIUNEA COMPLETĂ	ОТКЉУЧАЈТЕ ПУНУ ВЕРЗИЈУ	解锁完整版本	ODOMKNÚŤ PLNÚ VERZIU	ODKLENITE POLNO RAZLIČICO	DESBLOQUEAR VERSIÓN COMPLETA	LÅS UPP FULL VERSION	I-UNLOCK ANG FULL VERSION	ปลดล็อคเวอร์ชันเต็ม	TAM SÜRÜMÜ AÇ	РОЗБЛОКУВАТИ ПОВНУ ВЕРСІЮ	MỞ KHÓA PHIÊN BẢN ĐẦY ĐỦ
subscription_plan_life_time	62	Lifetime access	Пожизненный доступ	وصول مدى الحياة	Доживотен достъп	Accés de per vida	Doživotni pristup	Doživotní přístup	Livstidsadgang	Levenslange toegang	Eluaegne juurdepääs	Elinikäinen käyttöoikeus	Accès à vie	Lebenslanger Zugang	Δια βίου πρόσβαση	גישה לכל החיים	आजीवन पहुंच	Élethosszig tartó hozzáférés	Akses seumur hidup	Accesso a vita	生涯アクセス	평생 액세스	Mūža piekļuve	Viso gyvenimo prieiga	Akses Seumur Hidup	Livstids tilgang	Dostęp na całe życie	Acesso vitalício	Acces pe viață	Доживотни приступ	终身访问	Doživotný prístup	Doživljenjski dostop	Acceso de por vida	Livstidsåtkomst	Panghabangbuhay na Access	เข้าถึงได้ตลอดชีวิต	Ömür boyu erİşİm	Довічний доступ	Truy cập trọn đời
subscription_plan_life_time_2	63	Unlock Lifetime Access for Only:	Разблокировать пожизненный доступ всего за:	افتح الوصول مدى الحياة فقط مقابل:	Отключи достъп за цял живот само за:	Desbloqueja l'accés de per vida només per:	Otključaj doživotni pristup za samo:	Odemkněte doživotní přístup pouze za:	Lås op for livstidsadgang for kun:	Ontgrendel levenslange toegang voor slechts:	Avage eluaegne juurdepääs ainult:	Avaa elinikäinen pääsy vain hintaan:	Débloquez l'accès à vie pour seulement:	Lebenslangen Zugang freischalten für nur:	Ξεκλειδώστε πρόσβαση εφ' όρου ζωής μόνο για:	פתח גישה לכל החיים רק ב:	केवल इस कीमत में आजीवन पहुँच को अनलॉक करें:	Élethosszig tartó hozzáférés feloldása csak:	Buka akses seumur hidup hanya dengan:	Sblocca accesso a vita per solo:	生涯アクセスをわずかでアンロック:	평생 액세스를 다음 가격으로 잠금 해제:	Atbloķēt mūža piekļuvi tikai par:	Atrakinkite viso gyvenimo prieigą už tik:	Buka Akses Seumur Hidup hanya untuk:	Lås opp livstids tilgang for bare:	Odblokuj dostęp na całe życie tylko za:	Desbloqueie o acesso vitalício por apenas:	Deblocați accesul pe viață pentru doar:	Откључајте доживотни приступ за само:	仅需解锁终身访问:	Odomknite doživotný prístup len za:	Odklenite doživljenjski dostop za samo:	Desbloquea el acceso de por vida por solo:	Lås upp livstidsåtkomst för endast:	I-unlock ang Panghabangbuhay na Access para lang sa:	ปลดล็อคการเข้าถึงตลอดชีวิตเพียงแค่:	Ömür boyu erİşİmİ yalnızca şu fİyata açın:	Розблокуйте довічний доступ всього за:	Mở khóa truy cập trọn đời chỉ với:
subscription_main_button	64	UNLOCK	ОТКРЫТЬ	افتح	ОТКЛЮЧЕТЕ	DESBLOQUEJA	OTKLJUČAJ	ODOMKNOUT	LÅS OP	ONTGRENDEL	AVAGE	AVAA	DÉVERROUILLER	FREISCHALTEN	ΞΕΚΛΕΙΔΩΣΤΕ	פתח	अनलॉक करें	FELTÁRÁS	BUKA	SBLOCCA	アンロック	잠금 해제	ATSLĒGT	ATRASKITE	BUKA	LÅS OPP	ODBLOKUJ	DESBLOQUEAR	DEBLOCAȚI	ОТКЉУЧАЈТЕ	解锁	ODOMKNÚŤ	ODKLENITE	DESBLOQUEAR	LÅS UPP	I-UNLOCK	ปลดล็อค	AÇ	РОЗБЛОКУВАТИ	MỞ KHÓA
subscription_restore_link	65	RESTORE PURCHASE	ВОССТАНОВИТЬ ПОКУПКУ	استعادة الشراء	ВЪЗСТАНОВЯВАНЕ НА ПОКУПКА	RESTAURA COMPRA	VRATI KUPNJU	OBNOVIT NÁKUP	GENDAN KØB	HERSTEL AANKOOP	TAASTA OST	PALAUTA OSTO	RESTAURER L'ACHAT	KAUF WIEDERHERSTELLEN	ΕΠΑΝΑΦΟΡΑ ΑΓΟΡΑΣ	שחזור רכישה	खरीदारी पुनर्स्थापित करें	VÁSÁRLÁS VISSZAÁLLÍTÁSA	PULIHKAN PEMBELIAN	RIPRISTINA ACQUISTO	購入を復元	구매 복원	ATJAUNOT PIRKUMU	ATKURTI PIRKIMĄ	PULIHKAN PEMBELIAN	GJENOPPRETT KJØP	PRZYWRÓĆ ZAKUP	RESTAURAR COMPRA	RESTAURAȚI ACHIZIȚIA	ВРАЋАЊЕ КУПОВИНЕ	恢复购买	OBNOVIŤ NÁKUP	OBNOVITE NAKUP	RESTAURAR COMPRA	ÅTERSTÄLL KÖP	IBALIK ANG PAGBILI	คืนค่าการซื้อ	SATİN ALMAYİ GERİ YÜKLE	ВІДНОВИТИ ПОКУПКУ	KHÔI PHỤC MUA HÀNG
subscription_privacy_policy	66	Privacy policy	Политика конфиденциальности	سياسة الخصوصية	Политика за поверителност	Política de privacitat	Pravila o privatnosti	Zásady ochrany osobních údajů	Fortrolighedspolitik	Privacybeleid	Privaatsuspoliitika	Tietosuojakäytäntö	Politique de confidentialité	Datenschutzbestimmungen	Πολιτική Απορρήτου	מדיניות פרטיות	गोपनीयता नीति	Adatvédelmi szabályzat	Kebijakan Privasi	Informativa sulla privacy	プライバシーポリシー	개인정보 처리방침	Privātuma politika	Privatumo politika	Dasar Privasi	Personvernregler	Polityka prywatności	Política de Privacidade	Politica de Confidențialitate	Политика приватности	隐私政策	Zásady ochrany osobných údajov	Politika zasebnosti	Política de privacidad	Integritetspolicy	Patakaran sa Privacy	นโยบายความเป็นส่วนตัว	Gİzlİlİk Polİtİkası	Політика конфіденційності	Chính sách bảo mật
subscription_terms_of_use	67	Terms of use	Условия использования	شروط الاستخدام	Условия за ползване	Termes d'ús	Uvjeti korištenja	Podmínky použití	Brugsvilkår	Gebruiksvoorwaarden	Kasutustingimused	Käyttöehdot	Conditions d'utilisation	Nutzungsbedingungen	Όροι Χρήσης	תנאי שימוש	उपयोग की शर्तें	Felhasználási feltételek	Syarat Penggunaan	Termini di utilizzo	利用規約	이용 약관	Lietošanas noteikumi	Naudojimo sąlygos	Syarat Penggunaan	Vilkår for bruk	Warunki korzystania	Termos de Uso	Termeni de utilizare	Услови коришћења	使用条款	Podmienky používania	Pogoji uporabe	Términos de uso	Användarvillkor	Mga Tuntunin ng Paggamit	ข้อกำหนดการใช้งาน	Kullanım Koşulları	Умови використання	Điều khoản sử dụng
subscription_description_1	68	150+ objects to color and animate	Более 150 объектов для раскрашивания и анимации	أكثر من 150 كائن للتلوين والتحريك	150+ обекта за оцветяване и анимация	Més de 150 objectes per pintar i animar	150+ objekata za bojanje i animaciju	150+ objektů k vybarvování a animaci	150+ objekter til farvelægning og animation	150+ objecten om in te kleuren en te animeren	150+ eset värvimiseks ja animeerimiseks	150+ väritettävää ja animoitavaa kohdetta	150+ objets à colorier et animer	Über 150 Objekte zum Ausmalen und Animieren	150+ αντικείμενα για χρωματισμό και κίνηση	150+ אובייקטים לצביעה והנפשה	रंगने और एनिमेट करने के लिए 150+ ऑब्जेक्ट्स	150+ színezhető és animálható objektum	150+ objek untuk diwarnai dan dianimasikan	150+ oggetti da colorare e animare	塗り絵やアニメーション用の150以上のオブジェクト	150+ 색칠 및 애니메이션 가능한 오브젝트	150+ objekti krāsošanai un animēšanai	Daugiau nei 150 objektų dažymui ir animavimui	150+ objek untuk diwarnakan dan dianimasikan	150+ objekter å fargelegge og animere	150+ obiektów do kolorowania i animacji	150+ objetos para colorir e animar	150+ obiecte de colorat și animat	150+ објеката за бојање и анимацију	150+ 个可着色和动画化的对象	150+ objektov na vyfarbovanie a animáciu	150+ objektov za barvanje in animacijo	150+ objetos para colorear y animar	150+ objekt att färglägga och animera	150+ bagay na puwedeng kulayan at i-animate	150+ วัตถุสำหรับระบายสีและทำแอนิเมชัน	Boyama ve anİmasyon İçİn 150+ nesne	150+ об'єктів для розфарбовування та анімації	Hơn 150 đối tượng để tô màu và hoạt hình
subscription_description_2	69	42 colors	42 цвета	42 لونًا	42 цвята	42 colors	42 boje	42 barev	42 farver	42 kleuren	42 värvi	42 väriä	42 couleurs	42 Farben	42 χρώματα	42 צבעים	42 रंग	42 szín	42 warna	42 colori	42色	42색	42 krāsas	42 spalvos	42 warna	42 farger	42 kolory	42 cores	42 de culori	42 боје	42种颜色	42 farieb	42 barv	42 colores	42 färger	42 kulay	42 สี	42 renk	42 кольори	42 màu
subscription_description_3	70	7 tools	7 инструментов	7 أدوات	7 инструмента	7 eines	7 alata	7 nástrojů	7 værktøjer	7 hulpmiddelen	7 tööriista	7 työkalua	7 outils	7 Werkzeuge	7 εργαλεία	7 כלים	7 टूल्स	7 eszköz	7 alat	7 strumenti	7つのツール	7가지 도구	7 rīki	7 įrankiai	7 alat	7 verktøy	7 narzędzi	7 ferramentas	7 instrumente	7 алата	7个工具	7 nástrojov	7 orodij	7 herramientas	7 verktyg	7 kasangkapan	7 เครื่องมือ	7 araç	7 інструментів	7 công cụ
subscription_description_4	71	Regular Updates	Регулярные обновления	تحديثات منتظمة	Редовни актуализации	Actualitzacions regulars	Redovna ažuriranja	Pravidelné aktualizace	Regelmæssige opdateringer	Regelmatige updates	Regulaarsed uuendused	Säännölliset päivitykset	Mises à jour régulières	Regelmäßige Updates	Τακτικές ενημερώσεις	עדכונים שוטפים	नियमित अपडेट्स	Rendszeres frissítések	Pembaruan rutin	Aggiornamenti regolari	定期的な更新	정기 업데이트	Regulāri atjauninājumi	Reguliarūs atnaujinimai	Kemas Kini Berkala	Regelmessige oppdateringer	Regularne aktualizacje	Atualizações regulares	Actualizări regulate	Редовна ажурирања	定期更新	Pravidelné aktualizácie	Redne posodobitve	Actualizaciones regulares	Regelbundna uppdateringar	Regular na mga Update	อัปเดตเป็นประจำ	Düzenlİ güncellemeler	Регулярні оновлення	Cập nhật thường xuyên
subscription_description_5	72	Lifetime access	Пожизненный доступ	وصول مدى الحياة	Доживотен достъп	Accés de per vida	Doživotni pristup	Doživotní přístup	Livstidsadgang	Levenslange toegang	Eluaegne juurdepääs	Elinikäinen käyttöoikeus	Accès à vie	Lebenslanger Zugang	Δια βίου πρόσβαση	גישה לכל החיים	आजीवन पहुंच	Élethosszig tartó hozzáférés	Akses seumur hidup	Accesso a vita	生涯アクセス	평생 액세스	Mūža piekļuve	Viso gyvenimo prieiga	Akses Seumur Hidup	Livstids tilgang	Dostęp na całe życie	Acesso vitalício	Acces pe viață	Доживотни приступ	终身访问	Doživotný prístup	Doživljenjski dostop	Acceso de por vida	Livstidsåtkomst	Panghabangbuhay na Access	เข้าถึงได้ตลอดชีวิต	Ömür boyu erİşİm	Довічний доступ	Truy cập trọn đời
subscription_description_6	73	Ad-free and kids-safe content	Контент без рекламы и безопасный для детей	محتوى خالٍ من الإعلانات وآمن للأطفال	Без реклами и безопасно съдържание за деца	Contingut sense anuncis i segur per a nens	Bez oglasa i siguran sadržaj za djecu	Obsah bez reklam a bezpečný pro děti	Reklamefrit og børnesikkert indhold	Advertentievrije en kindvriendelijke inhoud	Reklaamivaba ja lastele turvaline sisu	Mainokseton ja lapsille turvallinen sisältö	Contenu sans publicité et sécurisé pour les enfants	Werbefreie und kindersichere Inhalte	Περιεχόμενο χωρίς διαφημίσεις και ασφαλές για παιδιά	תוכן ללא פרסומות ובטוח לילדים	विज्ञापन मुक्त और बच्चों के लिए सुरक्षित सामग्री	Hirdetésmentes és gyerekbiztos tartalom	Konten bebas iklan dan aman untuk anak-anak	Contenuti senza pubblicità e sicuri per bambini	広告なしで子供に安全なコンテンツ	광고 없는 어린이 안전 콘텐츠	Bez reklāmām un drošs saturs bērniem	Be reklamų ir saugus turinys vaikams	Kandungan bebas iklan dan selamat untuk kanak-kanak	Annonsefri og barnesikker innhold	Zawartość bez reklam i bezpieczna dla dzieci	Conteúdo sem anúncios e seguro para crianças	Conținut fără reclame și sigur pentru copii	Садржај без реклама и безбедан за децу	无广告且儿童安全的内容	Obsah bez reklám a bezpečný pre deti	Brez oglasov in varna vsebina za otroke	Contenido sin anuncios y seguro para niños	Annonsfritt och barnsäkrat innehåll	Walang mga ad at ligtas para sa mga bata ang nilalaman	เนื้อหาปลอดโฆษณาและปลอดภัยสำหรับเด็ก	Reklamsız ve çocuklara güvenlİ İçerİk	Контент без реклами та безпечний для дітей	Nội dung không quảng cáo và an toàn cho trẻ em
for_parents_FAQ_Contact_Us_Title	74	Contact Us	Свяжитесь с нами	اتصل بنا	Свържете се с нас	Contacta amb nosaltres	Kontaktirajte nas	Kontaktujte nás	Kontakt os	Neem contact met ons op	Võta meiega ühendust	Ota yhteyttä	Nous contacter	Kontaktieren Sie uns	Επικοινωνήστε μαζί μας	צור קשר	हमसे संपर्क करें	Lépjen kapcsolatba velünk	Hubungi Kami	Contattaci	お問い合わせ	문의하기	Sazinieties ar mums	Susisiekite su mumis	Hubungi Kami	Kontakt oss	Skontaktuj się z nami	Fale conosco	Contactați-ne	Контактирајте нас	联系我们	Kontaktujte nás	Kontaktirajte nas	Contáctanos	Kontakta oss	Makipag-ugnayan sa amin	ติดต่อเรา	Bİze Ulaşın	Зв'яжіться з нами	Liên hệ với chúng tôi
for_parents_FAQ_4_supportLink_android	75	Google Play Refund policy & Contact Link.	Политика возврата Google Play и ссылка для связи.	سياسة استرداد Google Play ورابط الاتصال.	Политика за възстановяване на Google Play и линк за контакт.	Política de reemborsament de Google Play i enllaç de contacte.	Politika povrata Google Play-a i veza za kontakt.	Zásady vrácení peněz Google Play a kontaktní odkaz.	Google Plays refunderingspolitik og kontaktside.	Google Play terugbetalingsbeleid en contactlink.	Google Play tagasimaksepoliitika ja kontaktlink.	Google Playn hyvityskäytäntö ja yhteystietolinkki.	Politique de remboursement de Google Play et lien de contact.	Rückerstattungsrichtlinien von Google Play und Kontaktlink.	Πολιτική επιστροφής χρημάτων της Google Play και σύνδεσμος επικοινωνίας.	מדיניות ההחזרים של Google Play וקישור ליצירת קשר.	Google Play रिफंड नीति और संपर्क लिंक.	Google Play visszatérítési szabályzat és kapcsolatfelvételi link.	Kebijakan Pengembalian Dana Google Play & Tautan Kontak.	Politica di rimborso di Google Play e link per contatti.	Google Play 返金ポリシーと連絡先リンク。	Google Play 환불 정책 및 연락처 링크.	Google Play atmaksas politika un kontaktu saite.	Google Play grąžinimo politika ir kontaktinė nuoroda.	Dasar bayaran balik Google Play & Pautan Hubungan.	Google Play refusjonspolicy og kontaktside.	Polityka zwrotów Google Play i link do kontaktu.	Política de reembolso do Google Play e link de contato.	Politica de rambursare Google Play și link-ul de contact.	Политика повраћаја новца Google Play & Линк за контакт.	Google Play 退款政策和联系链接。	Pravidlá vrátenia peňazí Google Play a odkaz na kontakt.	Pravilnik o vračilu denarja za Google Play in povezava za stik.	Política de reembolso de Google Play y enlace de contacto.	Google Plays återbetalningspolicy & kontaktlänk.	Patakaran ng refund ng Google Play at link para sa pakikipag-ugnayan.	นโยบายการคืนเงินของ Google Play และลิงก์สำหรับติดต่อ	Google Play İade Politikası ve İletişim Bağlantısı.	Політика повернення коштів Google Play та посилання для зв'язку.	Chính sách hoàn tiền của Google Play và Liên kết liên hệ.
for_parents_FAQ_4_supportLink_ios	76	Apple Support.	Инструкции по возврату средств из iOS App Store можно найти здесь.	يمكنك العثور على إرشادات حول استرداد الأموال من متجر iOS App Store هنا.	Можете да намерите инструкции за получаване на възстановяване от iOS App Store тук.	Pots trobar instruccions per obtenir un reemborsament de l'App Store d'iOS aquí.	Upute za povrat novca s iOS App Storea možete pronaći ovdje.	Pokyny k získání náhrady z iOS App Store najdete zde.	Du kan finde instruktioner om at få refusion fra iOS App Store her.	Je kunt instructies vinden om een terugbetaling te krijgen van de iOS App Store hier.	Juhised raha tagasi saamiseks iOS App Store'ist leiate siit.	Ohjeet palautuksen saamiseen iOS App Storesta löydät täältä.	Vous pouvez trouver les instructions pour obtenir un remboursement depuis l'App Store iOS ici .	Anweisungen zur Rückerstattung im iOS App Store finden Sie hier.	Μπορείτε να βρείτε οδηγίες για την επιστροφή χρημάτων από το iOS App Store εδώ.	תוכל למצוא הוראות לקבלת החזר מחנות iOS כאן.	iOS ऐप स्टोर से रिफंड प्राप्त करने के निर्देश यहां देखें.	Utasításokat talál az iOS App Store-ból történő visszatérítéshez itt.	Anda dapat menemukan instruksi untuk mendapatkan pengembalian dana dari iOS App Store di sini.	Puoi trovare le istruzioni per ottenere un rimborso dall'App Store iOS qui.	iOS App Store からの返金手続きについてはこちらをご覧ください.	iOS 앱 스토어에서 환불을 받는 방법에 대한 지침은 여기에서 확인할 수 있습니다.	Norādījumus par naudas atmaksas saņemšanu no iOS App Store varat atrast šeit.	Instrukcijas, kaip gauti pinigų grąžinimą iš iOS App Store, rasite čia.	Anda boleh mencari arahan untuk mendapatkan bayaran balik dari iOS App Store di sini.	Du finner instruksjoner om hvordan du får refusjon fra iOS App Store her.	Instrukcje dotyczące uzyskania zwrotu kosztów z iOS App Store znajdziesz tutaj.	Você pode encontrar instruções para obter reembolso na App Store do iOS aqui.	Puteți găsi instrucțiuni pentru obținerea unei rambursări de la App Store-ul iOS aici.	Možete pronaći uputstva za povrat novca sa iOS App Store-a ovde.	您可以在此处找到从 iOS App Store 获得退款的说明.	Pokyny na získanie vrátenia peňazí z iOS App Store nájdete tu.	Navodila za povračilo iz iOS App Store lahko najdete tukaj.	Puedes encontrar instrucciones para obtener un reembolso de la App Store de iOS aquí.	Du kan hitta instruktioner för att få återbetalning från iOS App Store här.	Makakakita ka ng mga tagubilin kung paano makakuha ng refund mula sa iOS App Store dito.	คุณสามารถค้นหาคำแนะนำเกี่ยวกับการขอคืนเงินจาก iOS App Store ได้ที่นี่.	iOS App Store'dan para iadesi almak için talimatları burada bulabilirsiniz.	Інструкції щодо отримання відшкодування з iOS App Store ви знайдете тут.	Bạn có thể tìm hướng dẫn để nhận hoàn tiền từ iOS App Store tại đây.
for_parents_FAQ_9_question	77	Is the app free?	Приложение бесплатно?	هل التطبيق مجاني؟	Безплатно ли е приложението?	L'aplicació és gratuïta?	Je li aplikacija besplatna?	Je aplikace zdarma?	Er appen gratis?	Is de app gratis?	Kas rakendus on tasuta?	Onko sovellus ilmainen?	L'application est-elle gratuite ?	Ist die App kostenlos?	Η εφαρμογή είναι δωρεάν;	האם האפליקציה בחינם?	क्या ऐप मुफ्त है?	Ingyenes az alkalmazás?	Apakah aplikasi ini gratis?	L'app è gratuita?	アプリは無料ですか？	앱이 무료인가요?	Vai lietotne ir bezmaksas?	Ar programa yra nemokama?	Adakah aplikasi ini percuma?	Er appen gratis?	Czy aplikacja jest darmowa?	O aplicativo é gratuito?	Aplicația este gratuită?	Da li je aplikacija besplatna?	这款应用是免费的吗？	Je aplikácia zadarmo?	Ali je aplikacija brezplačna?	¿La aplicación es gratuita?	Är appen gratis?	Libre ba ang app?	แอปนี้ฟรีหรือไม่?	Uygulama ücretsiz mi?	Чи безкоштовний додаток?	Ứng dụng có miễn phí không?
for_parents_FAQ_9_answer	78	The app is free to download and includes a variety of coloring pages and animations. Additional content can be purchased as optional in-app packs.	Приложение можно бесплатно скачать и использовать. Оно включает множество раскрасок и анимаций. Дополнительный контент можно приобрести через опциональные пакеты внутри приложения.	التطبيق مجاني للتنزيل ويشمل مجموعة متنوعة من صفحات التلوين والرسوم المتحركة. يمكن شراء محتوى إضافي كحزم اختيارية داخل التطبيق.	Приложението е безплатно за изтегляне и включва разнообразие от оцветявания и анимации. Допълнително съдържание може да се закупи като опционални пакети в приложението.	L'aplicació és gratuïta per descarregar i inclou una varietat de pàgines per pintar i animacions. Contingut addicional es pot adquirir com a paquets opcionals dins de l'aplicació.	Aplikacija je besplatna za preuzimanje i uključuje razne stranice za bojanje i animacije. Dodatni sadržaj može se kupiti kao opcionalni paketi unutar aplikacije.	Aplikace je zdarma ke stažení a zahrnuje různé omalovánky a animace. Další obsah lze zakoupit jako volitelné balíčky v aplikaci.	Appen er gratis at downloade og inkluderer en række farvelægningssider og animationer. Yderligere indhold kan købes som valgfrie in-app-pakker.	De app is gratis te downloaden en bevat verschillende kleurplaten en animaties. Extra inhoud kan worden aangeschaft als optionele in-app pakketten.	Rakendus on tasuta allalaaditav ja sisaldab mitmesuguseid värvimislehti ja animatsioone. Lisasisu saab osta valikuliste rakendusesiseste pakkidena.	Sovellus on ilmainen ladata ja sisältää monia värityssivuja ja animaatioita. Lisäsisältöä voi ostaa valinnaisina sovelluksen sisäisinä paketteina.	L'application est gratuite à télécharger et comprend une variété de pages à colorier et d'animations. Du contenu supplémentaire peut être acheté sous forme de packs optionnels dans l'application.	Die App ist kostenlos herunterladbar und enthält eine Vielzahl von Malvorlagen und Animationen. Zusätzliche Inhalte können als optionale In-App-Pakete gekauft werden.	Η εφαρμογή είναι δωρεάν για λήψη και περιλαμβάνει μια ποικιλία από σελίδες ζωγραφικής και κινούμενα σχέδια. Επιπλέον περιεχόμενο μπορεί να αγοραστεί μέσω προαιρετικών πακέτων εντός της εφαρμογής.	האפליקציה ניתנת להורדה בחינם וכוללת מגוון דפי צביעה ואנימציות. תוכן נוסף ניתן לרכישה כחבילות אופציונליות בתוך האפליקציה.	ऐप मुफ्त में डाउनलोड किया जा सकता है और इसमें कई रंग भरने के पृष्ठ और एनिमेशन शामिल हैं। अतिरिक्त सामग्री को वैकल्पिक इन-ऐप पैक्स के रूप में खरीदा जा सकता है।	Az alkalmazás ingyenesen letölthető, és számos színező oldalt és animációt tartalmaz. További tartalmak vásárolhatók meg választható alkalmazáson belüli csomagokként.	Aplikasi ini gratis untuk diunduh dan mencakup berbagai halaman mewarnai dan animasi. Konten tambahan dapat dibeli sebagai paket opsional dalam aplikasi.	L'app è gratuita da scaricare e include una varietà di pagine da colorare e animazioni. Contenuti aggiuntivi possono essere acquistati come pacchetti opzionali all'interno dell'app.	アプリは無料でダウンロードでき、さまざまな塗り絵ページやアニメーションが含まれています。追加のコンテンツは、オプションのアプリ内パックとして購入できます。	앱은 무료로 다운로드할 수 있으며 다양한 색칠하기 페이지와 애니메이션이 포함되어 있습니다. 추가 콘텐츠는 선택형 인앱 패키지로 구매할 수 있습니다.	Lietotni var lejupielādēt bez maksas, un tajā ir pieejamas dažādas krāsošanas lapas un animācijas. Papildu saturu var iegādāties kā izvēles paku lietotnē.	Programą galima atsisiųsti nemokamai ir ji apima įvairius spalvinimo puslapius bei animacijas. Papildomas turinys gali būti įsigytas kaip pasirenkami paketai programoje.	Aplikasi ini percuma untuk dimuat turun dan termasuk pelbagai halaman mewarna dan animasi. Kandungan tambahan boleh dibeli sebagai pakej dalam aplikasi pilihan.	Appen er gratis å laste ned og inkluderer et utvalg fargeleggingsark og animasjoner. Ekstra innhold kan kjøpes som valgfrie pakker i appen.	Aplikacja jest darmowa do pobrania i zawiera różnorodne kolorowanki i animacje. Dodatkowe treści można kupić jako opcjonalne pakiety w aplikacji.	O aplicativo é gratuito para download e inclui uma variedade de páginas para colorir e animações. Conteúdos adicionais podem ser adquiridos como pacotes opcionais dentro do aplicativo.	Aplicația este gratuită pentru descărcare și include o varietate de pagini de colorat și animații. Conținut suplimentar poate fi achiziționat sub formă de pachete opționale în aplicație.	Aplikacija je besplatna za preuzimanje i uključuje razne stranice za bojenje i animacije. Dodatni sadržaj može se kupiti kao opcioni paketi unutar aplikacije.	这款应用可以免费下载，并包括各种涂色页和动画。额外内容可以作为应用内的可选包购买。	Aplikácia je zadarmo na stiahnutie a obsahuje rôzne maľovanky a animácie. Ďalší obsah je možné zakúpiť ako voliteľné balíčky v aplikácii.	Aplikacija je brezplačna za prenos in vključuje različne pobarvanke in animacije. Dodatno vsebino je mogoče kupiti kot izbirne pakete znotraj aplikacije.	La aplicación es gratuita para descargar e incluye una variedad de páginas para colorear y animaciones. Contenido adicional se puede adquirir como paquetes opcionales dentro de la aplicación.	Appen är gratis att ladda ner och inkluderar en mängd olika färgläggningssidor och animationer. Ytterligare innehåll kan köpas som valfria paket i appen.	Ang app ay libre i-download at may kasamang iba't ibang coloring pages at animations. Ang karagdagang content ay maaaring bilhin bilang mga opsyonal na in-app packages.	แอปนี้สามารถดาวน์โหลดได้ฟรีและมีหน้าระบายสีและแอนิเมชันมากมาย เนื้อหาเพิ่มเติมสามารถซื้อได้ในรูปแบบแพ็กเกจเสริมภายในแอป.	Uygulama ücretsiz olarak indirilebilir ve çeşitli boyama sayfaları ile animasyonlar içerir. Ek içerikler isteğe bağlı uygulama içi paketler olarak satın alınabilir.	Додаток можна завантажити безкоштовно, і він містить різноманітні розмальовки та анімації. Додатковий контент можна придбати як опціональні пакети в додатку.	Ứng dụng được tải xuống miễn phí và bao gồm nhiều trang tô màu và hoạt hình. Nội dung bổ sung có thể được mua dưới dạng gói tùy chọn trong ứng dụng.
for_parents_FAQ_10_question	79	Is the app safe for kids?	Приложение безопасно для детей?	هل التطبيق آمن للأطفال؟	Приложението безопасно ли е за деца?	És segura l'aplicació per als nens?	Je li aplikacija sigurna za djecu?	Je aplikace bezpečná pro děti?	Er appen sikker for børn?	Is de app veilig voor kinderen?	Kas rakendus on lastele ohutu?	Onko sovellus turvallinen lapsille?	L'application est-elle sûre pour les enfants ?	Ist die App sicher für Kinder?	Η εφαρμογή είναι ασφαλής για παιδιά;	האם האפליקציה בטוחה לילדים?	क्या ऐप बच्चों के लिए सुरक्षित है?	Biztonságos az alkalmazás gyerekek számára?	Apakah aplikasi ini aman untuk anak-anak?	L'app è sicura per i bambini?	アプリは子供に安全ですか？	앱이 어린이에게 안전한가요?	Vai lietotne ir droša bērniem?	Ar programa yra saugi vaikams?	Adakah aplikasi ini selamat untuk kanak-kanak?	Er appen trygg for barn?	Czy aplikacja jest bezpieczna dla dzieci?	O aplicativo é seguro para crianças?	Aplicația este sigură pentru copii?	Da li je aplikacija sigurna za decu?	这款应用对孩子安全吗？	Je aplikácia bezpečná pre deti?	Ali je aplikacija varna za otroke?	¿Es segura la aplicación para los niños?	Är appen säker för barn?	Ligtas ba ang app para sa mga bata?	แอปนี้ปลอดภัยสำหรับเด็กหรือไม่?	Uygulama çocuklar için güvenli mi?	Чи безпечний додаток для дітей?	Ứng dụng có an toàn cho trẻ em không?
for_parents_FAQ_10_answer	80	Yes, the app is designed specifically for children with strict safety measures. It has no ads, no external links, and does not collect personal data.	Да, приложение разработано специально для детей с учетом строгих мер безопасности. В нем нет рекламы, внешних ссылок и оно не собирает личные данные.	نعم، تم تصميم التطبيق خصيصًا للأطفال مع اتخاذ تدابير أمان صارمة. لا يحتوي على إعلانات أو روابط خارجية ولا يجمع بيانات شخصية.	Да, приложението е специално проектирано за деца със строги мерки за безопасност. То няма реклами, външни връзки и не събира лични данни.	Sí, l'aplicació està dissenyada específicament per a nens amb estrictes mesures de seguretat. No conté anuncis, enllaços externs ni recopila dades personals.	Da, aplikacija je dizajnirana posebno za djecu uz stroge mjere sigurnosti. Nema oglasa, vanjskih poveznica i ne prikuplja osobne podatke.	Ano, aplikace je navržena speciálně pro děti s přísnými bezpečnostními opatřeními. Nemá žádné reklamy, externí odkazy a neshromažďuje osobní údaje.	Ja, appen er designet specifikt til børn med strenge sikkerhedsforanstaltninger. Den har ingen annoncer, ingen eksterne links og indsamler ikke personlige data.	Ja, de app is speciaal ontworpen voor kinderen met strenge veiligheidsmaatregelen. Er zijn geen advertenties, geen externe links en de app verzamelt geen persoonlijke gegevens.	Jah, rakendus on loodud spetsiaalselt lastele, järgides rangeid turvameetmeid. Sellel pole reklaame, väliseid linke ega isikuandmete kogumist.	Kyllä, sovellus on suunniteltu erityisesti lapsille ja siinä on tiukat turvallisuustoimenpiteet. Siinä ei ole mainoksia, ulkoisia linkkejä eikä se kerää henkilötietoja.	Oui, l'application est conçue spécifiquement pour les enfants avec des mesures de sécurité strictes. Elle ne contient pas de publicités, pas de liens externes et ne collecte pas de données personnelles.	Ja, die App ist speziell für Kinder mit strengen Sicherheitsmaßnahmen entwickelt worden. Es gibt keine Werbung, keine externen Links und die App sammelt keine persönlichen Daten.	Ναι, η εφαρμογή έχει σχεδιαστεί ειδικά για παιδιά με αυστηρά μέτρα ασφαλείας. Δεν έχει διαφημίσεις, εξωτερικούς συνδέσμους και δεν συλλέγει προσωπικά δεδομένα.	כן, האפליקציה תוכננה במיוחד לילדים עם אמצעי בטיחות קפדניים. אין בה פרסומות, קישורים חיצוניים והיא אינה אוספת נתונים אישיים.	हाँ, ऐप को बच्चों के लिए विशेष रूप से डिज़ाइन किया गया है और इसमें सख्त सुरक्षा उपाय हैं। इसमें कोई विज्ञापन, बाहरी लिंक नहीं हैं और यह व्यक्तिगत डेटा एकत्र नहीं करता।	Igen, az alkalmazást kifejezetten gyerekek számára tervezték szigorú biztonsági intézkedésekkel. Nem tartalmaz hirdetéseket, külső hivatkozásokat, és nem gyűjt személyes adatokat.	Ya, aplikasi ini dirancang khusus untuk anak-anak dengan langkah-langkah keamanan yang ketat. Tidak ada iklan, tautan eksternal, dan tidak mengumpulkan data pribadi.	Sì, l'app è progettata specificamente per i bambini con misure di sicurezza rigorose. Non contiene pubblicità, link esterni e non raccoglie dati personali.	はい、このアプリは子供向けに設計されており、厳格な安全対策が取られています。広告や外部リンクはなく、個人情報を収集しません。	네, 이 앱은 엄격한 안전 조치를 통해 어린이를 위해 특별히 설계되었습니다. 광고나 외부 링크가 없으며 개인 정보를 수집하지 않습니다.	Jā, lietotne ir īpaši izstrādāta bērniem ar stingriem drošības pasākumiem. Tajā nav reklāmu, ārējo saišu, un tā neievāc personisko informāciju.	Taip, programa sukurta specialiai vaikams su griežtomis saugumo priemonėmis. Joje nėra reklamų, išorinių nuorodų ir ji nerenka asmens duomenų.	Ya, aplikasi ini direka khas untuk kanak-kanak dengan langkah keselamatan yang ketat. Ia tidak mengandungi iklan, pautan luar, dan tidak mengumpul data peribadi.	Ja, appen er spesielt designet for barn med strenge sikkerhetstiltak. Den har ingen annonser, ingen eksterne lenker og samler ikke inn personopplysninger.	Tak, aplikacja została zaprojektowana specjalnie dla dzieci z zastosowaniem rygorystycznych środków bezpieczeństwa. Nie zawiera reklam, linków zewnętrznych i nie zbiera danych osobowych.	Sim, o aplicativo foi desenvolvido especificamente para crianças com medidas de segurança rigorosas. Não possui anúncios, links externos e não coleta dados pessoais.	Da, aplicația este special concepută pentru copii, având măsuri stricte de siguranță. Nu are reclame, link-uri externe și nu colectează date personale.	Da, aplikacija je posebno dizajnirana za decu sa strogim merama bezbednosti. Nema reklama, spoljašnjih linkova i ne prikuplja lične podatke.	是的，这款应用是专为儿童设计的，采用了严格的安全措施。没有广告、外部链接，也不收集个人数据。	Áno, aplikácia je navrhnutá špeciálne pre deti s prísnymi bezpečnostnými opatreniami. Neobsahuje reklamy, externé odkazy a nezhromažďuje osobné údaje.	Da, aplikacija je posebej zasnovana za otroke z najstrožjimi varnostnimi ukrepi. Ne vsebuje oglasov, zunanjih povezav in ne zbira osebnih podatkov.	Sí, la aplicación está diseñada específicamente para niños con estrictas medidas de seguridad. No contiene anuncios, enlaces externos ni recopila datos personales.	Ja, appen är specifikt utformad för barn med strikta säkerhetsåtgärder. Den innehåller inga annonser, externa länkar och samlar inte in personuppgifter.	Oo, ang app ay espesyal na dinisenyo para sa mga bata at may mahigpit na safety measures. Walang ads, walang external links, at hindi ito nangongolekta ng personal data.	ใช่ แอปนี้ออกแบบมาโดยเฉพาะสำหรับเด็กพร้อมมาตรการความปลอดภัยที่เข้มงวด ไม่มีโฆษณา ไม่มีลิงก์ภายนอก และไม่เก็บข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล.	Evet, uygulama çocuklar için özel olarak tasarlanmış ve sıkı güvenlik önlemleri ile donatılmıştır. Reklam içermez, harici bağlantılar yoktur ve kişisel veri toplamaz.	Так, додаток розроблений спеціально для дітей з урахуванням суворих заходів безпеки. У ньому немає реклами, зовнішніх посилань і він не збирає особисті дані.	Có, ứng dụng được thiết kế đặc biệt cho trẻ em với các biện pháp bảo mật nghiêm ngặt. Ứng dụng không có quảng cáo, không có liên kết bên ngoài và không thu thập dữ liệu cá nhân.
for_parents_FAQ_11_question	81	How often is new content added?	Как часто добавляется новый контент?	كم مرة يتم إضافة محتوى جديد؟	Колко често се добавя ново съдържание?	Amb quina freqüència s'afegeix nou contingut?	Koliko često se dodaje novi sadržaj?	Jak často se přidává nový obsah?	Hvor ofte tilføjes nyt indhold?	Hoe vaak wordt er nieuwe inhoud toegevoegd?	Kui tihti lisatakse uut sisu?	Kuinka usein uutta sisältöä lisätään?	À quelle fréquence du nouveau contenu est-il ajouté ?	Wie oft wird neuer Inhalt hinzugefügt?	Πόσο συχνά προστίθεται νέο περιεχόμενο;	כל כמה זמן מתווסף תוכן חדש?	नया सामग्री कितनी बार जोड़ा जाता है?	Milyen gyakran kerül új tartalom hozzáadásra?	Seberapa sering konten baru ditambahkan?	Con quale frequenza vengono aggiunti nuovi contenuti?	新しいコンテンツはどのくらいの頻度で追加されますか？	새로운 콘텐츠는 얼마나 자주 추가되나요?	Cik bieži tiek pievienots jauns saturs?	Kaip dažnai pridedamas naujas turinys?	Berapa kerap kandungan baharu ditambahkan?	Hvor ofte legges det til nytt innhold?	Jak często dodawane są nowe treści?	Com que frequência novos conteúdos são adicionados?	Cât de des se adaugă conținut nou?	Koliko često se dodaje novi sadržaj?	新内容多久更新一次？	Ako často sa pridáva nový obsah?	Kako pogosto se dodaja nova vsebina?	¿Con qué frecuencia se añade contenido nuevo?	Hur ofta läggs nytt innehåll till?	Gaano kadalas nagdadagdag ng bagong content?	มีการเพิ่มเนื้อหาใหม่บ่อยแค่ไหน?	Yeni içerikler ne sıklıkla ekleniyor?	Як часто додається новий контент?	Nội dung mới được thêm vào bao lâu một lần?
for_parents_FAQ_11_answer	82	New coloring pages and animations are added regularly to keep the app fresh and engaging for your child.	Новые раскраски и анимации регулярно добавляются, чтобы приложение оставалось интересным для вашего ребенка.	يتم إضافة صفحات تلوين ورسوم متحركة جديدة بانتظام للحفاظ على التطبيق ممتعًا وجذابًا لطفلك.	Нови страници за оцветяване и анимации се добавят редовно, за да бъде приложението свежо и интересно за вашето дете.	Es van afegint regularment noves pàgines per pintar i animacions per mantenir l'aplicació interessant i entretinguda per al teu fill.	Nove stranice za bojanje i animacije redovito se dodaju kako bi aplikacija bila svježa i zanimljiva za vaše dijete.	Nové omalovánky a animace jsou pravidelně přidávány, aby byla aplikace stále zajímavá pro vaše dítě.	Nye farvelægningssider og animationer tilføjes regelmæssigt for at holde appen frisk og engagerende for dit barn.	Nieuwe kleurplaten en animaties worden regelmatig toegevoegd om de app fris en aantrekkelijk te houden voor uw kind.	Uued värvimislehed ja animatsioonid lisatakse regulaarselt, et hoida rakendus värskena ja lastele põnevana.	Uusia värityssivuja ja animaatioita lisätään säännöllisesti, jotta sovellus pysyy tuoreena ja kiinnostavana lapsellesi.	De nouvelles pages à colorier et des animations sont ajoutées régulièrement pour garder l'application fraîche et captivante pour votre enfant.	Neue Malvorlagen und Animationen werden regelmäßig hinzugefügt, um die App frisch und interessant für Ihr Kind zu halten.	Νέες σελίδες ζωγραφικής και κινούμενα σχέδια προστίθενται τακτικά για να παραμένει η εφαρμογή ενδιαφέρουσα και ελκυστική για το παιδί σας.	דפי צביעה ואנימציות חדשות מתווספים באופן קבוע כדי לשמור על חווית שימוש מרעננת ומעניינת לילדיכם.	नए रंग भरने के पृष्ठ और एनिमेशन नियमित रूप से जोड़े जाते हैं ताकि ऐप को बच्चों के लिए नया और आकर्षक बनाए रखा जा सके।	Új színező oldalak és animációk rendszeresen kerülnek hozzáadásra, hogy az alkalmazás mindig friss és vonzó maradjon a gyerekek számára.	Halaman mewarnai dan animasi baru secara rutin ditambahkan untuk menjaga aplikasi tetap segar dan menarik bagi anak Anda.	Nuove pagine da colorare e animazioni vengono aggiunte regolarmente per mantenere l'app fresca e coinvolgente per il tuo bambino.	アプリを新鮮で楽しいものに保つために、新しい塗り絵ページやアニメーションが定期的に追加されます。	앱을 신선하고 매력적으로 유지하기 위해 새로운 색칠 페이지와 애니메이션이 정기적으로 추가됩니다.	Lai lietotne būtu svaiga un interesanta jūsu bērnam, jaunas krāsošanas lapas un animācijas tiek pievienotas regulāri.	Nauji spalvinimo puslapiai ir animacijos reguliariai pridedami, kad programa būtų šviežia ir įdomi jūsų vaikui.	Halaman mewarna dan animasi baharu ditambahkan secara berkala untuk memastikan aplikasi ini kekal segar dan menarik untuk anak anda.	Nye fargeleggingsark og animasjoner legges til jevnlig for å holde appen frisk og engasjerende for barnet ditt.	Nowe kolorowanki i animacje są regularnie dodawane, aby aplikacja była świeża i interesująca dla Twojego dziecka.	Novas páginas para colorir e animações são adicionadas regularmente para manter o aplicativo atualizado e atraente para sua criança.	Pagini de colorat și animații noi sunt adăugate regulat pentru a menține aplicația proaspătă și interesantă pentru copilul dumneavoastră.	Nove stranice za bojenje i animacije se redovno dodaju kako bi aplikacija ostala sveža i zanimljiva za vaše dete.	为了保持应用的新鲜感和吸引力，我们会定期添加新的涂色页和动画。	Nové maľovanky a animácie sa pravidelne pridávajú, aby aplikácia zostala čerstvá a zaujímavá pre vaše dieťa.	Nove pobarvanke in animacije se redno dodajajo, da aplikacija ostane sveža in zanimiva za vašega otroka.	Nuevas páginas para colorear y animaciones se añaden regularmente para mantener la aplicación fresca y atractiva para tu hijo.	Nya färgläggningssidor och animationer läggs till regelbundet för att hålla appen fräsch och engagerande för ditt barn.	Regular na nagdadagdag ng bagong coloring pages at animations upang manatiling bago at nakakaengganyo ang app para sa iyong anak.	หน้าใหม่สำหรับระบายสีและแอนิเมชันจะถูกเพิ่มเป็นประจำเพื่อให้แอปยังคงสดใหม่และน่าสนใจสำหรับลูกของคุณ.	Uygulamanın taze ve çekici kalmasını sağlamak için düzenli olarak yeni boyama sayfaları ve animasyonlar eklenir.	Нові розмальовки та анімації регулярно додаються, щоб додаток залишався цікавим і актуальним для вашої дитини.	Các trang tô màu và hoạt hình mới được thêm vào thường xuyên để giữ cho ứng dụng luôn mới mẻ và hấp dẫn với con bạn.
for_parents_FAQ_12_question	83	What if the app crashes or has a problem?	Что делать, если приложение зависает или возникает проблема?	ماذا أفعل إذا توقف التطبيق عن العمل أو واجهت مشكلة؟	Какво да правя, ако приложението се срине или има проблем?	Què faig si l'aplicació falla o hi ha un problema?	Što ako aplikacija padne ili ima problema?	Co dělat, když aplikace spadne nebo má problém?	Hvad gør jeg, hvis appen går ned eller har et problem?	Wat moet ik doen als de app vastloopt of een probleem heeft?	Mida teha, kui rakendus hangub või esineb probleeme?	Mitä teen, jos sovellus kaatuu tai siinä on ongelma?	Que faire si l'application plante ou rencontre un problème ?	Was tun, wenn die App abstürzt oder ein Problem hat?	Τι να κάνω αν η εφαρμογή κολλήσει ή υπάρξει κάποιο πρόβλημα;	מה לעשות אם האפליקציה קורסת או יש בעיה?	अगर ऐप क्रैश हो जाए या कोई समस्या हो तो क्या करें?	Mit tegyek, ha az alkalmazás lefagy vagy probléma van?	Apa yang harus saya lakukan jika aplikasi macet atau ada masalah?	Cosa fare se l'app si blocca o presenta un problema?	アプリがクラッシュしたり問題が発生した場合はどうすればいいですか？	앱이 충돌하거나 문제가 발생하면 어떻게 해야 하나요?	Ko darīt, ja lietotne avarē vai rodas problēma?	Ką daryti, jei programa stringa arba kyla problema?	Apa yang perlu saya lakukan jika aplikasi ini rosak atau mempunyai masalah?	Hva gjør jeg hvis appen krasjer eller har et problem?	Co zrobić, jeśli aplikacja się zawiesza lub występuje problem?	O que fazer se o aplicativo travar ou apresentar algum problema?	Ce fac dacă aplicația se blochează sau apare o problemă?	Šta da radim ako aplikacija padne ili ima problem?	如果应用崩溃或出现问题，我该怎么办？	Čo robiť, ak aplikácia zlyhá alebo má problém?	Kaj storiti, če aplikacija zmrzne ali ima težave?	¿Qué hago si la aplicación falla o tiene algún problema?	Vad gör jag om appen kraschar eller har problem?	Ano ang gagawin kung nagka-crash o nagkaproblema ang app?	ถ้าแอปขัดข้องหรือมีปัญหาควรทำอย่างไร?	Uygulama çökerse veya bir sorun oluşursa ne yapmalıyım?	Що робити, якщо додаток дає збій або виникла проблема?	Nếu ứng dụng bị lỗi hoặc gặp sự cố thì phải làm gì?
for_parents_FAQ_12_answer	84	If you encounter any issues, you can contact our support team at {supportLink} or visit our help center at {websiteLink}. We are here to assist you!	Если вы столкнулись с проблемами, вы можете обратиться в нашу службу поддержки по адресу {supportLink} или посетить наш центр помощи на {websiteLink}. Мы здесь, чтобы вам помочь!	إذا واجهت أي مشاكل، يمكنك الاتصال بفريق الدعم الخاص بنا عبر {supportLink} أو زيارة مركز المساعدة على {websiteLink}. نحن هنا لمساعدتك!	Ако срещнете проблеми, можете да се свържете с нашия екип за поддръжка на {supportLink} или да посетите нашия център за помощ на {websiteLink}. Ние сме тук, за да ви помогнем!	Si tens algun problema, pots contactar amb el nostre equip de suport a {supportLink} o visitar el nostre centre d'ajuda a {websiteLink}. Estem aquí per ajudar-te!	Ako naiđete na bilo kakve probleme, možete kontaktirati naš tim za podršku na {supportLink} ili posjetiti naš centar za pomoć na {websiteLink}. Ovdje smo da vam pomognemo!	Pokud narazíte na nějaké problémy, můžete kontaktovat náš tým podpory na {supportLink} nebo navštívit naše centrum pomoci na {websiteLink}. Jsme tu, abychom vám pomohli!	Hvis du oplever problemer, kan du kontakte vores supportteam på {supportLink} eller besøge vores hjælpecenter på {websiteLink}. Vi er her for at hjælpe!	Als u problemen ondervindt, kunt u contact opnemen met ons ondersteuningsteam via {supportLink} of ons helpcentrum bezoeken op {websiteLink}. Wij staan klaar om u te helpen!	Kui esineb probleeme, võite võtta ühendust meie tugitiimiga aadressil {supportLink} või külastada meie abikeskust aadressil {websiteLink}. Oleme siin, et teid aidata!	Jos kohtaat ongelmia, voit ottaa yhteyttä tukitiimiimme osoitteessa {supportLink} tai käydä apukeskuksessamme osoitteessa {websiteLink}. Olemme täällä auttamassa!	Si vous rencontrez des problèmes, vous pouvez contacter notre équipe de support à {supportLink} ou visiter notre centre d'aide sur {websiteLink}. Nous sommes là pour vous aider !	Wenn Sie auf Probleme stoßen, können Sie unser Support-Team unter {supportLink} kontaktieren oder unser Hilfe-Center unter {websiteLink} besuchen. Wir sind für Sie da!	Αν αντιμετωπίσετε προβλήματα, μπορείτε να επικοινωνήσετε με την ομάδα υποστήριξής μας στο {supportLink} ή να επισκεφθείτε το κέντρο βοήθειας στο {websiteLink}. Είμαστε εδώ για να σας βοηθήσουμε!	אם אתם נתקלים בבעיה, תוכלו ליצור קשר עם צוות התמיכה שלנו בכתובת {supportLink} או לבקר במרכז העזרה שלנו בכתובת {websiteLink}. אנחנו כאן לעזור!	यदि आपको कोई समस्या आती है, तो आप हमारी सहायता टीम से {supportLink} पर संपर्क कर सकते हैं या हमारे सहायता केंद्र {websiteLink} पर जा सकते हैं। हम आपकी मदद करने के लिए यहां हैं!	Ha problémát tapasztal, lépjen kapcsolatba ügyfélszolgálatunkkal a {supportLink} címen, vagy látogasson el a segítségnyújtó központunkba a {websiteLink} oldalon. Azért vagyunk itt, hogy segítsünk!	Jika Anda mengalami masalah, Anda dapat menghubungi tim dukungan kami di {supportLink} atau kunjungi pusat bantuan kami di {websiteLink}. Kami siap membantu Anda!	Se incontri problemi, puoi contattare il nostro team di supporto all'indirizzo {supportLink} o visitare il nostro centro assistenza su {websiteLink}. Siamo qui per aiutarti!	問題が発生した場合は、{supportLink} までサポートチームに連絡するか、{websiteLink} のヘルプセンターをご覧ください。お手伝いするためにここにいます！	문제가 발생하면 {supportLink}으로 지원팀에 문의하거나 {websiteLink}의 도움말 센터를 방문하세요. 저희가 도와드리겠습니다!	Ja rodas problēmas, jūs varat sazināties ar mūsu atbalsta komandu pa e-pastu {supportLink} vai apmeklēt mūsu palīdzības centru vietnē {websiteLink}. Mēs esam šeit, lai jums palīdzētu!	Jei susidūrėte su problemomis, galite susisiekti su mūsų palaikymo komanda el. paštu {supportLink} arba apsilankyti mūsų pagalbos centre {websiteLink}. Mes esame čia, kad jums padėtume!	Jika anda menghadapi sebarang masalah, anda boleh menghubungi pasukan sokongan kami di {supportLink} atau lawati pusat bantuan kami di {websiteLink}. Kami sedia membantu anda!	Hvis du støter på problemer, kan du kontakte vårt supportteam på {supportLink} eller besøke hjelpesenteret vårt på {websiteLink}. Vi er her for å hjelpe deg!	Jeśli napotkasz problemy, możesz skontaktować się z naszym zespołem wsparcia pod adresem {supportLink} lub odwiedzić nasze centrum pomocy na {websiteLink}. Jesteśmy tutaj, aby Ci pomóc!	Se você encontrar algum problema, pode entrar em contato com nossa equipe de suporte pelo e-mail {supportLink} ou visitar nosso centro de ajuda em {websiteLink}. Estamos aqui para ajudar!	Dacă întâmpinați probleme, puteți contacta echipa noastră de suport la {supportLink} sau vizitați centrul nostru de ajutor la {websiteLink}. Suntem aici pentru a vă ajuta!	Ako naiđete na problem, možete se obratiti našem timu za podršku putem {supportLink} ili posetiti naš centar za pomoć na {websiteLink}. Tu smo da vam pomognemo!	如果您遇到问题，可以通过 {supportLink} 联系我们的支持团队，或者访问我们的网站 {websiteLink} 获取帮助。我们会尽力协助您！	Ak narazíte na problémy, môžete kontaktovať náš tím podpory na adrese {supportLink} alebo navštíviť naše centrum pomoci na {websiteLink}. Sme tu, aby sme vám pomohli!	Če naletite na težave, se lahko obrnete na našo podporno ekipo na naslovu {supportLink} ali obiščete naš center za pomoč na {websiteLink}. Tukaj smo, da vam pomagamo!	Si encuentras problemas, puedes contactar a nuestro equipo de soporte en {supportLink} o visitar nuestro centro de ayuda en {websiteLink}. ¡Estamos aquí para ayudarte!	Om du stöter på problem kan du kontakta vårt supportteam på {supportLink} eller besöka vårt hjälpcenter på {websiteLink}. Vi finns här för att hjälpa dig!	Kung may problema, maaari kang makipag-ugnayan sa aming support team sa {supportLink} o bisitahin ang aming help center sa {websiteLink}. Narito kami para tumulong!	หากคุณพบปัญหาใด ๆ คุณสามารถติดต่อทีมสนับสนุนของเราที่ {supportLink} หรือเยี่ยมชมศูนย์ช่วยเหลือของเราที่ {websiteLink}. เราพร้อมช่วยเหลือคุณ!	Bir sorunla karşılaşırsanız, {supportLink} adresinden destek ekibimizle iletişime geçebilir veya {websiteLink} adresindeki yardım merkezimizi ziyaret edebilirsiniz. Size yardımcı olmak için buradayız!	Якщо у вас виникли проблеми, ви можете звернутися до нашої служби підтримки за адресою {supportLink} або відвідати наш центр допомоги на {websiteLink}. Ми тут, щоб допомогти вам!	Nếu bạn gặp sự cố, bạn có thể liên hệ với nhóm hỗ trợ của chúng tôi qua email {supportLink} hoặc truy cập trung tâm trợ giúp của chúng tôi tại {websiteLink}. Chúng tôi ở đây để hỗ trợ bạn!
for_parents_FAQ_1_question_android	85	How can I purchase this app? 	Как я могу купить приложение?	كيف يمكنني شراء هذا التطبيق؟	Как мога да закупя това приложение?	Com puc comprar aquesta aplicació?	Kako mogu kupiti ovu aplikaciju?	Jak mohu zakoupit tuto aplikaci?	Hvordan kan jeg købe denne app?	Hoe kan ik deze app kopen?	Kuidas saan seda rakendust osta?	Miten voin ostaa tämän sovelluksen?	Comment puis-je acheter cette application ?	Wie kann ich diese App kaufen?	Πώς μπορώ να αγοράσω αυτή την εφαρμογή;	איך אני יכול לרכוש את האפליקציה הזו?	मैं इस ऐप को कैसे खरीद सकता हूँ?	Hogyan vásárolhatom meg ezt az alkalmazást?	Bagaimana cara membeli aplikasi ini?	Come posso acquistare questa app?	このアプリを購入するにはどうすればいいですか？	이 앱을 어떻게 구매할 수 있나요?	Kā es varu iegādāties šo lietotni?	Kaip galiu įsigyti šią programėlę?	Bagaimana saya boleh membeli aplikasi ini?	Hvordan kan jeg kjøpe denne appen?	Jak mogę zakupić tę aplikację?	Como posso comprar este aplicativo?	Cum pot achiziționa această aplicație?	Како могу купити ову апликацију?	如何购买这个应用程序？	Ako môžem zakúpiť túto aplikáciu?	Kako lahko kupim to aplikacijo?	¿Cómo puedo comprar esta aplicación?	Hur kan jag köpa den här appen?	Paano ko mabibili ang app na ito?	ฉันจะซื้อแอปนี้ได้อย่างไร?	Bu uygulamayı nasıl satın alabİlİrİm?	Як я можу придбати цей додаток?	Làm thế nào để tôi có thể mua ứng dụng này?
for_parents_FAQ_1_answer_android	86	Please ensure that you have a valid payment method and active internet connection prior to app launch. Then, tap on the locked content, pass through the parental gate and follow the standard purchasing flow. 	Пожалуйста, убедитесь, что у вас есть действующий способ оплаты и активное интернет-соединение перед запуском приложения. Затем нажмите на заблокированный контент, пройдите через родительский контроль и следуйте стандартной процедуре покупки.	يرجى التأكد من أن لديك وسيلة دفع صالحة واتصال بالإنترنت نشط قبل إطلاق التطبيق. ثم اضغط على المحتوى المغلق، مر عبر بوابة الوالدين واتبع عملية الشراء القياسية.	Моля, уверете се, че имате валиден метод на плащане и активна интернет връзка преди стартиране на приложението. След това докоснете заключеното съдържание, минете през родителската защита и следвайте стандартния процес за покупка.	Assegura't de tenir un mètode de pagament vàlid i connexió a internet activa abans de llançar l'aplicació. A continuació, toca el contingut bloquejat, passa pel control parental i segueix el procés estàndard de compra.	Molimo vas da osigurate valjan način plaćanja i aktivnu internetsku vezu prije pokretanja aplikacije. Zatim dodirnite zaključani sadržaj, prođite roditeljski prolaz i slijedite standardni postupak kupnje.	Nejprve se ujistěte, že máte platnou platební metodu a aktivní připojení k internetu před spuštěním aplikace. Poté klepněte na uzamčený obsah, projděte rodičovskou bránou a pokračujte standardním nákupním postupem.	Sørg venligst for, at du har en gyldig betalingsmetode og en aktiv internetforbindelse før appens lancering. Tryk derefter på det låste indhold, gå igennem forældreporten og følg den standard købsgang.	Zorg ervoor dat je een geldige betalingsmethode hebt en dat de internetverbinding actief is voordat je de app start. Tik vervolgens op de vergrendelde inhoud, ga door de ouderpoort en volg de standaard aankoopprocedure.	Palun veenduge, et teil oleks kehtiv makseviis ja aktiivne internetiühendus enne rakenduse käivitamist. Seejärel puudutage lukustatud sisu, läbige vanemakaitse ja järgige tavapärast ostuprotsessi.	Varmista, että sinulla on voimassa oleva maksutapa ja aktiivinen internetyhteys ennen sovelluksen avaamista. Napauta sitten lukittua sisältöä, kulje vanhempien portin läpi ja seuraa normaalia ostoprosessia.	Veuillez vous assurer que vous avez un mode de paiement valide et une connexion Internet active avant de lancer l'application. Ensuite, appuyez sur le contenu verrouillé, passez par la porte parentale et suivez le processus d'achat standard.	Bitte stellen Sie sicher, dass Sie über eine gültige Zahlungsmethode und eine aktive Internetverbindung verfügen, bevor Sie die App starten. Tippen Sie dann auf den gesperrten Inhalt, passieren Sie das Elternportal und folgen Sie dem Standard-Kaufprozess.	Παρακαλούμε βεβαιωθείτε ότι έχετε έγκυρο τρόπο πληρωμής και ενεργή σύνδεση στο διαδίκτυο πριν την εκκίνηση της εφαρμογής. Στη συνέχεια, πατήστε στο κλειδωμένο περιεχόμενο, περάστε την πύλη γονικού ελέγχου και ακολουθήστε την τυπική διαδικασία αγοράς.	בבקשה ודא שיש לך שיטת תשלום תקפה וחיבור לאינטרנט פעיל לפני הפעלת האפליקציה. לאחר מכן, לחץ על התוכן הנעול, עבר את שער ההורים ופעל לפי תהליך הרכישה הסטנדרטי.	कृपया ऐप लॉन्च करने से पहले यह सुनिश्चित करें कि आपके पास एक वैध भुगतान विधि और सक्रिय इंटरनेट कनेक्शन है। फिर, लॉक की गई सामग्री पर टैप करें, पैरेंटल गेट पास करें और सामान्य खरीदारी प्रक्रिया का पालन करें।	Győződjön meg arról, hogy érvényes fizetési módszerrel és aktív internetkapcsolattal rendelkezik az alkalmazás elindítása előtt. Ezután érintse meg a zárolt tartalmat, haladjon át a szülői kapun, és kövesse a szokásos vásárlási folyamatot.	Pastikan Anda memiliki metode pembayaran yang valid dan koneksi internet aktif sebelum meluncurkan aplikasi. Kemudian, ketuk konten yang terkunci, lewati gerbang orang tua, dan ikuti alur pembelian standar.	Assicurati di avere un metodo di pagamento valido e una connessione internet attiva prima di avviare l'app. Poi, tocca il contenuto bloccato, passa attraverso il gate parentale e segui il normale flusso di acquisto.	アプリを起動する前に、有効な支払い方法とアクティブなインターネット接続があることを確認してください。その後、ロックされたコンテンツをタップし、保護者ゲートを通過して、標準の購入手順に従ってください。	앱을 시작하기 전에 유효한 결제 방법과 활성 인터넷 연결이 있는지 확인하세요. 그런 다음 잠긴 콘텐츠를 누르고 부모 게이트를 통과한 후 일반 구매 절차를 따르세요.	Lūdzu, pārliecinieties, ka jums ir derīga maksājuma metode un aktīvs interneta savienojums pirms lietotnes palaišanas. Pēc tam pieskarieties bloķētajam saturam, izpildiet vecāku aizsardzības soļus un sekojiet standarta iegādes plūsmai.	Įsitikinkite, kad turite galiojantį mokėjimo būdą ir aktyvų interneto ryšį prieš paleisdami programėlę. Tada paspauskite užrakintą turinį, pereikite tėvų kontrolės vartus ir laikykitės įprasto pirkimo proceso.	Sila pastikan anda mempunyai kaedah pembayaran yang sah dan sambungan internet yang aktif sebelum melancarkan aplikasi. Kemudian, ketik pada kandungan yang dikunci, lalui pintu ibu bapa dan ikuti aliran pembelian standard.	Sørg for at du har en gyldig betalingsmetode og en aktiv internettforbindelse før du starter appen. Trykk deretter på det låste innholdet, pass gjennom foreldreporten og følg den vanlige kjøpsprosessen.	Upewnij się, że masz ważną metodę płatności i aktywne połączenie internetowe przed uruchomieniem aplikacji. Następnie dotknij zablokowanej treści, przejdź przez bramkę rodzicielską i postępuj zgodnie z typowym procesem zakupu.	Certifique-se de ter um método de pagamento válido e uma conexão à internet ativa antes de iniciar o aplicativo. Em seguida, toque no conteúdo bloqueado, passe pelo controle parental e siga o fluxo padrão de compra.	Asigură-te că ai o metodă de plată validă și o conexiune activă la internet înainte de a lansa aplicația. Apoi, atinge conținutul blocat, treci prin poarta parentală și urmează procesul standard de achiziție.	Уверите се да имате важећи начин плаћања и активну интернет конекцију пре покретања апликације. Затим тапните на закључани садржај, прођите кроз родитељску браву и пратите стандардни ток куповине.	请确保在启动应用程序之前，你有一个有效的支付方式和活跃的互联网连接。然后，点击被锁定的内容，进入家长门并按照标准购买流程进行操作。	Uistite sa, že máte platnú platobnú metódu a aktívne internetové pripojenie pred spustením aplikácie. Potom ťuknite na zamknutý obsah, prejdite cez rodičovskú bránu a postupujte podľa štandardného nákupného procesu.	Pred zagonom aplikacije se prepričajte, da imate veljavno plačilno sredstvo in aktivno internetno povezavo. Nato tapnite zaklenjeno vsebino, preidite skozi starševsko varnost in sledite standardnemu nakupnemu postopku.	Asegúrate de tener un método de pago válido y una conexión a internet activa antes de iniciar la aplicación. Luego, toca el contenido bloqueado, pasa por la puerta parental y sigue el flujo de compra estándar.	Se till att du har en giltig betalningsmetod och en aktiv internetanslutning innan du startar appen. Tryck sedan på det låsta innehållet, gå igenom föräldraporten och följ det vanliga köpprocessen.	Tiyakin na mayroon kang wastong paraan ng pagbabayad at aktibong koneksyon sa internet bago ilunsad ang app. Pagkatapos, pindutin ang naka-lock na nilalaman, dumaan sa parental gate, at sundin ang karaniwang proseso ng pagbili.	โปรดตรวจสอบให้แน่ใจว่าคุณมีวิธีการชำระเงินที่ถูกต้องและการเชื่อมต่ออินเทอร์เน็ตที่ใช้งานได้ก่อนเปิดแอป จากนั้นแตะที่เนื้อหาที่ถูกล็อก ผ่านประตูผู้ปกครอง และทำตามขั้นตอนการซื้อปกติ	Uygulamayı başlatmadan önce geçerlİ bİr ödeme yöntemİnİzİn ve aktİf bİr İnternet bağlantınızın olduğundan emİn olun. Ardından, kİlİtlİ İçerİğe dokunun, ebeveyn kapısından geçİn ve standart satın alma akışını İzleyİn.	Переконайтеся, що у вас є дійсний спосіб оплати та активне підключення до Інтернету перед запуском додатка. Потім натисніть на заблокований вміст, пройдіть через батьківський контроль і дотримуйтесь стандартного процесу купівлі.	Hãy đảm bảo rằng bạn có một phương thức thanh toán hợp lệ và kết nối Internet hoạt động trước khi khởi chạy ứng dụng. Sau đó, chạm vào nội dung bị khóa, vượt qua cổng dành cho phụ huynh và làm theo quy trình mua hàng tiêu chuẩn.
for_parents_FAQ_2_question_android	87	How can I restore/transfer my purchase?	Как восстановить/перенести покупку?	كيف يمكنني استعادة/نقل شرائي؟	Как мога да възстановя/прехвърля покупката си?	Com puc restaurar/transferir la meva compra?	Kako mogu vratiti/prenijeti svoju kupnju?	Jak mohu obnovit/přenést svůj nákup?	Hvordan kan jeg gendanne/overføre mit køb?	Hoe kan ik mijn aankoop herstellen/overdragen?	Kuidas saan oma ostu taastada/üle kanda?	Miten voin palauttaa/siirtää ostokseni?	Comment puis-je restaurer/transférer mon achat ?	Wie kann ich meinen Kauf wiederherstellen/übertragen?	Πώς μπορώ να επαναφέρω/μεταφέρω την αγορά μου;	איך אני יכול לשחזר/להעביר את הרכישה שלי?	मैं अपनी खरीदारी को कैसे पुनः प्राप्त/स्थानांतरित कर सकता हूँ?	Hogyan tudom visszaállítani/átvinni a vásárlásomat?	Bagaimana cara memulihkan/mentransfer pembelian saya?	Come posso ripristinare/trasferire il mio acquisto?	購入を復元/転送するにはどうすればいいですか？	구매를 복구/이전하려면 어떻게 해야 하나요?	Kā es varu atjaunot/pārvietot savu pirkumu?	Kaip galiu atkurti/perkelti savo pirkimą?	Bagaimana saya boleh memulihkan/memindahkan pembelian saya?	Hvordan kan jeg gjenopprette/overføre mitt kjøp?	Jak mogę przywrócić/przenieść mój zakup?	Como posso restaurar/transferir minha compra?	Cum pot restaura/transfera achiziția mea?	Како могу да вратим/пребацим куповину?	如何恢复/转移我的购买？	Ako môžem obnoviť/presunúť svoj nákup?	Kako lahko obnovim/prenesem svoj nakup?	¿Cómo puedo restaurar/transferir mi compra?	Hur kan jag återställa/överföra mitt köp?	Paano ko mare-restore/malilipat ang aking binili?	ฉันจะกู้คืน/โอนการซื้อของฉันได้อย่างไร?	Satın alımımı nasıl gerİ yükleyebİlİrİm/aktarabİlİrİm?	Як я можу відновити/передати свою покупку?	Làm thế nào tôi có thể khôi phục/chuyển giao mua hàng của mình?
for_parents_FAQ_2_answer_android	88	"Please follow these steps:
1. Set up the account from which the purchase was initially performed.
2. Download the app using that account.
3. Ensure internet connection is ON.
4. Launch the app.
Note: IAPs restoration is only possible within the original store"	"Пожалуйста, выполните следующие шаги:
1. Настройте учетную запись, с которой была произведена покупка.
2. Загрузите приложение, используя эту учетную запись.
3. Убедитесь, что интернет-соединение включено.
4. Запустите приложение.
Примечание: восстановление покупок возможно только в пределах оригинального магазина."	"يرجى اتباع الخطوات التالية:
1. قم بإعداد الحساب الذي تم من خلاله الشراء الأصلي.
2. قم بتنزيل التطبيق باستخدام هذا الحساب.
3. تأكد من أن الاتصال بالإنترنت مفعل.
4. قم بتشغيل التطبيق.
ملاحظة: يمكن استعادة عمليات الشراء داخل التطبيق فقط داخل المتجر الأصلي."	"Моля, следвайте следните стъпки:
1. Настройте акаунта, от който е направена първоначалната покупка.
2. Изтеглете приложението, използвайки този акаунт.
3. Уверете се, че интернет връзката е включена.
4. Стартирайте приложението.
Забележка: възстановяването на покупки в приложението е възможно само в оригиналния магазин."	"Segueix aquests passos:
1. Configura el compte des del qual es va fer la compra inicial.
2. Descarrega l'aplicació utilitzant aquest compte.
3. Assegura't que la connexió a internet estigui activada.
4. Lança l'aplicació.
Nota: la restauració de compres només és possible dins de la botiga original."	"Slijedite ove korake:
1. Postavite račun s kojeg je izvršena kupnja.
2. Preuzmite aplikaciju koristeći taj račun.
3. Provjerite je li internetska veza UKLJUČENA.
4. Pokrenite aplikaciju.
Napomena: obnova kupnji u aplikaciji moguća je samo unutar izvorne trgovine."	"Postupujte takto:
1. Nastavte účet, ze kterého byl původní nákup proveden.
2. Stáhněte aplikaci pomocí tohoto účtu.
3. Ujistěte se, že máte zapnuté připojení k internetu.
4. Spusťte aplikaci.
Poznámka: Obnova nákupů je možná pouze v původním obchodě."	"Følg venligst disse trin:
1. Opret kontoen, hvorfra købet oprindeligt blev foretaget.
2. Download appen ved hjælp af denne konto.
3. Sørg for, at internetforbindelsen er TÆNDT.
4. Start appen.
Bemærk: Genoprettelse af køb er kun muligt i den oprindelige butik."	"Volg deze stappen:
1. Stel het account in waarmee de aankoop oorspronkelijk is gedaan.
2. Download de app met dat account.
3. Zorg ervoor dat de internetverbinding AAN staat.
4. Start de app.
Opmerking: Het herstellen van in-app aankopen is alleen mogelijk binnen de oorspronkelijke winkel."	"Järgige neid samme:
1. Looge konto, millega ost algselt tehti.
2. Laadige rakendus alla selle kontoga.
3. Veenduge, et internetiühendus oleks sisse lülitatud.
4. Käivitage rakendus.
Märkus: Rakendusesiseste ostude taastamine on võimalik ainult algses poes."	"Seuraa näitä vaiheita:
1. Aseta tili, jolla osto alun perin tehtiin.
2. Lataa sovellus kyseisellä tilillä.
3. Varmista, että internetyhteys on päällä.
4. Käynnistä sovellus.
Huomaa: Sovelluksen sisäisten ostosten palautus on mahdollista vain alkuperäisessä kaupassa."	"Veuillez suivre ces étapes :
1. Configurez le compte à partir duquel l'achat a été effectué.
2. Téléchargez l'application en utilisant ce compte.
3. Assurez-vous que la connexion Internet est activée.
4. Lancez l'application.
Remarque : La restauration des achats intégrés est uniquement possible dans la boutique d'origine."	"Bitte folgen Sie diesen Schritten:
1. Richten Sie das Konto ein, über das der ursprüngliche Kauf getätigt wurde.
2. Laden Sie die App mit diesem Konto herunter.
3. Stellen Sie sicher, dass die Internetverbindung eingeschaltet ist.
4. Starten Sie die App.
Hinweis: Die Wiederherstellung von In-App-Käufen ist nur im ursprünglichen Store möglich."	"Ακολουθήστε τα εξής βήματα:
1. Ρυθμίστε τον λογαριασμό από τον οποίο πραγματοποιήθηκε η αρχική αγορά.
2. Κατεβάστε την εφαρμογή χρησιμοποιώντας αυτόν τον λογαριασμό.
3. Βεβαιωθείτε ότι η σύνδεση στο διαδίκτυο είναι ενεργοποιημένη.
4. Εκκινήστε την εφαρμογή.
Σημείωση: Η επαναφορά των αγορών εντός εφαρμογής είναι δυνατή μόνο εντός του αρχικού καταστήματος."	"בבקשה פעל לפי הצעדים הבאים:
1. הגדר את החשבון שממנו התבצעה הרכישה.
2. הורד את האפליקציה באמצעות אותו חשבון.
3. ודא שחיבור האינטרנט מופעל.
4. הפעל את האפליקציה.
הערה: שחזור רכישות בתוך האפליקציה אפשרי רק בתוך החנות המקורית."	"कृपया इन चरणों का पालन करें:
1. उस खाते को सेटअप करें जिससे प्रारंभिक खरीदारी की गई थी।
2. उस खाते का उपयोग करके ऐप डाउनलोड करें।
3. सुनिश्चित करें कि इंटरनेट कनेक्शन चालू है।
4. ऐप लॉन्च करें।
नोट: इन-ऐप खरीदारी की पुनः प्राप्ति केवल मूल स्टोर के भीतर संभव है।"	"Kérjük, kövesse az alábbi lépéseket:
1. Állítsa be azt a fiókot, amellyel az eredeti vásárlás történt.
2. Töltse le az alkalmazást azzal a fiókkal.
3. Győződjön meg róla, hogy az internetkapcsolat be van kapcsolva.
4. Indítsa el az alkalmazást.
Megjegyzés: Az alkalmazáson belüli vásárlások visszaállítása csak az eredeti áruházban lehetséges."	"Silakan ikuti langkah-langkah berikut:
1. Siapkan akun yang digunakan untuk melakukan pembelian awal.
2. Unduh aplikasi menggunakan akun tersebut.
3. Pastikan koneksi internet AKTIF.
4. Luncurkan aplikasi.
Catatan: Pemulihan pembelian dalam aplikasi hanya dapat dilakukan di toko asli."	"Segui questi passaggi:
1. Configura l'account da cui è stato effettuato l'acquisto iniziale.
2. Scarica l'app utilizzando quell'account.
3. Assicurati che la connessione internet sia ATTIVA.
4. Avvia l'app.
Nota: Il ripristino degli acquisti in-app è possibile solo all'interno dello store originale."	"次の手順に従ってください:
1. 最初に購入を行ったアカウントを設定します。
2. そのアカウントを使用してアプリをダウンロードします。
3. インターネット接続がオンになっていることを確認してください。
4. アプリを起動します。
注: アプリ内購入の復元は元のストア内でのみ可能です。"	"다음 단계를 따르세요:
1. 원래 구매가 이루어진 계정을 설정하세요.
2. 해당 계정을 사용하여 앱을 다운로드하세요.
3. 인터넷 연결이 활성화되어 있는지 확인하세요.
4. 앱을 실행하세요.
참고: 인앱 구매 복구는 원래의 스토어 내에서만 가능합니다."	"Lūdzu, izpildiet šos soļus:
1. Izveidojiet kontu, no kura tika veikts sākotnējais pirkums.
2. Lejupielādējiet lietotni, izmantojot šo kontu.
3. Pārliecinieties, ka interneta savienojums ir IESLĒGTS.
4. Palaidiet lietotni.
Piezīme: IAP atjaunošana ir iespējama tikai sākotnējā veikalā."	"Atlikite šiuos veiksmus:
1. Sukurkite paskyrą, iš kurios buvo atliktas pirminis pirkimas.
2. Atsisiųskite programėlę naudodami tą paskyrą.
3. Įsitikinkite, kad interneto ryšys yra įjungtas.
4. Paleiskite programėlę.
Pastaba: Pirkimų atkūrimas galimas tik pradiniame parduotuvėje."	"Sila ikuti langkah-langkah berikut:
1. Tetapkan akaun yang digunakan untuk pembelian asal.
2. Muat turun aplikasi menggunakan akaun tersebut.
3. Pastikan sambungan internet diaktifkan.
4. Lancarkan aplikasi.
Nota: Pemulihan pembelian dalam aplikasi hanya boleh dilakukan di kedai asal."	"Vennligst følg disse trinnene:
1. Sett opp kontoen som opprinnelig ble brukt til kjøpet.
2. Last ned appen ved å bruke den kontoen.
3. Sørg for at internettforbindelsen er PÅ.
4. Start appen.
Merk: Gjenoppretting av kjøp i appen er kun mulig i den opprinnelige butikken."	"Postępuj zgodnie z poniższymi krokami:
1. Skonfiguruj konto, z którego dokonano pierwotnego zakupu.
2. Pobierz aplikację, używając tego konta.
3. Upewnij się, że połączenie internetowe jest WŁĄCZONE.
4. Uruchom aplikację.
Uwaga: Przywracanie zakupów w aplikacji jest możliwe tylko w oryginalnym sklepie."	"Por favor, siga os seguintes passos:
1. Configure a conta usada para a compra inicial.
2. Baixe o aplicativo usando essa conta.
3. Certifique-se de que a conexão à internet esteja ATIVA.
4. Inicie o aplicativo.
Nota: A restauração de compras dentro do aplicativo só é possível na loja original."	"Te rugăm să urmezi acești pași:
1. Configurează contul de pe care s-a efectuat achiziția inițială.
2. Descarcă aplicația folosind acel cont.
3. Asigură-te că conexiunea la internet este ACTIVĂ.
4. Lansează aplicația.
Notă: Restaurarea achizițiilor în aplicație este posibilă doar în magazinul original."	"Молимо вас да следите ове кораке:
1. Подесите налог са ког је обављена почетна куповина.
2. Преузмите апликацију користећи тај налог.
3. Уверите се да је интернет конекција УКЉУЧЕНА.
4. Покрените апликацију.
Напомена: Враћање куповине у апликацији могуће је само у оригиналној продавници."	"请按以下步骤操作:
1. 设置最初购买时使用的账户。
2. 使用该账户下载应用程序。
3. 确保互联网连接已开启。
4. 启动应用程序。
注意: 应用内购买的恢复只能在原始商店中完成。"	"Postupujte podľa týchto krokov:
1. Nastavte si účet, z ktorého bol nákup pôvodne vykonaný.
2. Stiahnite si aplikáciu pomocou tohto účtu.
3. Uistite sa, že internetové pripojenie je ZAPNUTÉ.
4. Spustite aplikáciu.
Poznámka: Obnovenie nákupov v aplikácii je možné len v pôvodnom obchode."	"Sledite naslednjim korakom:
1. Nastavite račun, s katerega je bil prvotno opravljen nakup.
2. Prenesite aplikacijo z uporabo tega računa.
3. Prepričajte se, da je internetna povezava VKLOPLJENA.
4. Zaženite aplikacijo.
Opomba: Obnovitev nakupov znotraj aplikacije je možna samo v izvirni trgovini."	"Por favor, sigue estos pasos:
1. Configura la cuenta desde la que se realizó la compra inicialmente.
2. Descarga la aplicación utilizando esa cuenta.
3. Asegúrate de que la conexión a internet esté ACTIVADA.
4. Inicia la aplicación.
Nota: La restauración de compras dentro de la aplicación solo es posible en la tienda original."	"Följ dessa steg:
1. Ställ in kontot som användes vid det ursprungliga köpet.
2. Ladda ner appen med det kontot.
3. Se till att internetanslutningen är PÅ.
4. Starta appen.
Observera: Återställning av köp i appen är endast möjligt i den ursprungliga butiken."	"Mangyaring sundin ang mga hakbang na ito:
1. I-set up ang account na ginamit sa orihinal na pagbili.
2. I-download ang app gamit ang account na iyon.
3. Tiyakin na ang koneksyon sa internet ay NAKA-ON.
4. Ilunsad ang app.
Tandaan: Ang pag-restore ng mga in-app purchase ay posible lamang sa orihinal na tindahan."	"โปรดทำตามขั้นตอนเหล่านี้:
1. ตั้งค่าบัญชีที่ใช้ในการซื้อครั้งแรก
2. ดาวน์โหลดแอปโดยใช้บัญชีนั้น
3. ตรวจสอบให้แน่ใจว่าการเชื่อมต่ออินเทอร์เน็ตเปิดอยู่
4. เปิดแอป
หมายเหตุ: การกู้คืนการซื้อในแอปสามารถทำได้เฉพาะในร้านค้าเดิมเท่านั้น"	"Lütfen aşağıdakİ adımları İzleyİn:
1. Satın alımın başlangıçta yapıldığı hesabı ayarlayın.
2. Bu hesabı kullanarak uygulamayı İndİrİn.
3. İnternet bağlantısının AÇİK olduğundan emİn olun.
4. Uygulamayı başlatın.
Not: Uygulama İçİ satın alımların gerİ yüklenmesİ yalnızca orİjİnal mağazada mümkündür."	"Будь ласка, виконайте наступні дії:
1. Налаштуйте обліковий запис, за допомогою якого була здійснена початкова покупка.
2. Завантажте додаток, використовуючи цей обліковий запис.
3. Переконайтеся, що підключення до Інтернету ввімкнено.
4. Запустіть додаток.
Примітка: Відновлення покупок у додатку можливе лише в оригінальному магазині."	"Vui lòng làm theo các bước sau:
1. Thiết lập tài khoản mà từ đó bạn đã thực hiện mua hàng ban đầu.
2. Tải xuống ứng dụng bằng tài khoản đó.
3. Đảm bảo kết nối Internet đang BẬT.
4. Khởi chạy ứng dụng.
Lưu ý: Việc khôi phục mua hàng trong ứng dụng chỉ khả dụng trong cửa hàng ban đầu."
for_parents_FAQ_3_question_android	89	Can I share my in-app purchases using the Google Play Family Library?	Могу ли я поделиться своими внутриигровыми покупками с помощью Google Play Family Library?	هل يمكنني مشاركة مشترياتي داخل التطبيق باستخدام مكتبة العائلة في Google Play؟	Мога ли да споделям покупките си в приложението чрез Google Play Family Library?	Puc compartir les meves compres dins de l'aplicació mitjançant Google Play Family Library?	Mogu li dijeliti svoje kupnje u aplikaciji putem Google Play Family Library?	Mohu sdílet své nákupy v aplikaci pomocí Google Play Family Library?	Kan jeg dele mine køb i appen via Google Play Family Library?	Kan ik mijn in-app aankopen delen via Google Play Family Library?	Kas ma saan oma rakendusesiseseid oste jagada Google Play Family Library abil?	Voinko jakaa sovelluksen sisäisiä ostojani Google Play Family Libraryn avulla?	Puis-je partager mes achats intégrés via la Google Play Family Library ?	Kann ich meine In-App-Käufe über die Google Play Family Library teilen?	Μπορώ να μοιραστώ τις αγορές μου εντός εφαρμογής μέσω της Βιβλιοθήκης Οικογένειας Google Play;	האם אני יכול לשתף את הרכישות שלי באפליקציה באמצעות ספריית המשפחה של Google Play?	क्या मैं अपने इन-ऐप खरीदारी को Google Play फैमिली लाइब्रेरी के माध्यम से साझा कर सकता हूँ?	Megoszthatom az alkalmazáson belüli vásárlásaimat a Google Play Family Library használatával?	Apakah saya dapat membagikan pembelian dalam aplikasi saya melalui Google Play Family Library?	Posso condividere i miei acquisti in-app utilizzando la Google Play Family Library?	Google Play ファミリーライブラリを使用してアプリ内購入を共有できますか？	Google Play 패밀리 라이브러리를 사용하여 인앱 구매를 공유할 수 있습니까?	Vai es varu koplietot savus pirkumus lietotnē, izmantojot Google Play ģimenes bibliotēku?	Ar galiu dalintis savo pirkimais programėlėje naudodamas Google Play šeimos biblioteką?	Bolehkah saya berkongsi pembelian dalam apl saya menggunakan Google Play Family Library?	Kan jeg dele mine kjøp i appen ved hjelp av Google Play Family Library?	Czy mogę udostępniać swoje zakupy w aplikacji za pomocą Google Play Family Library?	Posso compartilhar minhas compras no aplicativo usando o Google Play Family Library?	Pot împărtăși achizițiile mele din aplicație folosind Google Play Family Library?	Могу ли да делим своје куповине у апликацији користећи Google Play Family Library?	我可以使用 Google Play 家庭共享库分享我的应用内购买吗?	Môžem zdieľať svoje nákupy v aplikácii pomocou Google Play Family Library?	Ali lahko svoje nakupe v aplikaciji delim z uporabo Google Play Family Library?	¿Puedo compartir mis compras dentro de la aplicación utilizando Google Play Family Library?	Kan jag dela mina köp i appen med Google Play Family Library?	Maaari ko bang ibahagi ang aking mga pagbili sa loob ng app gamit ang Google Play Family Library?	ฉันสามารถแชร์การซื้อในแอปของฉันโดยใช้ Google Play Family Library ได้ไหม?	Google Play Famİly Lİbrary kullanarak uygulama İçİ satın alımlarımı paylaşabİlİr mİyİm?	Чи можу я поділитися своїми покупками в додатку за допомогою Google Play Family Library?	Tôi có thể chia sẻ các giao dịch mua trong ứng dụng của mình bằng Google Play Family Library không?
for_parents_FAQ_3_answer_android	90	Unfortunately, it's not eligible to share in-app purchases in the Google Play Family Library. Each app store has its own sharing capabilities and that goes beyond our control. 	К сожалению, нельзя делиться внутриигровыми покупками в Google Play Family Library. Каждая платформа имеет свои возможности обмена, которые не зависят от нас.	للأسف، لا يمكن مشاركة المشتريات داخل التطبيق في مكتبة العائلة في Google Play. كل متجر تطبيقات لديه قدرات مشاركة خاصة به وهذه الأمور خارجة عن سيطرتنا	За съжаление, не е възможно да споделяте покупки в приложението чрез Google Play Family Library. Всеки магазин за приложения има свои собствени възможности за споделяне, които са извън нашия контрол.	Malauradament, no es poden compartir compres dins de l'aplicació a través de Google Play Family Library. Cada botiga d'aplicacions té les seves pròpies capacitats de compartició, que estan fora del nostre control.	Nažalost, nije moguće dijeliti kupnje u aplikaciji putem Google Play Family Library. Svaka trgovina aplikacijama ima svoje mogućnosti dijeljenja, što je izvan naše kontrole.	Bohužel, není možné sdílet nákupy v aplikaci v Google Play Family Library. Každý obchod s aplikacemi má své vlastní možnosti sdílení, které jsou mimo naši kontrolu.	Desværre kan køb i appen ikke deles via Google Play Family Library. Hver appbutik har sine egne delingsmuligheder, som er uden for vores kontrol.	Helaas kunnen in-app aankopen niet worden gedeeld via Google Play Family Library. Elke app store heeft zijn eigen deelmogelijkheden, wat buiten onze controle ligt.	Kahjuks ei saa rakendusesiseseid oste jagada Google Play Family Library kaudu. Igal rakenduse poel on oma jagamisvõimalused, mis jäävad meie kontrolli alt välja.	Valitettavasti sovelluksen sisäisiä ostoja ei voi jakaa Google Play Family Libraryn kautta. Jokaisella sovelluskaupalla on omat jakomahdollisuutensa, jotka ovat meidän vaikutusvaltamme ulkopuolella.	Malheureusement, il n'est pas possible de partager des achats intégrés via la Google Play Family Library. Chaque magasin d'applications a ses propres capacités de partage, qui échappent à notre contrôle.	Leider können In-App-Käufe nicht über die Google Play Family Library geteilt werden. Jeder App-Store hat seine eigenen Freigabemöglichkeiten, die außerhalb unserer Kontrolle liegen.	Δυστυχώς, δεν είναι δυνατή η κοινή χρήση αγορών εντός εφαρμογής μέσω της Βιβλιοθήκης Οικογένειας Google Play. Κάθε κατάστημα εφαρμογών έχει τις δικές του δυνατότητες κοινής χρήσης, που είναι πέρα από τον έλεγχό μας.	למרבה הצער, לא ניתן לשתף רכישות בתוך האפליקציה באמצעות ספריית המשפחה של Google Play. לכל חנות אפליקציות יש את היכולות לשיתוף משלה, וזה מעבר לשליטתנו.	दुर्भाग्यवश, Google Play फैमिली लाइब्रेरी के माध्यम से इन-ऐप खरीदारी साझा करना संभव नहीं है। प्रत्येक ऐप स्टोर की अपनी साझाकरण क्षमताएँ होती हैं, जो हमारे नियंत्रण से बाहर हैं।	Sajnos az alkalmazáson belüli vásárlások nem oszthatók meg a Google Play Family Library-ben. Minden alkalmazásboltnak megvannak a saját megosztási képességei, amelyek kívül esnek az irányításunkon.	Sayangnya, pembelian dalam aplikasi tidak memenuhi syarat untuk dibagikan di Google Play Family Library. Setiap toko aplikasi memiliki kemampuan berbagi tersendiri dan hal itu berada di luar kendali kami.	Sfortunatamente, non è possibile condividere gli acquisti in-app con la Google Play Family Library. Ogni app store ha le proprie capacità di condivisione, che sono fuori dal nostro controllo.	残念ながら、Google Play ファミリーライブラリでアプリ内購入を共有することはできません。各アプリストアには独自の共有機能があり、これは私たちの管理範囲を超えています。	불행히도 Google Play 패밀리 라이브러리에서 인앱 구매를 공유할 수 없습니다. 각 앱 스토어는 자체적인 공유 기능을 가지고 있으며, 이는 저희 통제 범위를 벗어납니다.	Diemžēl nav iespējams koplietot lietotnē veiktos pirkumus, izmantojot Google Play ģimenes bibliotēku. Katram lietotņu veikalam ir savas koplietošanas iespējas, kas ir ārpus mūsu kontroles.	Deja, negalima dalintis pirkimais programėlėje per Google Play šeimos biblioteką. Kiekviena programėlių parduotuvė turi savo dalijimosi galimybes, kurios nėra mūsų kontrolėje.	Malangnya, tidak boleh berkongsi pembelian dalam apl melalui Google Play Family Library. Setiap kedai apl mempunyai keupayaan perkongsian mereka sendiri, dan ini berada di luar kawalan kami.	Dessverre er det ikke mulig å dele kjøp i appen via Google Play Family Library. Hver app-butikk har sine egne delingsmuligheter, og dette ligger utenfor vår kontroll.	Niestety, nie można udostępniać zakupów w aplikacji za pośrednictwem Google Play Family Library. Każdy sklep z aplikacjami ma własne możliwości udostępniania, które wykraczają poza naszą kontrolę.	Infelizmente, não é possível compartilhar compras no aplicativo através do Google Play Family Library. Cada loja de aplicativos tem suas próprias capacidades de compartilhamento, o que foge ao nosso controle.	Din păcate, nu este posibil să împărtășești achizițiile din aplicație prin Google Play Family Library. Fiecare magazin de aplicații are propriile sale capacități de partajare, care sunt dincolo de controlul nostru.	Нажалост, није могуће делити куповине у апликацији преко Google Play Family Library. Свака продавница апликација има своје могућности за дељење, што је ван наше контроле.	很遗憾，无法通过 Google Play 家庭共享库分享应用内购买。每个应用商店都有自己的共享功能，这超出了我们的控制范围。	Bohužiaľ, nie je možné zdieľať nákupy v aplikácii prostredníctvom Google Play Family Library. Každý obchod s aplikáciami má svoje vlastné možnosti zdieľania, ktoré sú mimo našej kontroly.	Žal ni mogoče deliti nakupov v aplikaciji prek Google Play Family Library. Vsaka trgovina z aplikacijami ima svoje zmogljivosti za deljenje, kar je zunaj našega nadzora.	Desafortunadamente, no es posible compartir compras dentro de la aplicación a través de Google Play Family Library. Cada tienda de aplicaciones tiene sus propias capacidades de compartición, lo cual está fuera de nuestro control.	Tyvärr är det inte möjligt att dela köp i appen via Google Play Family Library. Varje appbutik har sina egna delningsfunktioner, vilket ligger utanför vår kontroll.	Sa kasamaang-palad, hindi maaaring ibahagi ang mga pagbili sa loob ng app gamit ang Google Play Family Library. Bawat tindahan ng app ay may sariling mga kakayahan sa pagbabahagi, na wala sa aming kontrol.	น่าเสียดายที่ไม่สามารถแชร์การซื้อในแอปผ่าน Google Play Family Library ได้ แต่ละร้านแอปมีความสามารถในการแชร์เป็นของตัวเองซึ่งอยู่นอกเหนือการควบคุมของเรา	Maalesef, Google Play Famİly Lİbrary'de uygulama İçİ satın alımları paylaşmak mümkün değİldİr. Her uygulama mağazası kendİ paylaşım yeteneklerİne sahİptİr ve bu durum kontrolümüz dışındadır.	На жаль, неможливо поділитися покупками в додатку через Google Play Family Library. Кожен магазин додатків має власні можливості для спільного використання, що знаходиться поза нашим контролем.	Rất tiếc, không thể chia sẻ các giao dịch mua trong ứng dụng qua Google Play Family Library. Mỗi cửa hàng ứng dụng có khả năng chia sẻ riêng của mình và điều này nằm ngoài tầm kiểm soát của chúng tôi.
for_parents_FAQ_4_question_android	91	How do I get a refund for an accidental purchase?	Как я могу вернуть деньги за случайную покупку?	كيف يمكنني استرداد الأموال مقابل عملية شراء خاطئة؟	Как мога да получа възстановяване за случайна покупка?	Com puc obtenir un reemborsament per una compra accidental?	Kako mogu dobiti povrat novca za slučajnu kupnju?	Jak mohu získat vrácení peněz za náhodný nákup?	Hvordan får jeg refunderet et utilsigtet køb?	Hoe kan ik een terugbetaling krijgen voor een per ongeluk gemaakte aankoop?	Kuidas ma saan juhusliku ostu eest raha tagasi?	Kuinka saan hyvityksen vahingossa tehdystä ostosta?	Comment puis-je obtenir un remboursement pour un achat accidentel ?	Wie bekomme ich eine Rückerstattung für einen versehentlichen Kauf?	Πώς μπορώ να λάβω επιστροφή χρημάτων για τυχαία αγορά;	כיצד ניתן לקבל החזר על רכישה שנעשתה בטעות?	गलती से की गई खरीदारी के लिए मैं रिफंड कैसे प्राप्त कर सकता हूँ?	Hogyan kérhetek visszatérítést véletlen vásárlás esetén?	Bagaimana cara mendapatkan pengembalian dana untuk pembelian yang tidak disengaja?	Come posso ottenere un rimborso per un acquisto effettuato per errore?	誤って購入した場合、返金を受けるにはどうすればよいですか？	실수로 구매한 항목에 대해 환불을 받으려면 어떻게 해야 하나요?	Kā es varu saņemt kompensāciju par nejaušu pirkumu?	Kaip gauti pinigų grąžinimą už atsitiktinį pirkimą?	Bagaimana saya boleh mendapatkan bayaran balik untuk pembelian yang tidak disengajakan?	Hvordan kan jeg få refusjon for et utilsiktet kjøp?	Jak mogę uzyskać zwrot pieniędzy za przypadkowy zakup?	Como posso obter um reembolso para uma compra acidental?	Cum pot obține o rambursare pentru o achiziție accidentală?	Како могу да добијем повраћај новца за случајну куповину?	我如何获得意外购买的退款?	Ako môžem získať vrátenie peňazí za náhodný nákup?	Kako lahko dobim povračilo za nenameren nakup?	¿Cómo puedo obtener un reembolso por una compra accidental?	Hur får jag en återbetalning för ett oavsiktligt köp?	Paano ako makakakuha ng refund para sa isang aksidenteng pagbili?	ฉันจะขอคืนเงินสำหรับการซื้อโดยไม่ตั้งใจได้อย่างไร?	Yanlışlıkla yapılan bİr satın alma İçİn nasıl para İadesİ alabİlİrİm?	Як отримати повернення коштів за випадкову покупку?	Làm thế nào để tôi được hoàn tiền cho một giao dịch mua vô tình?
for_parents_FAQ_4_answer_android	92	We have no authority over any payment-related procedures. If you use Android, kindly adhere to the store's refund policy and directly reach out to the Google Play support team for assistance regarding payment concerns or refund inquiries.	Мы не имеем полномочий в отношении процедур, связанных с оплатой. Если вы используете Android, пожалуйста, следуйте политике возврата магазина и свяжитесь с командой поддержки Google Play для решения вопросов по оплате или возврату.	ليس لدينا أي سلطة على أي إجراءات متعلقة بالدفع. إذا كنت تستخدم Android، يُرجى الالتزام بسياسة استرداد المتجر والتواصل مباشرة مع فريق دعم Google Play للحصول على المساعدة بخصوص مشكلات الدفع أو استفسارات الاسترداد.	Ние нямаме правомощия относно процедурите, свързани с плащания. Ако използвате Android, моля, следвайте политиката за възстановяване на магазина и се свържете директно с екипа за поддръжка на Google Play за помощ относно плащания или въпроси за възстановяване.	No tenim autoritat sobre cap procediment relacionat amb pagaments. Si utilitzeu Android, seguiu la política de reemborsament de la botiga i poseu-vos en contacte directament amb l'equip d'assistència de Google Play per obtenir ajuda amb els problemes de pagament o les sol·licituds de reemborsament.	Nemamo ovlasti nad postupcima povezanim s plaćanjem. Ako koristite Android, molimo da se pridržavate politike povrata trgovine i izravno kontaktirate tim za podršku Google Play-a u vezi s pitanjima plaćanja ili zahtjevima za povrat.	Nemáme žádnou pravomoc nad žádnými platebními procesy. Pokud používáte Android, prosím, dodržujte zásady vrácení peněz obchodu a obraťte se přímo na podporu Google Play ohledně platebních problémů nebo dotazů na vrácení peněz.	Vi har ingen myndighed over nogen betalingsrelaterede procedurer. Hvis du bruger Android, bedes du følge butikkens refunderingspolitik og kontakte Google Plays supportteam direkte for hjælp med betalingsproblemer eller forespørgsler om refundering.	Wij hebben geen zeggenschap over betalingen. Als je Android gebruikt, volg dan het terugbetalingsbeleid van de store en neem rechtstreeks contact op met het Google Play ondersteuningsteam voor hulp bij betalingsproblemen of vragen over terugbetalingen.	Meil pole maksetega seotud protseduuride üle kontrolli. Kui kasutate Androidi, järgige poe tagasimaksepoliitikat ja võtke maksetega seotud probleemide või tagasimaksetaotluste puhul otse ühendust Google Play toega.	Meillä ei ole valtuuksia maksuihin liittyvissä menettelyissä. Jos käytät Androidia, noudata sovelluskaupan hyvityskäytäntöä ja ota suoraan yhteyttä Google Playn tukitiimiin maksuihin tai hyvityksiin liittyvissä asioissa.	Nous n'avons aucun pouvoir sur les procédures liées aux paiements. Si vous utilisez Android, veuillez suivre la politique de remboursement du magasin et contacter directement l'équipe d'assistance de Google Play pour toute question liée aux paiements ou aux remboursements.	Wir haben keine Befugnis über zahlungsbezogene Verfahren. Wenn Sie Android verwenden, halten Sie sich bitte an die Rückerstattungsrichtlinien des Stores und wenden Sie sich direkt an das Google Play Support-Team, um Unterstützung bei Zahlungsproblemen oder Rückerstattungsanfragen zu erhalten.	Δεν έχουμε καμία εξουσία στις διαδικασίες που σχετίζονται με πληρωμές. Αν χρησιμοποιείτε Android, παρακαλούμε ακολουθήστε την πολιτική επιστροφής χρημάτων του καταστήματος και επικοινωνήστε απευθείας με την ομάδα υποστήριξης της Google Play για ζητήματα πληρωμών ή ερωτήματα επιστροφής χρημάτων.	אין לנו סמכות לגבי תהליכים הקשורים לתשלומים. אם אתה משתמש באנדרואיד, אנא פעל לפי מדיניות ההחזרים של החנות ופנה ישירות לצוות התמיכה של Google Play בנוגע לשאלות על תשלומים או החזרים.	हमारे पास भुगतान संबंधित प्रक्रियाओं पर कोई अधिकार नहीं है। यदि आप Android का उपयोग कर रहे हैं, तो कृपया स्टोर की रिफंड नीति का पालन करें और भुगतान या रिफंड से संबंधित सहायता के लिए सीधे Google Play सपोर्ट टीम से संपर्क करें।	Nincs hatáskörünk a fizetéssel kapcsolatos eljárások felett. Ha Androidot használ, kérjük, tartsa be az áruház visszatérítési szabályzatát, és közvetlenül vegye fel a kapcsolatot a Google Play támogatási csapatával a fizetéssel kapcsolatos problémák vagy visszatérítési kérések esetén.	Kami tidak memiliki wewenang atas prosedur terkait pembayaran. Jika Anda menggunakan Android, harap ikuti kebijakan pengembalian dana dari toko dan hubungi langsung tim dukungan Google Play untuk bantuan terkait masalah pembayaran atau pertanyaan pengembalian dana.	Non abbiamo alcuna autorità sulle procedure relative ai pagamenti. Se utilizzi Android, segui la politica di rimborso del negozio e contatta direttamente il team di assistenza di Google Play per assistenza riguardo problemi di pagamento o richieste di rimborso.	支払い関連の手続きに関して私たちには権限がありません。Android を使用している場合は、ストアの返金ポリシーに従い、Google Play サポートチームに直接連絡して支払いに関する問題や返金の問い合わせに対処してください	결제 관련 절차에 대해서는 저희에게 권한이 없습니다. Android를 사용하는 경우 스토어의 환불 정책을 따르고, 결제 문제나 환불 문의에 대해서는 Google Play 지원팀에 직접 문의하십시오.	Mums nav pilnvaru pār maksājumu procedūrām. Ja izmantojat Android, lūdzu, ievērojiet veikala atmaksas politiku un sazinieties tieši ar Google Play atbalsta komandu saistībā ar jautājumiem par maksājumiem vai atmaksām.	Mes neturime įgaliojimų dėl mokėjimų procedūrų. Jei naudojate Android, prašome laikytis parduotuvės grąžinimo politikos ir tiesiogiai kreiptis į Google Play pagalbos komandą dėl klausimų, susijusių su mokėjimais ar grąžinimu.	Kami tidak mempunyai kuasa ke atas sebarang prosedur berkaitan pembayaran. Jika anda menggunakan Android, sila patuhi dasar bayaran balik kedai dan hubungi pasukan sokongan Google Play untuk sebarang masalah pembayaran atau pertanyaan bayaran balik.	Vi har ingen myndighet over betalingsrelaterte prosedyrer. Hvis du bruker Android, vennligst følg butikkens refusjonspolicy og kontakt Google Play-supportteamet direkte for spørsmål angående betaling eller refusjon.	Nie mamy uprawnień do procedur związanych z płatnościami. Jeśli korzystasz z Androida, prosimy o przestrzeganie polityki zwrotów sklepu i bezpośrednie skontaktowanie się z zespołem wsparcia Google Play w celu uzyskania pomocy w sprawach płatności lub zwrotów.	Não temos autoridade sobre quaisquer procedimentos relacionados a pagamentos. Se você estiver usando Android, siga a política de reembolso da loja e entre em contato diretamente com a equipe de suporte do Google Play para questões relacionadas a pagamento ou reembolso.	Nu avem autoritate asupra procedurilor legate de plată. Dacă utilizați Android, vă rugăm să respectați politica de rambursare a magazinului și să contactați direct echipa de suport Google Play pentru orice problemă legată de plată sau rambursare.	Немамо овлашћење над процедурама везаним за плаћање. Ако користите Android, молимо вас да се придржавате политике повраћаја новца у продавници и директно контактирате Google Play тим за подршку у вези са питањима плаћања или повраћаја новца.	我们无权处理与支付相关的流程。如果您使用的是 Android，请遵循商店的退款政策，并直接联系 Google Play 支持团队以获取支付问题或退款相关的帮助。	Nemáme oprávnenie na postupy súvisiace s platbami. Ak používate Android, dodržujte pravidlá vrátenia peňazí obchodu a obráťte sa priamo na tím podpory Google Play s otázkami týkajúcimi sa platieb alebo vrátenia peňazí.	Nimamo pooblastil za postopke, povezane s plačili. Če uporabljate Android, upoštevajte pravilnik o vračilu trgovine in se neposredno obrnite na podporo za Google Play glede težav s plačili ali zahtevkov za povračilo.	No tenemos autoridad sobre los procedimientos relacionados con pagos. Si usas Android, sigue la política de reembolso de la tienda y comunícate directamente con el equipo de soporte de Google Play para obtener ayuda con los problemas de pago o las consultas de reembolso.	Vi har ingen auktoritet över betalningsrelaterade processer. Om du använder Android, vänligen följ butikens återbetalningspolicy och kontakta direkt Google Play-supportteamet för hjälp med betalningsproblem eller återbetalningsförfrågningar.	Wala kaming awtoridad sa mga proseso na may kaugnayan sa pagbabayad. Kung gumagamit ka ng Android, mangyaring sundin ang patakaran ng refund ng tindahan at direktang makipag-ugnayan sa Google Play support team para sa mga isyu sa pagbabayad o mga katanungan ukol sa refund.	เราไม่มีอำนาจในขั้นตอนที่เกี่ยวข้องกับการชำระเงิน หากคุณใช้ Android โปรดปฏิบัติตามนโยบายการคืนเงินของร้านค้าและติดต่อทีมสนับสนุนของ Google Play โดยตรงเพื่อขอความช่วยเหลือเกี่ยวกับการชำระเงินหรือติดต่อขอคืนเงิน	Ödeme ile ilgili prosedürler üzerinde yetkimiz yoktur. Android kullanıyorsanız, mağazanın iade politikasına uyun ve ödeme sorunları veya geri ödeme talepleriyle ilgili olarak doğrudan Google Play destek ekibiyle iletişime geçin.	Ми не маємо повноважень щодо процедур, пов'язаних з оплатою. Якщо ви користуєтеся Android, будь ласка, дотримуйтесь політики повернення коштів магазину та безпосередньо зверніться до служби підтримки Google Play для отримання допомоги з питаннями оплати або повернення коштів.	Chúng tôi không có thẩm quyền đối với bất kỳ quy trình liên quan đến thanh toán nào. Nếu bạn sử dụng Android, vui lòng tuân thủ chính sách hoàn tiền của cửa hàng và liên hệ trực tiếp với nhóm hỗ trợ Google Play để được hỗ trợ về các vấn đề thanh toán hoặc yêu cầu hoàn tiền.
for_parents_FAQ_5_question_android	93	How can I cancel my subscription?	Как я могу отменить подписку?	كيف يمكنني إلغاء اشتراكي؟	Как мога да анулирам абонамента си?	Com puc cancel·lar la meva subscripció?	Kako mogu otkazati pretplatu?	Jak mohu zrušit své předplatné?	Hvordan kan jeg annullere mit abonnement?	Hoe kan ik mijn abonnement opzeggen?	Kuidas ma saan oma tellimuse tühistada?	Kuinka voin peruuttaa tilaukseni?	Comment puis-je annuler mon abonnement ?	Wie kann ich mein Abonnement kündigen?	Πώς μπορώ να ακυρώσω τη συνδρομή μου;	כיצד אוכל לבטל את המנוי שלי?	मैं अपनी सदस्यता कैसे रद्द कर सकता हूं?	Hogyan mondhatom le az előfizetésemet?	Bagaimana cara membatalkan langganan saya?	Come posso annullare il mio abbonamento?	サブスクリプションをキャンセルするには？	내 구독을 취소하려면 어떻게 하나요?	Kā es varu atcelt savu abonementu?	Kaip galiu atšaukti savo prenumeratą?	Bagaimana saya boleh membatalkan langganan saya?	Hvordan kan jeg kansellere abonnementet mitt?	Jak mogę anulować subskrypcję?	Como posso cancelar minha assinatura?	Cum îmi pot anula abonamentul?	Kako mogu otkazati svoju pretplatu?	我如何取消我的订阅?	Ako môžem zrušiť svoje predplatné?	Kako lahko prekličem svojo naročnino?	¿Cómo puedo cancelar mi suscripción?	Hur kan jag avbryta min prenumeration?	Paano ko makakansela ang aking subscription?	ฉันจะยกเลิกการสมัครได้อย่างไร?	Aboneliğimi nasıl iptal edebilirim?	Як я можу скасувати свою підписку?	Làm cách nào để hủy đăng ký của tôi?
for_parents_FAQ_5_answer_android	94	"In this application, there is no subscription option. The 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' app offers a one-time purchase to unlock all content and tools for lifetime access. For our other apps that include subscription plans, please follow these instructions to cancel a subscription:
1. Open the Google Play app.
2. Tap the profile icon at the top right.
3. Go to Payments & subscriptions, then Subscriptions. 
4. Choose the subscription to cancel.
5. Tap Cancel Subscription.
Follow the instructions."	"В этом приложении нет опции подписки. Приложение 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' предлагает единовременную покупку для разблокировки всего контента и инструментов для пожизненного использования. Для наших других приложений, включающих подписки, следуйте этим инструкциям, чтобы отменить подписку:
 1. Откройте приложение Google Play.
 2. Нажмите на иконку профиля в правом верхнем углу.
 3. Перейдите в раздел ""Платежи и подписки"", затем ""Подписки"".
 4. Выберите подписку, которую хотите отменить.
 5. Нажмите ""Отменить подписку"".
 6. Следуйте дальнейшим инструкциям."	"في هذا التطبيق، لا يوجد خيار للاشتراك. يقدم تطبيق 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' عملية شراء لمرة واحدة لفتح جميع المحتويات والأدوات للاستخدام مدى الحياة. بالنسبة لتطبيقاتنا الأخرى التي تتضمن خطط اشتراك، يرجى اتباع هذه التعليمات لإلغاء الاشتراك:
 1. افتح تطبيق Google Play.
 2. اضغط على أيقونة الملف الشخصي في أعلى اليمين.
 3. انتقل إلى المدفوعات والاشتراكات، ثم الاشتراكات.
 4. اختر الاشتراك لإلغاءه.
 5. اضغط على إلغاء الاشتراك.
 6. اتبع التعليمات."	"В това приложение няма опция за абонамент. Приложението 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' предлага еднократна покупка за отключване на цялото съдържание и инструменти за неограничено ползване. За другите ни приложения, които включват абонаментни планове, следвайте тези инструкции за анулиране на абонамента:
 1. Отворете приложението Google Play.
 2. Докоснете иконата на профила в горния десен ъгъл.
 3. Отидете в ""Плащания и абонаменти"", след това ""Абонаменти"".
 4. Изберете абонамента, който искате да отмените.
 5. Докоснете ""Отмяна на абонамента"".
 6. Следвайте инструкциите."	"En aquesta aplicació, no hi ha opció de subscripció. L'aplicació 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' ofereix una compra única per desbloquejar tot el contingut i eines per a ús de per vida. Per a les nostres altres aplicacions que inclouen plans de subscripció, si us plau, segueix aquestes instruccions per cancel·lar la subscripció:
 1. Obriu l'aplicació Google Play.
 2. Toqueu la icona de perfil a la part superior dreta.
 3. Aneu a ""Pagaments i subscripcions"", després a ""Subscripcions"".
 4. Trieu la subscripció que voleu cancel·lar.
 5. Toqueu ""Cancel·lar la subscripció"".
 6. Seguiu les instruccions."	"U ovoj aplikaciji nema opcije pretplate. Aplikacija 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' nudi jednokratnu kupnju koja omogućava otključavanje cijelog sadržaja i alata za doživotni pristup. Za ostale naše aplikacije koje uključuju pretplatničke planove, slijedite ove upute za otkazivanje pretplate:
 1. Otvorite aplikaciju Google Play.
 2. Dodirnite ikonu profila u gornjem desnom kutu.
 3. Idite na ""Plaćanja i pretplate"", zatim ""Pretplate"".
 4. Odaberite pretplatu koju želite otkazati.
 5. Dodirnite ""Otkaži pretplatu"".
 6. Slijedite upute."	"V této aplikaci není možnost předplatného. Aplikace 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' nabízí jednorázový nákup, který vám umožní odemknout veškerý obsah a nástroje pro neomezený přístup. Pro další naše aplikace s možností předplatného prosím postupujte podle těchto pokynů pro zrušení předplatného:
 1. Otevřete aplikaci Google Play.
 2. Klepněte na ikonu profilu v pravém horním rohu.
 3. Přejděte do sekce ""Platby a předplatné"" a poté do ""Předplatné"".
 4. Vyberte předplatné, které chcete zrušit.
 5. Klepněte na ""Zrušit předplatné"".
 6. Postupujte podle pokynů."	"I denne applikation er der ingen abonnementsmulighed. 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids'-appen tilbyder et engangskøb, der giver dig livstidsadgang til alt indhold og alle værktøjer. For vores andre apps, der inkluderer abonnementsplaner, bedes du følge disse instruktioner for at annullere et abonnement:
 1. Åbn Google Play-appen.
 2. Tryk på profilikonet øverst til højre.
 3. Gå til ""Betalinger og abonnementer"" og derefter ""Abonnementer"".
 4. Vælg det abonnement, du vil annullere.
 5. Tryk på ""Annuller abonnement"".
 6. Følg vejledningen."	"In deze applicatie is er geen abonnementsoptie. De 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids'-app biedt een eenmalige aankoop om alle inhoud en hulpmiddelen voor onbeperkte toegang te ontgrendelen. Voor onze andere apps met abonnementsplannen volg je deze instructies om een abonnement op te zeggen:
 1. Open de Google Play-app.
 2. Tik op het profielpictogram in de rechterbovenhoek.
 3. Ga naar ""Betalingen en abonnementen"" en vervolgens ""Abonnementen"".
 4. Kies het abonnement dat je wilt annuleren.
 5. Tik op ""Abonnement opzeggen"".
 6. Volg de instructies."	"Selles rakenduses ei ole tellimisvõimalust. 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' rakendus pakub ühekordset ostu, mis avab kogu sisu ja tööriistad eluaegseks kasutamiseks. Meie teiste rakenduste puhul, mis sisaldavad tellimisplaane, järgige tellimuse tühistamiseks neid juhiseid:
 1. Avage Google Play rakendus.
 2. Puudutage paremas ülanurgas profiiliikooni.
 3. Minge jaotisse ""Maksed ja tellimused"" ja seejärel ""Tellimused"".
 4. Valige tellimus, mille soovite tühistada.
 5. Puudutage ""Tühista tellimus"".
 6. Järgige juhiseid."	"Tässä sovelluksessa ei ole tilausvaihtoehtoa. 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' -sovellus tarjoaa kertamaksun, jolla voit avata kaikki sisällöt ja työkalut elinikäistä käyttöä varten. Muiden sovellustemme osalta, jotka sisältävät tilausvaihtoehtoja, seuraa näitä ohjeita tilauksen peruuttamiseen:
 1. Avaa Google Play -sovellus.
 2. Napauta profiilikuvaketta oikeassa yläkulmassa.
 3. Siirry kohtaan Maksut ja tilaukset, sitten Tilaukset.
 4. Valitse peruutettava tilaus.
 5. Napauta Peruuta tilaus.
 6. Noudata ohjeita."	"Dans cette application, il n'y a pas d'option d'abonnement. L'application 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' propose un achat unique pour débloquer tout le contenu et les outils à vie. Pour nos autres applications qui incluent des plans d'abonnement, veuillez suivre ces instructions pour annuler un abonnement :
 1. Ouvrez l'application Google Play.
 2. Appuyez sur l'icône de profil en haut à droite.
 3. Allez dans ""Paiements et abonnements"", puis dans ""Abonnements"".
 4. Choisissez l'abonnement à annuler.
 5. Appuyez sur ""Annuler l'abonnement"".
 6. Suivez les instructions."	"In dieser Anwendung gibt es keine Abonnementoption. Die 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids'-App bietet einen einmaligen Kauf, um alle Inhalte und Werkzeuge für den lebenslangen Zugriff freizuschalten. Für unsere anderen Apps mit Abonnementplänen folgen Sie bitte diesen Anweisungen, um ein Abonnement zu kündigen:
 1. Öffnen Sie die Google Play App.
 2. Tippen Sie auf das Profilsymbol oben rechts.
 3. Gehen Sie zu ""Zahlungen und Abonnements"" und dann zu ""Abonnements"".
 4. Wählen Sie das Abonnement, das Sie kündigen möchten.
 5. Tippen Sie auf ""Abonnement kündigen"".
 6. Befolgen Sie die Anweisungen."	"Σε αυτήν την εφαρμογή δεν υπάρχει επιλογή συνδρομής. Η εφαρμογή 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' προσφέρει εφάπαξ αγορά για να ξεκλειδώσετε όλο το περιεχόμενο και τα εργαλεία για δια βίου πρόσβαση. Για άλλες εφαρμογές μας που περιλαμβάνουν συνδρομητικά προγράμματα, ακολουθήστε αυτές τις οδηγίες για ακύρωση της συνδρομής:
 1. Ανοίξτε την εφαρμογή Google Play.
 2. Πατήστε το εικονίδιο προφίλ στην επάνω δεξιά γωνία.
 3. Μεταβείτε στην ενότητα Πληρωμές και Συνδρομές, στη συνέχεια Συνδρομές.
 4. Επιλέξτε τη συνδρομή που θέλετε να ακυρώσετε.
 5. Πατήστε ""Ακύρωση συνδρομής"".
 6. Ακολουθήστε τις οδηγίες."	"באפליקציה זו אין אפשרות למנוי. האפליקציה 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' מציעה רכישה חד-פעמית כדי לפתוח את כל התוכן והכלים לשימוש לכל החיים. עבור האפליקציות האחרות שלנו הכוללות תוכניות מנוי, יש לעקוב אחר הוראות אלה לביטול המנוי:
 1. פתח את אפליקציית Google Play.
 2. לחץ על סמל הפרופיל בפינה הימנית העליונה.
 3. עבור אל ""תשלומים ומנויים"", לאחר מכן ""מנויים"".
 4. בחר את המנוי שברצונך לבטל.
 5. לחץ על ""בטל מנוי"".
 6. פעל לפי ההוראות."	"इस एप्लिकेशन में सदस्यता का विकल्प नहीं है। 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' ऐप सभी सामग्री और उपकरणों को जीवनभर के लिए अनलॉक करने के लिए एक बार की खरीदारी का विकल्प प्रदान करता है। हमारी अन्य ऐप्स के लिए जिनमें सदस्यता योजनाएँ शामिल हैं, कृपया सदस्यता रद्द करने के लिए इन निर्देशों का पालन करें:
 1. Google Play ऐप खोलें।
 2. शीर्ष दाएं कोने में प्रोफ़ाइल आइकन पर टैप करें।
 3. भुगतान और सदस्यताएँ"", फिर ""सदस्यताएँ"" पर जाएँ।
 4. उस सदस्यता का चयन करें जिसे आप रद्द करना चाहते हैं।
 5. सदस्यता रद्द करें"" पर टैप करें।
 6. निर्देशों का पालन करें।"	"Ebben az alkalmazásban nincs előfizetési lehetőség. A 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' alkalmazás egy egyszeri vásárlást kínál, amely lehetővé teszi az összes tartalom és eszköz élettartamra történő feloldását. Más alkalmazásaink esetében, amelyek előfizetési terveket tartalmaznak, kérjük, kövesse ezeket az előfizetés lemondására vonatkozó utasításokat:
 1. Nyissa meg a Google Play alkalmazást.
 2. Érintse meg a profil ikonját a jobb felső sarokban.
 3. Menjen a ""Fizetések és előfizetések"", majd az ""Előfizetések"" menüpontba.
 4. Válassza ki az előfizetést, amelyet le szeretne mondani.
 5. Érintse meg az ""Előfizetés lemondása"" gombot.
 6. Kövesse az utasításokat."	"Dalam aplikasi ini, tidak ada opsi langganan. Aplikasi 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' menawarkan pembelian satu kali untuk membuka semua konten dan alat untuk akses seumur hidup. Untuk aplikasi lain kami yang memiliki rencana berlangganan, silakan ikuti petunjuk ini untuk membatalkan langganan:
 1. Buka aplikasi Google Play.
 2. Ketuk ikon profil di kanan atas.
 3. Buka ""Pembayaran & langganan"", lalu ""Langganan"".
 4. Pilih langganan yang ingin Anda batalkan.
 5. Ketuk ""Batalkan Langganan"".
 6. Ikuti petunjuknya."	"In questa applicazione non è presente un'opzione di abbonamento. L'app 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' offre un acquisto una tantum per sbloccare tutti i contenuti e gli strumenti per l'accesso a vita. Per le nostre altre app che includono piani di abbonamento, segui queste istruzioni per annullare l'abbonamento:
 1. Apri l'app Google Play.
 2. Tocca l'icona del profilo in alto a destra.
 3. Vai a ""Pagamenti e abbonamenti"", quindi ""Abbonamenti"".
 4. Scegli l'abbonamento che desideri annullare.
 5. Tocca ""Annulla abbonamento"".
 6. Segui le istruzioni."	"このアプリケーションにはサブスクリプションのオプションがありません。 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' アプリは、すべてのコンテンツとツールに対する生涯アクセスを解除するための一回限りの購入を提供します。他のサブスクリプションプランを含むアプリについては、サブスクリプションをキャンセルするには、次の手順に従ってください:
 1. Google Play アプリを開きます。
 2. 右上のプロフィールアイコンをタップします。
 3. 「お支払いとサブスクリプション」、次に「サブスクリプション」に進みます。
 4. キャンセルするサブスクリプションを選択します。
 5. 「サブスクリプションをキャンセル」をタップします。
 6. 指示に従ってください。"	"이 애플리케이션에는 구독 옵션이 없습니다. 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' 앱은 모든 콘텐츠와 도구를 평생 사용할 수 있도록 단일 구매 옵션을 제공합니다. 구독 계획이 포함된 다른 앱의 경우 구독 취소 방법에 대한 지침을 따르십시오:
 1. Google Play 앱을 엽니다.
 2. 오른쪽 상단의 프로필 아이콘을 탭합니다.
 3. ""결제 및 구독"", 그 다음 ""구독""으로 이동합니다.
 4. 취소할 구독을 선택합니다.
 5. ""구독 취소""를 탭합니다.
 6. 지시에 따라 진행하십시오。"	"Šajā lietotnē nav abonēšanas opcijas. 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' lietotne piedāvā vienreizēju pirkumu, lai atbloķētu visu saturu un rīkus uz mūžu. Attiecībā uz mūsu citām lietotnēm, kurām ir abonēšanas plāni, lūdzu, izpildiet šos norādījumus, lai atceltu abonementu:
 1. Atveriet lietotni Google Play.
 2. Augšējā labajā stūrī pieskarieties profila ikonai.
 3. Dodieties uz ""Maksājumi un abonementi"", pēc tam uz ""Abonementi"".
 4. Izvēlieties abonementu, kuru vēlaties atcelt.
 5. Pieskarieties ""Atcelt abonementu"".
 6. Izpildiet norādījumus."	"Šioje programoje nėra prenumeratos galimybės. 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' programa siūlo vienkartinį pirkimą, kuris leidžia atrakinti visą turinį ir įrankius visam gyvenimui. Dėl kitų mūsų programų, turinčių prenumeratos planus, vadovaukitės šiomis instrukcijomis, kad atšauktumėte prenumeratą:
 1. Atidarykite Google Play programėlę.
 2. Palieskite profilio ikoną viršutiniame dešiniajame kampe.
 3. Eikite į ""Mokėjimai ir prenumeratos"", tada į ""Prenumeratos"".
 4. Pasirinkite prenumeratą, kurią norite atšaukti.
 5. Palieskite ""Atšaukti prenumeratą"".
 6. Sekite instrukcijas."	"Dalam aplikasi ini, tiada pilihan langganan. Aplikasi 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' menawarkan pembelian sekali sahaja untuk membuka semua kandungan dan alat untuk akses sepanjang hayat. Untuk aplikasi kami yang lain yang mempunyai pelan langganan, sila ikuti arahan ini untuk membatalkan langganan:
 1. Buka aplikasi Google Play.
 2. Ketik ikon profil di bahagian atas sebelah kanan.
 3. Pergi ke Pembayaran & langganan, kemudian Langganan.
 4. Pilih langganan untuk dibatalkan.
 5. Ketik Batalkan Langganan.
 6. Ikuti arahan."	"I denne applikasjonen er det ingen abonnementsalternativ. Appen 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' tilbyr et engangskjøp som gir deg livstidstilgang til alt innhold og verktøy. For våre andre apper som inkluderer abonnementsplaner, følg disse instruksjonene for å kansellere et abonnement:
 1. Åpne Google Play-appen.
 2. Trykk på profilikonet øverst til høyre.
 3. Gå til ""Betalinger og abonnementer"", deretter ""Abonnementer"".
 4. Velg abonnementet du vil kansellere.
 5. Trykk på ""Kanseller abonnement"".
 6. Følg instruksjonene."	"W tej aplikacji nie ma opcji subskrypcji. Aplikacja 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' oferuje jednorazowy zakup, który zapewnia dożywotni dostęp do wszystkich treści i narzędzi. W przypadku innych naszych aplikacji, które obejmują plany subskrypcyjne, proszę postępować zgodnie z tymi instrukcjami, aby anulować subskrypcję:
 1. Otwórz aplikację Google Play.
 2. Stuknij ikonę profilu w prawym górnym rogu.
 3. Przejdź do ""Płatności i subskrypcje"", a następnie ""Subskrypcje"".
 4. Wybierz subskrypcję, którą chcesz anulować.
 5. Stuknij ""Anuluj subskrypcję"".
 6. Postępuj zgodnie z instrukcjami."	"Neste aplicativo, não há opção de assinatura. O app 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' oferece uma compra única para desbloquear todo o conteúdo e ferramentas para uso vitalício. Para nossos outros aplicativos que incluem planos de assinatura, siga estas instruções para cancelar uma assinatura:
 1. Abra o aplicativo Google Play.
 2. Toque no ícone de perfil no canto superior direito.
 3. Vá para ""Pagamentos e assinaturas"" e depois ""Assinaturas"".
 4. Escolha a assinatura que deseja cancelar.
 5. Toque em ""Cancelar assinatura"".
 6. Siga as instruções."	"În această aplicație nu există opțiune de abonament. Aplicația 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' oferă o achiziție unică pentru a debloca tot conținutul și uneltele pentru acces pe viață. Pentru celelalte aplicații ale noastre care includ planuri de abonament, vă rugăm să urmați aceste instrucțiuni pentru a anula un abonament:
 1. Deschideți aplicația Google Play.
 2. Atingeți pictograma profilului din colțul din dreapta sus.
 3. Mergi la ""Plăți și abonamente"", apoi la ""Abonamente"".
 4. Alegeți abonamentul pe care doriți să-l anulați.
 5. Atingeți ""Anulați abonamentul"".
 6. Urmați instrucțiunile."	"U ovoj aplikaciji nema opcije pretplate. Aplikacija 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' nudi jednokratnu kupovinu za otključavanje celokupnog sadržaja i alata za doživotni pristup. Za naše druge aplikacije koje uključuju planove pretplate, pratite ova uputstva za otkazivanje pretplate:
 1. Отворите апликацију Google Play.
 2. Додирните икону профила у горњем десном углу.
 3. Идите на „Плаћања и претплате“, затим на „Претплате“.
 4. Изаберите претплату коју желите да откажете.
 5. Додирните „Откажи претплату“.
 6. Пратите упутства."	"在此应用程序中没有订阅选项。 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' 应用提供一次性购买，解锁所有内容和工具以终身使用。对于其他包含订阅计划的应用，请按照以下说明取消订阅：
 1. 打开 Google Play 应用。
 2. 点击右上角的个人资料图标。
 3. 进入“付款和订阅”部分，然后选择“订阅”。
 4. 选择要取消的订阅。
 5. 点击“取消订阅”。
 6. 按提示操作。"	"V tejto aplikácii nie je k dispozícii možnosť predplatného. Aplikácia 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' ponúka jednorazový nákup, ktorý vám umožní prístup ku všetkému obsahu a nástrojom na doživotie. Pre naše ďalšie aplikácie, ktoré obsahujú predplatné, postupujte podľa týchto pokynov na zrušenie predplatného:
 1. Otvorte aplikáciu Google Play.
 2. Klepnite na ikonu profilu v pravom hornom rohu.
 3. Prejdite na ""Platby a predplatné"" a potom ""Predplatné"".
 4. Vyberte predplatné, ktoré chcete zrušiť.
 5. Klepnite na ""Zrušiť predplatné"".
 6. Postupujte podľa pokynov."	"V tej aplikaciji ni možnosti naročnine. Aplikacija 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' ponuja enkratni nakup, ki omogoča dostop do vsebine in orodij za življenjsko dobo. Za naše druge aplikacije, ki vključujejo naročniške načrte, sledite tem navodilom za preklic naročnine:
 1. Odprite aplikacijo Google Play.
 2. Dotaknite se ikone profila v zgornjem desnem kotu.
 3. Pojdite na ""Plačila in naročnine"", nato ""Naročnine"".
 4. Izberite naročnino, ki jo želite preklicati.
 5. Dotaknite se ""Prekliči naročnino"".
 6. Sledite navodilom."	"En esta aplicación, no hay opción de suscripción. La aplicación 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' ofrece una compra única para desbloquear todo el contenido y herramientas para acceso de por vida. Para nuestras otras aplicaciones que incluyen planes de suscripción, sigue estas instrucciones para cancelar una suscripción:
 1. Abre la aplicación de Google Play.
 2. Toca el icono de perfil en la parte superior derecha.
 3. Ve a ""Pagos y suscripciones"", luego a ""Suscripciones"".
 4. Elige la suscripción que deseas cancelar.
 5. Toca ""Cancelar suscripción"".
 6. Sigue las instrucciones."	"I den här appen finns det inget prenumerationsalternativ. Appen 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' erbjuder ett engångsköp som låser upp allt innehåll och alla verktyg för livstidsanvändning. För våra andra appar som inkluderar prenumerationsplaner, följ dessa instruktioner för att avbryta en prenumeration:
 1. Öppna Google Play-appen.
 2. Tryck på profilikonen längst upp till höger.
 3. Gå till ""Betalningar och prenumerationer"", sedan ""Prenumerationer"".
 4. Välj den prenumeration du vill säga upp.
 5. Tryck på ""Avsluta prenumeration"".
 6. Följ anvisningarna."	"Sa app na ito, walang opsyon para sa subscription. Ang app na 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' ay nag-aalok ng isang beses na pagbili upang ma-unlock ang lahat ng nilalaman at tool para sa habambuhay na paggamit. Para sa iba pa naming mga app na may kasamang mga subscription plan, sundin ang mga tagubiling ito para kanselahin ang subscription:
 1. Buksan ang Google Play app.
 2. Pindutin ang icon ng profile sa itaas na kanan.
 3. Pumunta sa ""Mga Pagbabayad at Subscription"", pagkatapos ay ""Mga Subscription"".
 4. Piliin ang subscription na nais mong kanselahin.
 5. Pindutin ang ""Kanselahin ang Subscription"".
 6. Sundin ang mga tagubilin."	"ในแอปนี้ไม่มีตัวเลือกการสมัครใช้งาน แอป 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' มีการซื้อเพียงครั้งเดียวเพื่อปลดล็อกเนื้อหาและเครื่องมือทั้งหมดสำหรับการเข้าถึงตลอดชีพ สำหรับแอปอื่นๆ ที่มีแผนการสมัครใช้งาน โปรดทำตามคำแนะนำเหล่านี้เพื่อยกเลิกการสมัคร:
 1. เปิดแอป Google Play
 2. แตะที่ไอคอนโปรไฟล์ที่มุมบนขวา
 3. ไปที่ ""การชำระเงินและการสมัคร"" แล้วเลือก ""การสมัคร""
 4. เลือกการสมัครที่คุณต้องการยกเลิก
 5. แตะ ""ยกเลิกการสมัคร""
 6. ปฏิบัติตามคำแนะนำ"	"Bu uygulamada abonelik seçeneği yoktur. 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' uygulaması, tüm içerik ve araçların ömür boyu kullanım için tek seferlik bir satın alma seçeneği sunar. Abonelik planları içeren diğer uygulamalarımız için lütfen aboneliği iptal etmek için bu talimatları takip edin:
 1. Google Play uygulamasını açın.
 2. Sağ üst köşedeki profil simgesine dokunun.
 3. Ödemeler ve abonelikler, ardından Abonelikler'e gidin.
 4. İptal etmek istediğiniz aboneliği seçin.
 5. Aboneliği İptal Et'e dokunun.
 6. Talimatları izleyin."	"У цьому додатку немає опції підписки. Додаток 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' пропонує одноразову покупку, щоб розблокувати весь вміст і інструменти для безстрокового використання. Для інших наших додатків, які включають підписки, дотримуйтесь цих інструкцій для скасування підписки:
 1. Відкрийте додаток Google Play.
 2. Торкніться значка профілю у верхньому правому куті.
 3. Перейдіть до ""Платежі та підписки"", потім до ""Підписки"".
 4. Виберіть підписку, яку хочете скасувати.
 5. Натисніть ""Скасувати підписку"".
 6. Дотримуйтесь інструкцій."	"Trong ứng dụng này, không có tùy chọn đăng ký. Ứng dụng 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' cung cấp mua một lần để mở khóa tất cả nội dung và công cụ sử dụng trọn đời. Đối với các ứng dụng khác của chúng tôi có kế hoạch đăng ký, vui lòng làm theo các hướng dẫn này để hủy đăng ký:
 1. Mở ứng dụng Google Play.
 2. Nhấn vào biểu tượng hồ sơ ở góc trên bên phải.
 3. Đi tới ""Thanh toán và đăng ký"", sau đó là ""Đăng ký"".
 4. Chọn đăng ký bạn muốn hủy.
 5. Nhấn vào ""Hủy đăng ký"".
 6. Làm theo hướng dẫn."
for_parents_FAQ_6_question_android	95	Are your apps available for a single payment or are they subscription-based?	Ваши приложения доступны для разовой оплаты или на основе подписки?	هل تطبيقاتكم متاحة للدفع لمرة واحدة أم تعتمد على الاشتراك؟	Предлагат ли се вашите приложения за еднократно плащане или са на абонаментна основа?	Els vostres aplicacions estan disponibles per un sol pagament o són basades en subscripció?	Jesu li vaše aplikacije dostupne za jednokratno plaćanje ili su na temelju pretplate?	Jsou vaše aplikace k dispozici za jednorázovou platbu nebo na základě předplatného?	Er dine apps tilgængelige for en engangsbetaling, eller er de abonnementsbaserede?	Zijn uw apps beschikbaar voor een eenmalige betaling of zijn ze abonnement-gebaseerd?	Kas teie rakendused on saadaval ühekordse maksega või on need tellimuspõhised?	Ovatko sovelluksenne saatavilla kertamaksulla vai perustuvatko ne tilaukseen?	Vos applications sont-elles disponibles via un paiement unique ou sont-elles basées sur un abonnement ?	Sind Ihre Apps mit einer einmaligen Zahlung erhältlich oder basieren sie auf einem Abonnement?	Οι εφαρμογές σας είναι διαθέσιμες με μία εφάπαξ πληρωμή ή βασίζονται σε συνδρομή;	האם האפליקציות שלכם זמינות בתשלום חד פעמי או מבוססות על מנוי?	क्या आपकी ऐप्स एकल भुगतान के साथ उपलब्ध हैं या ये सदस्यता आधारित हैं?	Az alkalmazásaik egyszeri fizetéssel elérhetők, vagy előfizetés-alapúak?	Apakah aplikasi Anda tersedia dengan pembayaran satu kali atau berbasis langganan?	Le vostre app sono disponibili con un pagamento singolo o sono basate su abbonamento?	アプリは一度きりの支払いで利用できますか、それともサブスクリプションベースですか？	앱은 단일 결제로 이용할 수 있나요, 아니면 구독 기반인가요?	Vai jūsu lietotnes ir pieejamas ar vienreizēju maksājumu vai tās ir balstītas uz abonementu?	Ar jūsų programėlės prieinamos už vienkartinį mokestį, ar jos paremtos prenumerata?	Adakah aplikasi anda tersedia dengan bayaran sekali sahaja atau berasaskan langganan?	Er appene deres tilgjengelig for engangsbetaling, eller er de abonnementsbasert?	Czy wasze aplikacje są dostępne za jednorazową opłatą, czy są oparte na subskrypcji?	Os seus aplicativos estão disponíveis para pagamento único ou são baseados em assinatura?	Aplicațiile dvs. sunt disponibile pentru o singură plată sau sunt bazate pe abonament?	Да ли су ваше апликације доступне за једнократну уплату или су засноване на претплати?	您的应用是单次付费的还是基于订阅的?	Sú vaše aplikácie dostupné na jednorazovú platbu alebo sú založené na predplatnom?	Ali so vaše aplikacije na voljo za enkratno plačilo ali so naročniško osnovane?	¿Están disponibles sus aplicaciones con un pago único o son basadas en suscripciones?	Är era appar tillgängliga för en engångsbetalning eller är de prenumerationsbaserade?	Ang mga app niyo ba ay available para sa isang beses na pagbabayad o nakabatay sa subscription?	แอปของคุณพร้อมใช้งานสำหรับการชำระเงินครั้งเดียวหรือเป็นการสมัครสมาชิกรายเดือน?	Uygulamalarınız tek seferlik ödemelerle mi yoksa abonelik tabanlı mı sunuluyor?	Ваші додатки доступні для одноразової покупки чи вони на основі підписки?	Các ứng dụng của bạn có sẵn cho một lần thanh toán hay là dựa trên đăng ký?
for_parents_FAQ_6_answer_android	96	Most of our apps offer one-time in-app purchases, granting you unlimited access without any additional charges. This application - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' offers one-time purchase. However, we do have (or will have in the future) some apps that utilize a subscription model.	Большинство наших приложений предлагают разовую покупку внутри приложения, предоставляя вам неограниченный доступ без дополнительных затрат. Это приложение - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' предлагает разовую покупку. Однако у нас есть (или в будущем будут) приложения, которые используют модель подписки.	توفر معظم تطبيقاتنا عمليات شراء داخل التطبيق لمرة واحدة، مما يتيح لك الوصول غير المحدود دون رسوم إضافية. هذا التطبيق - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' يقدم عملية شراء لمرة واحدة. ومع ذلك، لدينا (أو سيكون لدينا في المستقبل) بعض التطبيقات التي تستخدم نموذج الاشتراك.	Повечето от нашите приложения предлагат еднократни покупки в приложението, които ви предоставят неограничен достъп без допълнителни такси. Това приложение - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' предлага еднократна покупка. Въпреки това, имаме (или ще имаме в бъдеще) някои приложения, които използват модел на абонамент.	La majoria de les nostres aplicacions ofereixen compres úniques dins de l'aplicació, que et permeten accés il·limitat sense càrrecs addicionals. Aquesta aplicació - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' ofereix una compra única. Tanmateix, tenim (o tindrem en el futur) algunes aplicacions que utilitzen un model de subscripció.	Većina naših aplikacija nudi jednokratne kupnje unutar aplikacije koje vam omogućuju neograničen pristup bez dodatnih troškova. Ova aplikacija - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' nudi jednokratnu kupnju. Međutim, imamo (ili ćemo imati u budućnosti) neke aplikacije koje koriste model pretplate.	Většina našich aplikací nabízí jednorázové nákupy, které vám poskytnou neomezený přístup bez dalších poplatků. Tato aplikace - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' nabízí jednorázový nákup. Nicméně, máme (nebo budeme mít v budoucnu) některé aplikace, které používají model předplatného.	De fleste af vores apps tilbyder engangskøb i appen, hvilket giver dig ubegrænset adgang uden ekstra gebyrer. Denne applikation - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' tilbyder et engangskøb. Men vi har (eller vil have i fremtiden) nogle apps, der benytter et abonnementsmodel.	De meeste van onze apps bieden eenmalige in-app aankopen, die je onbeperkte toegang geven zonder extra kosten. Deze applicatie - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' biedt een eenmalige aankoop. We hebben echter (of zullen in de toekomst hebben) enkele apps die gebruik maken van een abonnementsmodel.	Enamik meie rakendusi pakub ühekordseid rakendusesiseseid oste, mis annavad teile piiramatu juurdepääsu ilma lisatasuta. See rakendus - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' pakub ühekordset ostu. Kuid meil on (või tulevikus on) mõned rakendused, mis kasutavad tellimismudelit.	Useimmat sovelluksemme tarjoavat kertaluonteisia sovelluksen sisäisiä ostoksia, jotka antavat sinulle rajoittamattoman pääsyn ilman lisämaksuja. Tämä sovellus - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' tarjoaa kertamaksun. Meillä on kuitenkin (tai tulemme tulevaisuudessa saamaan) joitakin sovelluksia, jotka käyttävät tilausmallia.	La plupart de nos applications proposent des achats uniques intégrés, vous offrant un accès illimité sans frais supplémentaires. Cette application - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' propose un achat unique. Cependant, nous avons (ou aurons à l'avenir) certaines applications qui utilisent un modèle d'abonnement.	Die meisten unserer Apps bieten einmalige In-App-Käufe, die Ihnen unbegrenzten Zugang ohne zusätzliche Kosten ermöglichen. Diese Anwendung - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' bietet einen einmaligen Kauf. Wir haben jedoch (oder werden in Zukunft haben) einige Apps, die ein Abonnementmodell verwenden.	Οι περισσότερες από τις εφαρμογές μας προσφέρουν εφάπαξ αγορές εντός εφαρμογής, προσφέροντάς σας απεριόριστη πρόσβαση χωρίς επιπλέον χρεώσεις. Αυτή η εφαρμογή - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' προσφέρει εφάπαξ αγορά. Ωστόσο, έχουμε (ή θα έχουμε στο μέλλον) μερικές εφαρμογές που χρησιμοποιούν μοντέλο συνδρομής.	רוב האפליקציות שלנו מציעות רכישות חד-פעמיות בתוך האפליקציה, המעניקות לך גישה בלתי מוגבלת ללא חיובים נוספים. אפליקציה זו - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' מציעה רכישה חד-פעמית. עם זאת, יש לנו (או יהיו לנו בעתיד) אפליקציות מסוימות המשתמשות במודל מנוי.	हमारे अधिकांश ऐप्स में एक बार की इन-ऐप खरीदारी का विकल्प है, जो आपको बिना किसी अतिरिक्त शुल्क के असीमित एक्सेस प्रदान करता है। यह ऐप - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' एक बार की खरीदारी प्रदान करता है। हालांकि, हमारे पास कुछ ऐप्स हैं (या भविष्य में होंगे) जो सदस्यता मॉडल का उपयोग करते हैं।	Az alkalmazásaink többsége egyszeri vásárlási lehetőséget kínál, amely korlátlan hozzáférést biztosít további költségek nélkül. Ez az alkalmazás - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' egyszeri vásárlást kínál. Ugyanakkor van (vagy a jövőben lesz) néhány alkalmazásunk, amely előfizetési modellt alkalmaz.	Sebagian besar aplikasi kami menawarkan pembelian satu kali di dalam aplikasi, memberikan Anda akses tak terbatas tanpa biaya tambahan. Aplikasi ini - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' menawarkan pembelian satu kali. Namun, kami memiliki (atau akan memiliki di masa depan) beberapa aplikasi yang menggunakan model langganan.	La maggior parte delle nostre app offre acquisti una tantum, consentendoti accesso illimitato senza costi aggiuntivi. Questa applicazione - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' offre un acquisto una tantum. Tuttavia, abbiamo (o avremo in futuro) alcune app che utilizzano un modello di abbonamento.	ほとんどのアプリは一度限りのアプリ内購入を提供しており、追加料金なしで無制限にアクセスできます。このアプリ - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' は一度限りの購入を提供します。ただし、いくつかのアプリは（または将来、サブスクリプションモデルを使用する予定があります）。	대부분의 앱은 일회성 인앱 구매를 제공하여 추가 비용 없이 무제한 액세스를 제공합니다. 이 애플리케이션 - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids'는 일회성 구매를 제공합니다. 그러나 일부 앱은 (또는 앞으로 구독 모델을 사용할 예정입니다).	Lielākā daļa mūsu lietotņu piedāvā vienreizēju pirkumu lietotnē, nodrošinot jums neierobežotu piekļuvi bez papildu maksām. Šī lietotne - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' piedāvā vienreizēju pirkumu. Tomēr mums ir (vai būs nākotnē) dažas lietotnes, kuras izmanto abonēšanas modeli.	Dauguma mūsų programų siūlo vienkartinius pirkimus, suteikiančius neribotą prieigą be papildomų mokesčių. Ši programa - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' siūlo vienkartinį pirkimą. Tačiau turime (arba ateityje turėsime) kai kurias programas, naudojančias prenumeratos modelį.	Kebanyakan aplikasi kami menawarkan pembelian dalam aplikasi sekali sahaja, memberikan anda akses tanpa had tanpa sebarang bayaran tambahan. Aplikasi ini - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' menawarkan pembelian sekali sahaja. Walau bagaimanapun, kami mempunyai (atau akan mempunyai pada masa hadapan) beberapa aplikasi yang menggunakan model langganan.	De fleste av våre apper tilbyr engangskjøp i appen, noe som gir deg ubegrenset tilgang uten ekstra kostnader. Denne applikasjonen - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' tilbyr et engangskjøp. Vi har imidlertid (eller vil ha i fremtiden) noen apper som bruker en abonnementsmodell.	Większość naszych aplikacji oferuje jednorazowe zakupy w aplikacji, co zapewnia nieograniczony dostęp bez dodatkowych opłat. Ta aplikacja - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' oferuje jednorazowy zakup. Niemniej mamy (lub będziemy mieć w przyszłości) kilka aplikacji, które korzystają z modelu subskrypcyjnego.	A maioria dos nossos aplicativos oferece compras únicas no aplicativo, proporcionando acesso ilimitado sem cobranças adicionais. Este aplicativo - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' oferece uma compra única. No entanto, temos (ou teremos no futuro) alguns aplicativos que utilizam um modelo de assinatura.	Majoritatea aplicațiilor noastre oferă achiziții unice în aplicație, oferindu-vă acces nelimitat fără costuri suplimentare. Această aplicație - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' oferă o achiziție unică. Totuși, avem (sau vom avea în viitor) câteva aplicații care utilizează un model de abonament.	Većina naših aplikacija nudi jednokratne kupovine u aplikaciji, omogućavajući vam neograničen pristup bez dodatnih troškova. Ova aplikacija - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' nudi jednokratnu kupovinu. Međutim, imamo (ili ćemo imati u budućnosti) neke aplikacije koje koriste model pretplate.	我们的大多数应用都提供一次性应用内购买，使您无需额外费用即可获得无限访问权限。该应用程序 - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' 提供一次性购买。然而，我们有（或将来会有）一些使用订阅模式的应用。	Väčšina našich aplikácií ponúka jednorazové nákupy, ktoré vám poskytujú neobmedzený prístup bez ďalších poplatkov. Táto aplikácia - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' ponúka jednorazový nákup. Napriek tomu máme (alebo budeme mať v budúcnosti) niektoré aplikácie, ktoré používajú predplatné.	Večina naših aplikacij ponuja enkratne nakupe v aplikaciji, kar vam omogoča neomejen dostop brez dodatnih stroškov. Ta aplikacija - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' ponuja enkratni nakup. Vendar imamo (ali bomo imeli v prihodnosti) nekaj aplikacij, ki uporabljajo naročninski model.	La mayoría de nuestras aplicaciones ofrecen compras únicas dentro de la aplicación, dándote acceso ilimitado sin cargos adicionales. Esta aplicación - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' ofrece una compra única. Sin embargo, tenemos (o tendremos en el futuro) algunas aplicaciones que utilizan un modelo de suscripción.	De flesta av våra appar erbjuder engångsköp inom appen, vilket ger dig obegränsad åtkomst utan extra avgifter. Denna app - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' erbjuder ett engångsköp. Vi har dock (eller kommer att ha i framtiden) vissa appar som använder en prenumerationsmodell.	Karamihan sa aming mga app ay nag-aalok ng isang beses na pagbili sa loob ng app, na nagbibigay sa iyo ng walang limitasyong access nang walang karagdagang bayad. Ang app na ito - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' ay nag-aalok ng isang beses na pagbili. Gayunpaman, mayroon kami (o magkakaroon sa hinaharap) ng ilang app na gumagamit ng subscription model.	แอปส่วนใหญ่ของเรามีการซื้อในแอปเพียงครั้งเดียว ซึ่งช่วยให้คุณเข้าถึงได้ไม่จำกัดโดยไม่มีค่าใช้จ่ายเพิ่มเติม แอปนี้ - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' มีการซื้อเพียงครั้งเดียว อย่างไรก็ตาม เรามี (หรือจะมีในอนาคต) แอปบางตัวที่ใช้รูปแบบการสมัครใช้งาน.	Çoğu uygulamamız, ekstra ücret olmadan sınırsız erişim sağlayan tek seferlik uygulama içi satın alma seçeneği sunar. Bu uygulama - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' tek seferlik bir satın alma sunar. Ancak, bazı uygulamalarımız (veya gelecekte sahip olacağımız) abonelik modeli kullanmaktadır.	Більшість наших додатків пропонують одноразову покупку, яка надає вам необмежений доступ без додаткових витрат. Цей додаток - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' пропонує одноразову покупку. Проте, у нас є (або будуть у майбутньому) деякі додатки, які використовують модель підписки.	Hầu hết các ứng dụng của chúng tôi cung cấp mua một lần trong ứng dụng, mang đến cho bạn quyền truy cập không giới hạn mà không tính thêm phí. Ứng dụng này - 'Lalafun Coloring For Kids' cung cấp mua một lần. Tuy nhiên, chúng tôi có (hoặc sẽ có trong tương lai) một số ứng dụng sử dụng mô hình đăng ký.
for_parents_FAQ_7_question_android	97	Is an active internet connection required to use your apps?	Требуется ли активное интернет-соединение для использования ваших приложений?	هل يتطلب الاتصال بالإنترنت لاستخدام تطبيقاتكم؟	Необходимо ли е активна интернет връзка за използване на вашите приложения?	Es necessita una connexió a internet activa per utilitzar les vostres aplicacions?	Je li potrebna aktivna internetska veza za korištenje vaših aplikacija?	Je nutné mít aktivní internetové připojení pro používání vašich aplikací?	Kræver det en aktiv internetforbindelse at bruge dine apps?	Is een actieve internetverbinding vereist om uw apps te gebruiken?	Kas teie rakenduste kasutamiseks on vajalik aktiivne internetiühendus?	Vaatiiko sovelluksenne aktiivisen internetyhteyden?	Une connexion Internet active est-elle nécessaire pour utiliser vos applications ?	Ist eine aktive Internetverbindung erforderlich, um Ihre Apps zu nutzen?	Απαιτείται ενεργή σύνδεση στο διαδίκτυο για να χρησιμοποιήσω τις εφαρμογές σας;	האם נדרשת חיבור אינטרנט פעיל כדי להשתמש באפליקציות שלכם?	क्या आपकी ऐप्स का उपयोग करने के लिए सक्रिय इंटरनेट कनेक्शन की आवश्यकता होती है?	Szükséges-e aktív internetkapcsolat az alkalmazásaik használatához?	Apakah koneksi internet aktif diperlukan untuk menggunakan aplikasi Anda?	È necessaria una connessione internet attiva per utilizzare le vostre app?	アプリを使用するにはインターネット接続が必要ですか？	앱을 사용하려면 인터넷 연결이 필요합니까?	Vai, lai izmantotu jūsu lietotnes, ir nepieciešams aktīvs interneta savienojums?	Ar reikia aktyvaus interneto ryšio, norint naudotis jūsų programėlėmis?	Adakah sambungan internet aktif diperlukan untuk menggunakan aplikasi anda?	Krever appene deres en aktiv internettforbindelse?	Czy korzystanie z waszych aplikacji wymaga aktywnego połączenia z internetem?	É necessário ter uma conexão ativa com a internet para usar seus aplicativos?	Este necesară o conexiune activă la internet pentru a utiliza aplicațiile dvs.?	Да ли је потребна активна интернет веза за коришћење ваших апликација?	使用您的应用是否需要始终连接网络?	Vyžaduje používanie vašich aplikácií aktívne pripojenie na internet?	Ali je za uporabo vaših aplikacij potrebno aktivno internetno povezavo?	¿Es necesaria una conexión activa a Internet para utilizar sus aplicaciones?	Krävs en aktiv internetanslutning för att använda era appar?	Kinakailangan ba ang isang aktibong koneksyon sa internet upang magamit ang iyong mga app?	จำเป็นต้องเชื่อมต่ออินเทอร์เน็ตเพื่อใช้แอปของคุณหรือไม่?	Uygulamalarınızı kullanmak İçİn aktİf bİr İnternet bağlantısı gereklİ mİ?	Чи потрібне активне підключення до Інтернету для використання ваших додатків?	Có cần kết nối internet hoạt động để sử dụng ứng dụng của bạn không?
for_parents_FAQ_7_answer_android	98	An active internet connection is required to download and install our apps from the application stores. However, once the app is installed on your device, you can turn OFF the internet connection and use it. Exceptions: Some of our apps may need internet connection to sync game progress, to get updates or to get new content.	Активное интернет-соединение требуется для загрузки и установки наших приложений из магазинов приложений. Однако, после установки приложения на ваше устройство, вы можете отключить интернет и использовать его. Исключения: Некоторые наши приложения могут требовать подключения к интернету для синхронизации игрового прогресса, получения обновлений или нового контента.	يتطلب الاتصال بالإنترنت لتنزيل وتثبيت تطبيقاتنا من متاجر التطبيقات. ومع ذلك، بعد تثبيت التطبيق على جهازك، يمكنك إيقاف تشغيل الاتصال بالإنترنت واستخدامه. الاستثناءات: قد تتطلب بعض تطبيقاتنا الاتصال بالإنترنت لمزامنة تقدم اللعبة أو للحصول على التحديثات أو المحتوى الجديد.	Активна интернет връзка е необходима за изтегляне и инсталиране на нашите приложения от магазините за приложения. Въпреки това, след като приложението е инсталирано на вашето устройство, можете да изключите интернет връзката и да го използвате. Изключения: Някои от нашите приложения може да изискват интернет връзка за синхронизиране на напредъка в играта, за получаване на актуализации или за ново съдържание.	Es necessita una connexió a internet activa per descarregar i instal·lar les nostres aplicacions des de les botigues d'aplicacions. Tanmateix, un cop l'aplicació estigui instal·lada al vostre dispositiu, podeu desactivar la connexió a internet i utilitzar-la. Excepcions: Algunes de les nostres aplicacions poden necessitar connexió a internet per sincronitzar el progrés del joc, obtenir actualitzacions o obtenir contingut nou.	Aktivna internetska veza potrebna je za preuzimanje i instaliranje naših aplikacija iz trgovina aplikacija. Međutim, nakon što je aplikacija instalirana na vaš uređaj, možete isključiti internetsku vezu i koristiti je. Izuzeci: Neke od naših aplikacija mogu trebati internetsku vezu za sinkronizaciju napretka igre, dobivanje ažuriranja ili preuzimanje novog sadržaja.	Aktivní internetové připojení je nutné pro stažení a instalaci našich aplikací z obchodů s aplikacemi. Nicméně, jakmile je aplikace nainstalována na vašem zařízení, můžete internet vypnout a aplikaci používat. Výjimky: Některé naše aplikace mohou vyžadovat internetové připojení k synchronizaci herního pokroku, pro aktualizace nebo pro nový obsah.	En aktiv internetforbindelse er påkrævet for at downloade og installere vores apps fra appbutikkerne. Når appen er installeret på din enhed, kan du dog slå internetforbindelsen fra og bruge den. Undtagelser: Nogle af vores apps kan kræve internetforbindelse til at synkronisere spilfremskridt, modtage opdateringer eller få nyt indhold.	Een actieve internetverbinding is nodig om onze apps te downloaden en te installeren uit de appstores. Zodra de app echter op uw apparaat is geïnstalleerd, kunt u de internetverbinding uitschakelen en de app gebruiken. Uitzonderingen: Sommige van onze apps kunnen een internetverbinding vereisen om de voortgang van het spel te synchroniseren, updates te ontvangen of nieuwe inhoud te krijgen.	Aktiivne internetiühendus on vajalik meie rakenduste allalaadimiseks ja installimiseks rakenduste poest. Kui rakendus on aga teie seadmesse installitud, saate internetiühenduse välja lülitada ja rakendust kasutada. Erandid: Mõned meie rakendused võivad vajada internetiühendust mängu edenemise sünkroonimiseks, värskenduste või uue sisu saamiseks.	Aktiivinen internetyhteys tarvitaan sovellustemme lataamiseen ja asentamiseen sovelluskaupoista. Kun sovellus on asennettu laitteellesi, voit kytkeä internetyhteyden pois päältä ja käyttää sitä. Poikkeukset: Jotkut sovelluksemme voivat vaatia internetyhteyttä pelin etenemisen synkronoimiseksi, päivitysten saamiseksi tai uuden sisällön lataamiseksi.	Une connexion Internet active est requise pour télécharger et installer nos applications depuis les magasins d'applications. Cependant, une fois l'application installée sur votre appareil, vous pouvez désactiver la connexion Internet et l'utiliser. Exceptions : Certaines de nos applications peuvent nécessiter une connexion Internet pour synchroniser la progression du jeu, obtenir des mises à jour ou du nouveau contenu.	Eine aktive Internetverbindung ist erforderlich, um unsere Apps aus den App-Stores herunterzuladen und zu installieren. Sobald die App jedoch auf Ihrem Gerät installiert ist, können Sie die Internetverbindung ausschalten und sie verwenden. Ausnahmen: Einige unserer Apps benötigen möglicherweise eine Internetverbindung, um den Spielfortschritt zu synchronisieren, Updates zu erhalten oder neue Inhalte zu beziehen.	Απαιτείται ενεργή σύνδεση στο διαδίκτυο για να κατεβάσετε και να εγκαταστήσετε τις εφαρμογές μας από τα καταστήματα εφαρμογών. Ωστόσο, μόλις εγκατασταθεί η εφαρμογή στη συσκευή σας, μπορείτε να απενεργοποιήσετε τη σύνδεση στο διαδίκτυο και να τη χρησιμοποιήσετε. Εξαιρέσεις: Ορισμένες από τις εφαρμογές μας μπορεί να απαιτούν σύνδεση στο διαδίκτυο για συγχρονισμό της προόδου του παιχνιδιού, για λήψη ενημερώσεων ή νέου περιεχομένου.	חיבור אינטרנט פעיל נדרש כדי להוריד ולהתקין את האפליקציות שלנו מחנויות האפליקציות. עם זאת, לאחר שהאפליקציה מותקנת במכשיר שלך, ניתן לכבות את החיבור לאינטרנט ולהשתמש בה. יוצאים מן הכלל: חלק מהאפליקציות שלנו עשויות לדרוש חיבור אינטרנט כדי לסנכרן את ההתקדמות במשחק, לקבל עדכונים או תוכן חדש.	हमारी ऐप्स को ऐप स्टोर से डाउनलोड और इंस्टॉल करने के लिए सक्रिय इंटरनेट कनेक्शन की आवश्यकता होती है। हालाँकि, एक बार ऐप आपके डिवाइस पर इंस्टॉल हो जाने के बाद, आप इंटरनेट कनेक्शन को बंद कर सकते हैं और इसका उपयोग कर सकते हैं। अपवाद: हमारी कुछ ऐप्स को गेम प्रगति को सिंक करने, अपडेट प्राप्त करने या नए सामग्री को प्राप्त करने के लिए इंटरनेट कनेक्शन की आवश्यकता हो सकती है।	Aktív internetkapcsolat szükséges az alkalmazások letöltéséhez és telepítéséhez az alkalmazásboltokból. Miután az alkalmazás telepítve van a készülékre, kikapcsolhatja az internetkapcsolatot és használhatja az alkalmazást. Kivételek: Egyes alkalmazásaink internetkapcsolatot igényelhetnek a játék előrehaladásának szinkronizálásához, frissítésekhez vagy új tartalmak fogadásához.	Koneksi internet aktif diperlukan untuk mengunduh dan menginstal aplikasi kami dari toko aplikasi. Namun, setelah aplikasi diinstal di perangkat Anda, Anda dapat mematikan koneksi internet dan menggunakannya. Pengecualian: Beberapa aplikasi kami mungkin memerlukan koneksi internet untuk menyinkronkan kemajuan permainan, menerima pembaruan, atau mendapatkan konten baru.	È necessaria una connessione internet attiva per scaricare e installare le nostre app dagli store delle applicazioni. Tuttavia, una volta che l'app è installata sul dispositivo, puoi disattivare la connessione internet e utilizzarla. Eccezioni: alcune delle nostre app potrebbero richiedere una connessione internet per sincronizzare i progressi del gioco, ricevere aggiornamenti o ottenere nuovi contenuti.	アプリストアからアプリをダウンロードおよびインストールするにはインターネット接続が必要です。ただし、アプリがデバイスにインストールされた後は、インターネット接続をオフにして使用できます。例外：一部のアプリでは、ゲームの進行状況を同期したり、アップデートや新しいコンテンツを取得したりするためにインターネット接続が必要な場合があります。	앱 스토어에서 앱을 다운로드하고 설치하려면 인터넷 연결이 필요합니다。그러나 앱이 기기에 설치된 후에는 인터넷 연결을 끊고 사용할 수 있습니다。예외: 일부 앱은 게임 진행을 동기화하거나 업데이트를 받거나 새로운 콘텐츠를 받기 위해 인터넷 연결이 필요할 수 있습니다。	Aktīvs interneta savienojums ir nepieciešams, lai lejupielādētu un instalētu mūsu lietotnes no lietotņu veikaliem. Kad lietotne ir instalēta ierīcē, varat izslēgt interneta savienojumu un to izmantot. Izņēmumi: dažām mūsu lietotnēm var būt nepieciešams interneta savienojums, lai sinhronizētu spēles progresu, saņemtu atjauninājumus vai iegūtu jaunu saturu.	Aktyvus interneto ryšys reikalingas norint atsisiųsti ir įdiegti mūsų programėles iš programėlių parduotuvių. Tačiau, kai programėlė įdiegta į jūsų įrenginį, galite išjungti interneto ryšį ir ja naudotis. Išimtys: kai kurioms mūsų programėlėms gali prireikti interneto ryšio, kad sinchronizuotų žaidimo progresą, gautų atnaujinimus ar naują turinį.	Sambungan internet aktif diperlukan untuk memuat turun dan memasang aplikasi kami dari kedai aplikasi. Walau bagaimanapun, sebaik sahaja aplikasi dipasang pada peranti anda, anda boleh mematikan sambungan internet dan menggunakannya. Pengecualian: Beberapa aplikasi kami mungkin memerlukan sambungan internet untuk menyegerakkan kemajuan permainan, mendapatkan kemas kini atau mendapatkan kandungan baharu.	En aktiv internettforbindelse er nødvendig for å laste ned og installere våre apper fra app-butikker. Når appen er installert på enheten din, kan du slå av internettforbindelsen og bruke den. Unntak: Noen av appene våre kan kreve internettforbindelse for å synkronisere spillprogresjon, få oppdateringer eller få nytt innhold.	Aktywne połączenie z internetem jest wymagane do pobrania i zainstalowania naszych aplikacji z app store. Po zainstalowaniu aplikacji na urządzeniu, można wyłączyć połączenie z internetem i korzystać z niej. Wyjątki: niektóre nasze aplikacje mogą wymagać połączenia z internetem do synchronizacji postępu gry, otrzymywania aktualizacji lub uzyskiwania nowej zawartości.	Uma conexão ativa com a internet é necessária para baixar e instalar nossos aplicativos das lojas de aplicativos. No entanto, depois que o aplicativo estiver instalado no seu dispositivo, você pode desligar a conexão com a internet e usá-lo. Exceções: alguns dos nossos aplicativos podem precisar de uma conexão com a internet para sincronizar o progresso do jogo, obter atualizações ou novos conteúdos.	Este necesară o conexiune activă la internet pentru a descărca și instala aplicațiile noastre din magazinele de aplicații. Cu toate acestea, odată ce aplicația este instalată pe dispozitivul dvs., puteți opri conexiunea la internet și să o utilizați. Excepții: Unele dintre aplicațiile noastre pot necesita o conexiune la internet pentru a sincroniza progresul jocului, a obține actualizări sau a obține conținut nou.	Активна интернет веза је потребна за преузимање и инсталацију наших апликација из продавница апликација. Међутим, када је апликација инсталирана на вашем уређају, можете искључити интернет везу и користити је. Изузеци: Неке наше апликације могу захтевати интернет везу за синхронизацију напретка у игри, добијање ажурирања или добијање новог садржаја.	需要网络连接来从应用商店下载和安装我们的应用程序。然而，一旦应用安装到您的设备上，您可以关闭网络连接并使用它。例外：我们的一些应用可能需要网络连接来同步游戏进度、获取更新或新内容。	Aktívne pripojenie na internet je potrebné na stiahnutie a inštaláciu našich aplikácií z obchodov s aplikáciami. Keď je aplikácia nainštalovaná na vašom zariadení, môžete pripojenie na internet vypnúť a aplikáciu používať. Výnimky: Niektoré z našich aplikácií môžu vyžadovať pripojenie na internet na synchronizáciu herného postupu, získanie aktualizácií alebo nového obsahu.	Aktivno internetno povezavo je potrebno za prenos in namestitev naših aplikacij iz trgovin z aplikacijami. Ko je aplikacija nameščena na vašo napravo, lahko izklopite internetno povezavo in jo uporabljate. Izjeme: Nekatere naše aplikacije lahko zahtevajo internetno povezavo za sinhronizacijo napredka igre, pridobivanje posodobitev ali nove vsebine.	Es necesaria una conexión activa a Internet para descargar e instalar nuestras aplicaciones desde las tiendas de aplicaciones. Sin embargo, una vez que la aplicación está instalada en tu dispositivo, puedes apagar la conexión a Internet y seguir usándola. Excepciones: Algunas de nuestras aplicaciones pueden necesitar conexión a Internet para sincronizar el progreso del juego, obtener actualizaciones o recibir nuevo contenido.	En aktiv internetanslutning krävs för att ladda ner och installera våra appar från appbutikerna. När appen är installerad på din enhet kan du stänga av internetanslutningen och använda den. Undantag: Vissa av våra appar kan behöva internetanslutning för att synkronisera spelprogression, få uppdateringar eller hämta nytt innehåll.	Kinakailangan ang aktibong koneksyon sa internet upang i-download at i-install ang aming mga app mula sa mga tindahan ng app. Gayunpaman, kapag naka-install na ang app sa iyong device, maaari mong patayin ang koneksyon sa internet at gamitin ito. Mga exception: Ang ilan sa aming mga app ay maaaring mangailangan ng koneksyon sa internet upang i-sync ang progreso ng laro, makakuha ng mga update o makakuha ng bagong nilalaman.	การเชื่อมต่ออินเทอร์เน็ตที่ใช้งานอยู่จำเป็นสำหรับการดาวน์โหลดและติดตั้งแอปจากร้านแอป อย่างไรก็ตามเมื่อแอปติดตั้งแล้ว คุณสามารถปิดการเชื่อมต่ออินเทอร์เน็ตและยังคงใช้งานได้ ยกเว้น: แอปบางส่วนของเราอาจต้องการการเชื่อมต่ออินเทอร์เน็ตเพื่อซิงค์ความคืบหน้าของเกม รับการอัปเดต หรือรับเนื้อหาใหม่	Uygulamalarımızı uygulama mağazalarından İndİrmek ve yüklemek İçİn aktİf bİr İnternet bağlantısı gereklİdİr. Ancak, uygulama cİhazınıza yüklendİkten sonra İnternet bağlantısını kapatabİlİr ve kullanabİlİrsİnİz. İstİsnalar: Bazı uygulamalarımız oyun İlerlemesİnİ senkronİze etmek, güncellemelerİ almak veya yenİ İçerİk almak İçİn İnternet bağlantısına İhtİyaç duyabİlİr.	Активне підключення до Інтернету потрібне для завантаження та встановлення наших додатків із магазинів додатків. Однак після встановлення програми на ваш пристрій ви можете вимкнути Інтернет і використовувати її. Винятки: Деякі з наших додатків можуть потребувати підключення до Інтернету для синхронізації прогресу в грі, отримання оновлень або нового контенту.	Cần có kết nối internet để tải xuống và cài đặt ứng dụng của chúng tôi từ cửa hàng ứng dụng. Tuy nhiên, khi ứng dụng đã được cài đặt trên thiết bị của bạn, bạn có thể tắt kết nối internet và sử dụng nó. Ngoại lệ: Một số ứng dụng của chúng tôi có thể cần kết nối internet để đồng bộ tiến độ trò chơi, nhận cập nhật hoặc nhận nội dung mới.
for_parents_FAQ_8_question_android	99	Do you have any advertisements within your apps?	Есть ли у ваших приложений реклама?	هل تحتوي تطبيقاتكم على إعلانات؟	Имат ли вашите приложения реклами?	Tenen els vostres aplicacions anuncis?	Imate li oglase u svojim aplikacijama?	Obsahují vaše aplikace reklamy?	Har dine apps reklamer?	Hebben uw apps advertenties?	Kas teie rakendustes on reklaame?	Onko sovelluksissanne mainoksia?	Y a-t-il des publicités dans vos applications ?	Gibt es in Ihren Apps Werbung?	Υπάρχουν διαφημίσεις στις εφαρμογές σας;	האם יש פרסומות באפליקציות פתח גרסה מלאה	क्या आपकी ऐप्स में विज्ञापन होते हैं?	Van reklám az alkalmazásaikban?	Apakah ada iklan dalam aplikasi Anda?	Ci sono annunci pubblicitari nelle vostre app?	アプリに広告はありますか？	앱에 광고가 있습니까?	Vai jūsu lietotnēs ir reklāmas?	Ar jūsų programėlėse yra reklamos?	Adakah aplikasi anda mempunyai iklan?	Har appene deres annonser?	Czy wasze aplikacje mają reklamy?	Os seus aplicativos têm anúncios?	Aplicațiile dvs. au reclame?	Да ли ваше апликације имају огласе?	您的应用有广告吗?	Majú vaše aplikácie reklamy?	Ali imajo vaše aplikacije oglase?	¿Sus aplicaciones tienen anuncios?	Har era appar annonser?	Mayroon bang mga advertisement sa iyong mga app?	แอปของคุณมีโฆษณาหรือไม่?	Uygulamalarınızda reklam var mı?	Чи є у ваших додатках реклама?	Ứng dụng của bạn có quảng cáo không?
for_parents_FAQ_8_answer_android	100	Our apps are completely ad-free. There is only the "More Apps" section, which is protected by a parental gate, making it inaccessible to children. You can disable this section by turning off the internet connection before launching the app. 	Наши приложения полностью свободны от рекламы. Есть только раздел "Другие приложения", который защищен родительским контролем, что делает его недоступным для детей. Вы можете отключить этот раздел, отключив интернет перед запуском приложения.	تطبيقاتنا خالية تمامًا من الإعلانات. يوجد فقط قسم "المزيد من التطبيقات"، وهو محمي بواسطة بوابة الوالدين، مما يجعله غير متاح للأطفال. يمكنك تعطيل هذا القسم عن طريق إيقاف تشغيل الاتصال بالإنترنت قبل تشغيل التطبيق.	Нашите приложения са напълно без реклами. Има само секция "Още приложения", която е защитена от родителска защита, правейки я недостъпна за деца. Можете да деактивирате тази секция, като изключите интернет връзката преди стартиране на приложението.	Les nostres aplicacions estan completament lliures d'anuncis. Només hi ha la secció "Més aplicacions", que està protegida per una porta parental, fent-la inaccessible per als nens. Podeu desactivar aquesta secció desactivant la connexió a internet abans de llançar l'aplicació.	Naše aplikacije su potpuno bez oglasa. Postoji samo dio "Više aplikacija", koji je zaštićen roditeljskim zaključavanjem, čime je nedostupan djeci. Ovaj dio možete onemogućiti isključivanjem internetske veze prije pokretanja aplikacije.	Naše aplikace jsou zcela bez reklam. Je zde pouze sekce "Další aplikace", která je chráněna rodičovskou branou, což ji činí nepřístupnou pro děti. Můžete tuto sekci deaktivovat tím, že před spuštěním aplikace vypnete internetové připojení.	Vores apps er helt uden reklamer. Der er kun sektionen "Flere apps", som er beskyttet af en forældreport, hvilket gør den utilgængelig for børn. Du kan deaktivere denne sektion ved at slukke for internetforbindelsen, inden du starter appen.	Onze apps zijn volledig advertentievrij. Er is alleen de sectie "Meer apps", die beschermd is door een ouderpoort, waardoor deze niet toegankelijk is voor kinderen. U kunt deze sectie uitschakelen door de internetverbinding uit te schakelen voordat u de app start.	Meie rakendused on täiesti reklaamivabad. On ainult jaotis "Veel rakendusi", mis on kaitstud vanemaluku abil, muutes selle lastele kättesaamatuks. Saate selle jaotise keelata, lülitades enne rakenduse käivitamist välja internetiühenduse.	Sovelluksemme ovat täysin mainosvapaita. Ainoa "Lisää sovelluksia" -osio on suojattu vanhemmuuden portilla, mikä tekee siitä lasten ulottumattomissa. Voit poistaa tämän osion käytöstä katkaisemalla internetyhteyden ennen sovelluksen käynnistämistä.	Nos applications sont totalement exemptes de publicités. Il n'y a que la section "Plus d'applications", qui est protégée par une porte parentale, la rendant inaccessible aux enfants. Vous pouvez désactiver cette section en désactivant la connexion Internet avant de lancer l'application.	Unsere Apps sind komplett werbefrei. Es gibt nur den Abschnitt "Weitere Apps", der durch eine Kindersicherung geschützt ist und somit für Kinder unzugänglich ist. Sie können diesen Abschnitt deaktivieren, indem Sie die Internetverbindung ausschalten, bevor Sie die App starten.	Οι εφαρμογές μας είναι εντελώς χωρίς διαφημίσεις. Υπάρχει μόνο η ενότητα "Περισσότερες εφαρμογές", η οποία προστατεύεται από γονικό κλείδωμα, καθιστώντας την απρόσιτη για τα παιδιά. Μπορείτε να απενεργοποιήσετε αυτή την ενότητα απενεργοποιώντας τη σύνδεση στο διαδίκτυο πριν εκκινήσετε την εφαρμογή.	האפליקציות שלנו חסרות פרסומות לחלוטין. יש רק את החלק "עוד אפליקציות", המוגן על ידי שער הורים, כך שהוא לא נגיש לילדים. ניתן להשבית את החלק הזה על ידי ניתוק חיבור האינטרנט לפני הפעלת האפליקציה.	हमारी ऐप्स पूरी तरह से विज्ञापन-मुक्त हैं। केवल "और ऐप्स" अनुभाग है, जो पैरेंटल गेट द्वारा संरक्षित है, जिससे यह बच्चों के लिए अप्राप्य है। आप इस अनुभाग को ऐप लॉन्च करने से पहले इंटरनेट कनेक्शन बंद करके अक्षम कर सकते हैं।	Alkalmazásaink teljesen reklámmentesek. Csak a "További alkalmazások" szakasz található, amelyet szülői zár véd, így a gyermekek számára nem elérhető. Letilthatja ezt a szakaszt, ha az alkalmazás indítása előtt kikapcsolja az internetkapcsolatot.	Aplikasi kami sepenuhnya bebas iklan. Hanya ada bagian "Aplikasi Lainnya", yang dilindungi oleh gerbang orang tua, sehingga tidak dapat diakses oleh anak-anak. Anda dapat menonaktifkan bagian ini dengan mematikan koneksi internet sebelum meluncurkan aplikasi.	Le nostre app sono completamente prive di annunci. C'è solo la sezione "Altre app", che è protetta da un parental gate, rendendola inaccessibile ai bambini. Puoi disabilitare questa sezione disattivando la connessione internet prima di avviare l'app.	私たちのアプリは完全に広告なしです。「他のアプリ」セクションのみがあり、これはペアレンタルゲートによって保護されており、子供がアクセスできないようになっています。アプリを起動する前にインターネット接続をオフにすることで、このセクションを無効にすることができます。	저희 앱은 완전히 광고가 없습니다。"추가 앱" 섹션만 있으며, 이는 부모 게이트에 의해 보호되어 있어 아이들이 접근할 수 없습니다。앱을 시작하기 전에 인터넷 연결을 끊으면 이 섹션을 비활성화할 수 있습니다。	Mūsu lietotnes ir pilnīgi bez reklāmām. Ir tikai sadaļa "Vairāk lietotņu", kas ir aizsargāta ar vecāku vārtiem, padarot to nepieejamu bērniem. Varat atspējot šo sadaļu, pirms lietotnes palaišanas izslēdzot interneta savienojumu.	Mūsų programėlės yra visiškai be reklamų. Yra tik skiltis "Daugiau programėlių", kuri yra apsaugota tėvų vartais, todėl vaikai negali prie jos prieiti. Šią skiltį galite išjungti, išjungdami interneto ryšį prieš paleisdami programėlę.	Aplikasi kami bebas daripada iklan sepenuhnya. Hanya terdapat bahagian "Lebih Banyak Aplikasi", yang dilindungi oleh pintu ibu bapa, menjadikannya tidak dapat diakses oleh kanak-kanak. Anda boleh menyahaktifkan bahagian ini dengan mematikan sambungan internet sebelum melancarkan aplikasi.	Appene våre er helt annonseløse. Det er bare en "Flere apper"-seksjon som er beskyttet av en foreldreport, noe som gjør den utilgjengelig for barn. Du kan deaktivere denne seksjonen ved å slå av internettforbindelsen før du starter appen.	Nasze aplikacje są całkowicie wolne od reklam. Jest tylko sekcja "Więcej aplikacji", która jest chroniona przez bramkę rodzicielską, co uniemożliwia dostęp dzieciom. Możesz wyłączyć tę sekcję, wyłączając połączenie z internetem przed uruchomieniem aplikacji.	Nossos aplicativos são completamente livres de anúncios. Há apenas a seção "Mais Aplicativos", que é protegida por um controle parental, tornando-a inacessível às crianças. Você pode desativar essa seção desligando a conexão com a internet antes de iniciar o aplicativo.	Aplicațiile noastre sunt complet fără reclame. Există doar secțiunea "Mai multe aplicații", care este protejată de un control parental, făcând-o inaccesibilă copiilor. Puteți dezactiva această secțiune dezactivând conexiunea la internet înainte de a lansa aplicația.	Наше апликације су потпуно без огласа. Постоји само одељак „Више апликација“, који је заштићен родитељском заштитом, чиме је недоступан деци. Можете онемогућити овај одељак искључивањем интернет везе пре покретања апликације.	我们的应用完全没有广告。只有“更多应用”部分，受到家长控制保护，不允许儿童访问。您可以在启动应用之前关闭网络连接以禁用此部分。	Naše aplikácie sú úplne bez reklám. Existuje len sekcia „Viac aplikácií“, ktorá je chránená rodičovskou bránou a je tak neprístupná deťom. Túto sekciu môžete vypnúť vypnutím pripojenia na internet pred spustením aplikácie.	Naše aplikacije so popolnoma brez oglasov. Obstaja samo razdelek „Več aplikacij“, ki je zaščiten z varovalom za starše, zaradi česar je nedostopen otrokom. Ta razdelek lahko onemogočite tako, da izklopite internetno povezavo pred zagonom aplikacije.	Nuestras aplicaciones están completamente libres de anuncios. Solo hay una sección de "Más aplicaciones", que está protegida por una puerta parental, lo que la hace inaccesible para los niños. Puedes desactivar esta sección apagando la conexión a Internet antes de iniciar la aplicación.	Våra appar är helt annonsfria. Det finns bara avsnittet "Fler appar", som skyddas av en föräldraportal och därmed är otillgängligt för barn. Du kan inaktivera detta avsnitt genom att stänga av internetanslutningen innan du startar appen.	Ang aming mga app ay ganap na walang mga advertisement. Mayroon lamang seksyon na "Higit pang mga App", na protektado ng parental gate, kaya't hindi ito ma-access ng mga bata. Maaari mong i-disable ang seksyon na ito sa pamamagitan ng pag-patay sa koneksyon sa internet bago ilunsad ang app.	แอปของเราปราศจากโฆษณาโดยสมบูรณ์ มีเพียงส่วนของ "แอปเพิ่มเติม" ที่ได้รับการป้องกันด้วยเกตสำหรับผู้ปกครอง ทำให้เด็กไม่สามารถเข้าถึงได้ คุณสามารถปิดใช้งานส่วนนี้ได้โดยการปิดการเชื่อมต่ออินเทอร์เน็ตก่อนเปิดแอป	Uygulamalarımız tamamen reklamsızdır. Sadece ebeveyn kontrolü İle korunan "Daha Fazla Uygulama" bölümü vardır ve bu, çocuklar tarafından erİşİlemez. Bu bölümü devre dışı bırakmak İçİn uygulamayı başlatmadan önce İnternet bağlantısını kapatabİlİrsİnİz.	Наші додатки повністю без реклами. Є лише розділ "Більше додатків", який захищений батьківським контролем, що робить його недоступним для дітей. Ви можете вимкнути цей розділ, вимкнувши Інтернет перед запуском додатку.	Các ứng dụng của chúng tôi hoàn toàn không có quảng cáo. Chỉ có phần "Ứng dụng khác", được bảo vệ bằng cổng cha mẹ, làm cho trẻ em không thể truy cập. Bạn có thể tắt phần này bằng cách tắt kết nối internet trước khi khởi động ứng dụng.
for_parents_FAQ_9_question_android	101	Is the app free?	Приложение бесплатно?	هل التطبيق مجاني؟	Безплатно ли е приложението?	L'aplicació és gratuïta?	Je li aplikacija besplatna?	Je aplikace zdarma?	Er appen gratis?	Is de app gratis?	Kas rakendus on tasuta?	Onko sovellus ilmainen?	L'application est-elle gratuite ?	Ist die App kostenlos?	Η εφαρμογή είναι δωρεάν;	האם האפליקציה בחינם?	क्या ऐप मुफ्त है?	Ingyenes az alkalmazás?	Apakah aplikasi ini gratis?	L'app è gratuita?	アプリは無料ですか？	앱이 무료인가요?	Vai lietotne ir bezmaksas?	Ar programa yra nemokama?	Adakah aplikasi ini percuma?	Er appen gratis?	Czy aplikacja jest darmowa?	O aplicativo é gratuito?	Aplicația este gratuită?	Da li je aplikacija besplatna?	这款应用是免费的吗？	Je aplikácia zadarmo?	Ali je aplikacija brezplačna?	¿La aplicación es gratuita?	Är appen gratis?	Libre ba ang app?	แอปนี้ฟรีหรือไม่?	Uygulama ücretsiz mi?	Чи безкоштовний додаток?	Ứng dụng có miễn phí không?
for_parents_FAQ_9_answer_android	102	The app is free to download and includes a variety of coloring pages and animations. Additional content can be purchased as optional in-app packs.	Приложение можно бесплатно скачать и использовать. Оно включает множество раскрасок и анимаций. Дополнительный контент можно приобрести через опциональные пакеты внутри приложения.	التطبيق مجاني للتنزيل ويشمل مجموعة متنوعة من صفحات التلوين والرسوم المتحركة. يمكن شراء محتوى إضافي كحزم اختيارية داخل التطبيق.	Приложението е безплатно за изтегляне и включва разнообразие от оцветявания и анимации. Допълнително съдържание може да се закупи като опционални пакети в приложението.	L'aplicació és gratuïta per descarregar i inclou una varietat de pàgines per pintar i animacions. Contingut addicional es pot adquirir com a paquets opcionals dins de l'aplicació.	Aplikacija je besplatna za preuzimanje i uključuje razne stranice za bojanje i animacije. Dodatni sadržaj može se kupiti kao opcionalni paketi unutar aplikacije.	Aplikace je zdarma ke stažení a zahrnuje různé omalovánky a animace. Další obsah lze zakoupit jako volitelné balíčky v aplikaci.	Appen er gratis at downloade og inkluderer en række farvelægningssider og animationer. Yderligere indhold kan købes som valgfrie in-app-pakker.	De app is gratis te downloaden en bevat verschillende kleurplaten en animaties. Extra inhoud kan worden aangeschaft als optionele in-app pakketten.	Rakendus on tasuta allalaaditav ja sisaldab mitmesuguseid värvimislehti ja animatsioone. Lisasisu saab osta valikuliste rakendusesiseste pakkidena.	Sovellus on ilmainen ladata ja sisältää monia värityssivuja ja animaatioita. Lisäsisältöä voi ostaa valinnaisina sovelluksen sisäisinä paketteina.	L'application est gratuite à télécharger et comprend une variété de pages à colorier et d'animations. Du contenu supplémentaire peut être acheté sous forme de packs optionnels dans l'application.	Die App ist kostenlos herunterladbar und enthält eine Vielzahl von Malvorlagen und Animationen. Zusätzliche Inhalte können als optionale In-App-Pakete gekauft werden.	Η εφαρμογή είναι δωρεάν για λήψη και περιλαμβάνει μια ποικιλία από σελίδες ζωγραφικής και κινούμενα σχέδια. Επιπλέον περιεχόμενο μπορεί να αγοραστεί μέσω προαιρετικών πακέτων εντός της εφαρμογής.	האפליקציה ניתנת להורדה בחינם וכוללת מגוון דפי צביעה ואנימציות. תוכן נוסף ניתן לרכישה כחבילות אופציונליות בתוך האפליקציה.	ऐप मुफ्त में डाउनलोड किया जा सकता है और इसमें कई रंग भरने के पृष्ठ और एनिमेशन शामिल हैं। अतिरिक्त सामग्री को वैकल्पिक इन-ऐप पैक्स के रूप में खरीदा जा सकता है।	Az alkalmazás ingyenesen letölthető, és számos színező oldalt és animációt tartalmaz. További tartalmak vásárolhatók meg választható alkalmazáson belüli csomagokként.	Aplikasi ini gratis untuk diunduh dan mencakup berbagai halaman mewarnai dan animasi. Konten tambahan dapat dibeli sebagai paket opsional dalam aplikasi.	L'app è gratuita da scaricare e include una varietà di pagine da colorare e animazioni. Contenuti aggiuntivi possono essere acquistati come pacchetti opzionali all'interno dell'app.	アプリは無料でダウンロードでき、さまざまな塗り絵ページやアニメーションが含まれています。追加のコンテンツは、オプションのアプリ内パックとして購入できます。	앱은 무료로 다운로드할 수 있으며 다양한 색칠하기 페이지와 애니메이션이 포함되어 있습니다. 추가 콘텐츠는 선택형 인앱 패키지로 구매할 수 있습니다.	Lietotni var lejupielādēt bez maksas, un tajā ir pieejamas dažādas krāsošanas lapas un animācijas. Papildu saturu var iegādāties kā izvēles paku lietotnē.	Programą galima atsisiųsti nemokamai ir ji apima įvairius spalvinimo puslapius bei animacijas. Papildomas turinys gali būti įsigytas kaip pasirenkami paketai programoje.	Aplikasi ini percuma untuk dimuat turun dan termasuk pelbagai halaman mewarna dan animasi. Kandungan tambahan boleh dibeli sebagai pakej dalam aplikasi pilihan.	Appen er gratis å laste ned og inkluderer et utvalg fargeleggingsark og animasjoner. Ekstra innhold kan kjøpes som valgfrie pakker i appen.	Aplikacja jest darmowa do pobrania i zawiera różnorodne kolorowanki i animacje. Dodatkowe treści można kupić jako opcjonalne pakiety w aplikacji.	O aplicativo é gratuito para download e inclui uma variedade de páginas para colorir e animações. Conteúdos adicionais podem ser adquiridos como pacotes opcionais dentro do aplicativo.	Aplicația este gratuită pentru descărcare și include o varietate de pagini de colorat și animații. Conținut suplimentar poate fi achiziționat sub formă de pachete opționale în aplicație.	Aplikacija je besplatna za preuzimanje i uključuje razne stranice za bojenje i animacije. Dodatni sadržaj može se kupiti kao opcioni paketi unutar aplikacije.	这款应用可以免费下载，并包括各种涂色页和动画。额外内容可以作为应用内的可选包购买。	Aplikácia je zadarmo na stiahnutie a obsahuje rôzne maľovanky a animácie. Ďalší obsah je možné zakúpiť ako voliteľné balíčky v aplikácii.	Aplikacija je brezplačna za prenos in vključuje različne pobarvanke in animacije. Dodatno vsebino je mogoče kupiti kot izbirne pakete znotraj aplikacije.	La aplicación es gratuita para descargar e incluye una variedad de páginas para colorear y animaciones. Contenido adicional se puede adquirir como paquetes opcionales dentro de la aplicación.	Appen är gratis att ladda ner och inkluderar en mängd olika färgläggningssidor och animationer. Ytterligare innehåll kan köpas som valfria paket i appen.	Ang app ay libre i-download at may kasamang iba't ibang coloring pages at animations. Ang karagdagang content ay maaaring bilhin bilang mga opsyonal na in-app packages.	แอปนี้สามารถดาวน์โหลดได้ฟรีและมีหน้าระบายสีและแอนิเมชันมากมาย เนื้อหาเพิ่มเติมสามารถซื้อได้ในรูปแบบแพ็กเกจเสริมภายในแอป.	Uygulama ücretsiz olarak indirilebilir ve çeşitli boyama sayfaları ile animasyonlar içerir. Ek içerikler isteğe bağlı uygulama içi paketler olarak satın alınabilir.	Додаток можна завантажити безкоштовно, і він містить різноманітні розмальовки та анімації. Додатковий контент можна придбати як опціональні пакети в додатку.	Ứng dụng được tải xuống miễn phí và bao gồm nhiều trang tô màu và hoạt hình. Nội dung bổ sung có thể được mua dưới dạng gói tùy chọn trong ứng dụng.
for_parents_FAQ_10_question_android	103	Is the app safe for kids?	Приложение безопасно для детей?	هل التطبيق آمن للأطفال؟	Приложението безопасно ли е за деца?	És segura l'aplicació per als nens?	Je li aplikacija sigurna za djecu?	Je aplikace bezpečná pro děti?	Er appen sikker for børn?	Is de app veilig voor kinderen?	Kas rakendus on lastele ohutu?	Onko sovellus turvallinen lapsille?	L'application est-elle sûre pour les enfants ?	Ist die App sicher für Kinder?	Η εφαρμογή είναι ασφαλής για παιδιά;	האם האפליקציה בטוחה לילדים?	क्या ऐप बच्चों के लिए सुरक्षित है?	Biztonságos az alkalmazás gyerekek számára?	Apakah aplikasi ini aman untuk anak-anak?	L'app è sicura per i bambini?	アプリは子供に安全ですか？	앱이 어린이에게 안전한가요?	Vai lietotne ir droša bērniem?	Ar programa yra saugi vaikams?	Adakah aplikasi ini selamat untuk kanak-kanak?	Er appen trygg for barn?	Czy aplikacja jest bezpieczna dla dzieci?	O aplicativo é seguro para crianças?	Aplicația este sigură pentru copii?	Da li je aplikacija sigurna za decu?	这款应用对孩子安全吗？	Je aplikácia bezpečná pre deti?	Ali je aplikacija varna za otroke?	¿Es segura la aplicación para los niños?	Är appen säker för barn?	Ligtas ba ang app para sa mga bata?	แอปนี้ปลอดภัยสำหรับเด็กหรือไม่?	Uygulama çocuklar için güvenli mi?	Чи безпечний додаток для дітей?	Ứng dụng có an toàn cho trẻ em không?
for_parents_FAQ_10_answer_android	104	Yes, the app is designed specifically for children with strict safety measures. It has no ads, no external links, and does not collect personal data.	Да, приложение разработано специально для детей с учетом строгих мер безопасности. В нем нет рекламы, внешних ссылок и оно не собирает личные данные.	نعم، تم تصميم التطبيق خصيصًا للأطفال مع اتخاذ تدابير أمان صارمة. لا يحتوي على إعلانات أو روابط خارجية ولا يجمع بيانات شخصية.	Да, приложението е специално проектирано за деца със строги мерки за безопасност. То няма реклами, външни връзки и не събира лични данни.	Sí, l'aplicació està dissenyada específicament per a nens amb estrictes mesures de seguretat. No conté anuncis, enllaços externs ni recopila dades personals.	Da, aplikacija je dizajnirana posebno za djecu uz stroge mjere sigurnosti. Nema oglasa, vanjskih poveznica i ne prikuplja osobne podatke.	Ano, aplikace je navržena speciálně pro děti s přísnými bezpečnostními opatřeními. Nemá žádné reklamy, externí odkazy a neshromažďuje osobní údaje.	Ja, appen er designet specifikt til børn med strenge sikkerhedsforanstaltninger. Den har ingen annoncer, ingen eksterne links og indsamler ikke personlige data.	Ja, de app is speciaal ontworpen voor kinderen met strenge veiligheidsmaatregelen. Er zijn geen advertenties, geen externe links en de app verzamelt geen persoonlijke gegevens.	Jah, rakendus on loodud spetsiaalselt lastele, järgides rangeid turvameetmeid. Sellel pole reklaame, väliseid linke ega isikuandmete kogumist.	Kyllä, sovellus on suunniteltu erityisesti lapsille ja siinä on tiukat turvallisuustoimenpiteet. Siinä ei ole mainoksia, ulkoisia linkkejä eikä se kerää henkilötietoja.	Oui, l'application est conçue spécifiquement pour les enfants avec des mesures de sécurité strictes. Elle ne contient pas de publicités, pas de liens externes et ne collecte pas de données personnelles.	Ja, die App ist speziell für Kinder mit strengen Sicherheitsmaßnahmen entwickelt worden. Es gibt keine Werbung, keine externen Links und die App sammelt keine persönlichen Daten.	Ναι, η εφαρμογή έχει σχεδιαστεί ειδικά για παιδιά με αυστηρά μέτρα ασφαλείας. Δεν έχει διαφημίσεις, εξωτερικούς συνδέσμους και δεν συλλέγει προσωπικά δεδομένα.	כן, האפליקציה תוכננה במיוחד לילדים עם אמצעי בטיחות קפדניים. אין בה פרסומות, קישורים חיצוניים והיא אינה אוספת נתונים אישיים.	हाँ, ऐप को बच्चों के लिए विशेष रूप से डिज़ाइन किया गया है और इसमें सख्त सुरक्षा उपाय हैं। इसमें कोई विज्ञापन, बाहरी लिंक नहीं हैं और यह व्यक्तिगत डेटा एकत्र नहीं करता।	Igen, az alkalmazást kifejezetten gyerekek számára tervezték szigorú biztonsági intézkedésekkel. Nem tartalmaz hirdetéseket, külső hivatkozásokat, és nem gyűjt személyes adatokat.	Ya, aplikasi ini dirancang khusus untuk anak-anak dengan langkah-langkah keamanan yang ketat. Tidak ada iklan, tautan eksternal, dan tidak mengumpulkan data pribadi.	Sì, l'app è progettata specificamente per i bambini con misure di sicurezza rigorose. Non contiene pubblicità, link esterni e non raccoglie dati personali.	はい、このアプリは子供向けに設計されており、厳格な安全対策が取られています。広告や外部リンクはなく、個人情報を収集しません。	네, 이 앱은 엄격한 안전 조치를 통해 어린이를 위해 특별히 설계되었습니다. 광고나 외부 링크가 없으며 개인 정보를 수집하지 않습니다.	Jā, lietotne ir īpaši izstrādāta bērniem ar stingriem drošības pasākumiem. Tajā nav reklāmu, ārējo saišu, un tā neievāc personisko informāciju.	Taip, programa sukurta specialiai vaikams su griežtomis saugumo priemonėmis. Joje nėra reklamų, išorinių nuorodų ir ji nerenka asmens duomenų.	Ya, aplikasi ini direka khas untuk kanak-kanak dengan langkah keselamatan yang ketat. Ia tidak mengandungi iklan, pautan luar, dan tidak mengumpul data peribadi.	Ja, appen er spesielt designet for barn med strenge sikkerhetstiltak. Den har ingen annonser, ingen eksterne lenker og samler ikke inn personopplysninger.	Tak, aplikacja została zaprojektowana specjalnie dla dzieci z zastosowaniem rygorystycznych środków bezpieczeństwa. Nie zawiera reklam, linków zewnętrznych i nie zbiera danych osobowych.	Sim, o aplicativo foi desenvolvido especificamente para crianças com medidas de segurança rigorosas. Não possui anúncios, links externos e não coleta dados pessoais.	Da, aplicația este special concepută pentru copii, având măsuri stricte de siguranță. Nu are reclame, link-uri externe și nu colectează date personale.	Da, aplikacija je posebno dizajnirana za decu sa strogim merama bezbednosti. Nema reklama, spoljašnjih linkova i ne prikuplja lične podatke.	是的，这款应用是专为儿童设计的，采用了严格的安全措施。没有广告、外部链接，也不收集个人数据。	Áno, aplikácia je navrhnutá špeciálne pre deti s prísnymi bezpečnostnými opatreniami. Neobsahuje reklamy, externé odkazy a nezhromažďuje osobné údaje.	Da, aplikacija je posebej zasnovana za otroke z najstrožjimi varnostnimi ukrepi. Ne vsebuje oglasov, zunanjih povezav in ne zbira osebnih podatkov.	Sí, la aplicación está diseñada específicamente para niños con estrictas medidas de seguridad. No contiene anuncios, enlaces externos ni recopila datos personales.	Ja, appen är specifikt utformad för barn med strikta säkerhetsåtgärder. Den innehåller inga annonser, externa länkar och samlar inte in personuppgifter.	Oo, ang app ay espesyal na dinisenyo para sa mga bata at may mahigpit na safety measures. Walang ads, walang external links, at hindi ito nangongolekta ng personal data.	ใช่ แอปนี้ออกแบบมาโดยเฉพาะสำหรับเด็กพร้อมมาตรการความปลอดภัยที่เข้มงวด ไม่มีโฆษณา ไม่มีลิงก์ภายนอก และไม่เก็บข้อมูลส่วนบุคคล.	Evet, uygulama çocuklar için özel olarak tasarlanmış ve sıkı güvenlik önlemleri ile donatılmıştır. Reklam içermez, harici bağlantılar yoktur ve kişisel veri toplamaz.	Так, додаток розроблений спеціально для дітей з урахуванням суворих заходів безпеки. У ньому немає реклами, зовнішніх посилань і він не збирає особисті дані.	Có, ứng dụng được thiết kế đặc biệt cho trẻ em với các biện pháp bảo mật nghiêm ngặt. Ứng dụng không có quảng cáo, không có liên kết bên ngoài và không thu thập dữ liệu cá nhân.
for_parents_FAQ_11_question_android	105	How often is new content added?	Как часто добавляется новый контент?	كم مرة يتم إضافة محتوى جديد؟	Колко често се добавя ново съдържание?	Amb quina freqüència s'afegeix nou contingut?	Koliko često se dodaje novi sadržaj?	Jak často se přidává nový obsah?	Hvor ofte tilføjes nyt indhold?	Hoe vaak wordt er nieuwe inhoud toegevoegd?	Kui tihti lisatakse uut sisu?	Kuinka usein uutta sisältöä lisätään?	À quelle fréquence du nouveau contenu est-il ajouté ?	Wie oft wird neuer Inhalt hinzugefügt?	Πόσο συχνά προστίθεται νέο περιεχόμενο;	כל כמה זמן מתווסף תוכן חדש?	नया सामग्री कितनी बार जोड़ा जाता है?	Milyen gyakran kerül új tartalom hozzáadásra?	Seberapa sering konten baru ditambahkan?	Con quale frequenza vengono aggiunti nuovi contenuti?	新しいコンテンツはどのくらいの頻度で追加されますか？	새로운 콘텐츠는 얼마나 자주 추가되나요?	Cik bieži tiek pievienots jauns saturs?	Kaip dažnai pridedamas naujas turinys?	Berapa kerap kandungan baharu ditambahkan?	Hvor ofte legges det til nytt innhold?	Jak często dodawane są nowe treści?	Com que frequência novos conteúdos são adicionados?	Cât de des se adaugă conținut nou?	Koliko često se dodaje novi sadržaj?	新内容多久更新一次？	Ako často sa pridáva nový obsah?	Kako pogosto se dodaja nova vsebina?	¿Con qué frecuencia se añade contenido nuevo?	Hur ofta läggs nytt innehåll till?	Gaano kadalas nagdadagdag ng bagong content?	มีการเพิ่มเนื้อหาใหม่บ่อยแค่ไหน?	Yeni içerikler ne sıklıkla ekleniyor?	Як часто додається новий контент?	Nội dung mới được thêm vào bao lâu một lần?
for_parents_FAQ_11_answer_android	106	New coloring pages and animations are added regularly to keep the app fresh and engaging for your child.	Новые раскраски и анимации регулярно добавляются, чтобы приложение оставалось интересным для вашего ребенка.	يتم إضافة صفحات تلوين ورسوم متحركة جديدة بانتظام للحفاظ على التطبيق ممتعًا وجذابًا لطفلك.	Нови страници за оцветяване и анимации се добавят редовно, за да бъде приложението свежо и интересно за вашето дете.	Es van afegint regularment noves pàgines per pintar i animacions per mantenir l'aplicació interessant i entretinguda per al teu fill.	Nove stranice za bojanje i animacije redovito se dodaju kako bi aplikacija bila svježa i zanimljiva za vaše dijete.	Nové omalovánky a animace jsou pravidelně přidávány, aby byla aplikace stále zajímavá pro vaše dítě.	Nye farvelægningssider og animationer tilføjes regelmæssigt for at holde appen frisk og engagerende for dit barn.	Nieuwe kleurplaten en animaties worden regelmatig toegevoegd om de app fris en aantrekkelijk te houden voor uw kind.	Uued värvimislehed ja animatsioonid lisatakse regulaarselt, et hoida rakendus värskena ja lastele põnevana.	Uusia värityssivuja ja animaatioita lisätään säännöllisesti, jotta sovellus pysyy tuoreena ja kiinnostavana lapsellesi.	De nouvelles pages à colorier et des animations sont ajoutées régulièrement pour garder l'application fraîche et captivante pour votre enfant.	Neue Malvorlagen und Animationen werden regelmäßig hinzugefügt, um die App frisch und interessant für Ihr Kind zu halten.	Νέες σελίδες ζωγραφικής και κινούμενα σχέδια προστίθενται τακτικά για να παραμένει η εφαρμογή ενδιαφέρουσα και ελκυστική για το παιδί σας.	דפי צביעה ואנימציות חדשות מתווספים באופן קבוע כדי לשמור על חווית שימוש מרעננת ומעניינת לילדיכם.	नए रंग भरने के पृष्ठ और एनिमेशन नियमित रूप से जोड़े जाते हैं ताकि ऐप को बच्चों के लिए नया और आकर्षक बनाए रखा जा सके।	Új színező oldalak és animációk rendszeresen kerülnek hozzáadásra, hogy az alkalmazás mindig friss és vonzó maradjon a gyerekek számára.	Halaman mewarnai dan animasi baru secara rutin ditambahkan untuk menjaga aplikasi tetap segar dan menarik bagi anak Anda.	Nuove pagine da colorare e animazioni vengono aggiunte regolarmente per mantenere l'app fresca e coinvolgente per il tuo bambino.	アプリを新鮮で楽しいものに保つために、新しい塗り絵ページやアニメーションが定期的に追加されます。	앱을 신선하고 매력적으로 유지하기 위해 새로운 색칠 페이지와 애니메이션이 정기적으로 추가됩니다.	Lai lietotne būtu svaiga un interesanta jūsu bērnam, jaunas krāsošanas lapas un animācijas tiek pievienotas regulāri.	Nauji spalvinimo puslapiai ir animacijos reguliariai pridedami, kad programa būtų šviežia ir įdomi jūsų vaikui.	Halaman mewarna dan animasi baharu ditambahkan secara berkala untuk memastikan aplikasi ini kekal segar dan menarik untuk anak anda.	Nye fargeleggingsark og animasjoner legges til jevnlig for å holde appen frisk og engasjerende for barnet ditt.	Nowe kolorowanki i animacje są regularnie dodawane, aby aplikacja była świeża i interesująca dla Twojego dziecka.	Novas páginas para colorir e animações são adicionadas regularmente para manter o aplicativo atualizado e atraente para sua criança.	Pagini de colorat și animații noi sunt adăugate regulat pentru a menține aplicația proaspătă și interesantă pentru copilul dumneavoastră.	Nove stranice za bojenje i animacije se redovno dodaju kako bi aplikacija ostala sveža i zanimljiva za vaše dete.	为了保持应用的新鲜感和吸引力，我们会定期添加新的涂色页和动画。	Nové maľovanky a animácie sa pravidelne pridávajú, aby aplikácia zostala čerstvá a zaujímavá pre vaše dieťa.	Nove pobarvanke in animacije se redno dodajajo, da aplikacija ostane sveža in zanimiva za vašega otroka.	Nuevas páginas para colorear y animaciones se añaden regularmente para mantener la aplicación fresca y atractiva para tu hijo.	Nya färgläggningssidor och animationer läggs till regelbundet för att hålla appen fräsch och engagerande för ditt barn.	Regular na nagdadagdag ng bagong coloring pages at animations upang manatiling bago at nakakaengganyo ang app para sa iyong anak.	หน้าใหม่สำหรับระบายสีและแอนิเมชันจะถูกเพิ่มเป็นประจำเพื่อให้แอปยังคงสดใหม่และน่าสนใจสำหรับลูกของคุณ.	Uygulamanın taze ve çekici kalmasını sağlamak için düzenli olarak yeni boyama sayfaları ve animasyonlar eklenir.	Нові розмальовки та анімації регулярно додаються, щоб додаток залишався цікавим і актуальним для вашої дитини.	Các trang tô màu và hoạt hình mới được thêm vào thường xuyên để giữ cho ứng dụng luôn mới mẻ và hấp dẫn với con bạn.
for_parents_FAQ_12_question_android	107	What if the app crashes or has a problem?	Что делать, если приложение зависает или возникает проблема?	ماذا أفعل إذا توقف التطبيق عن العمل أو واجهت مشكلة؟	Какво да правя, ако приложението се срине или има проблем?	Què faig si l'aplicació falla o hi ha un problema?	Što ako aplikacija padne ili ima problema?	Co dělat, když aplikace spadne nebo má problém?	Hvad gør jeg, hvis appen går ned eller har et problem?	Wat moet ik doen als de app vastloopt of een probleem heeft?	Mida teha, kui rakendus hangub või esineb probleeme?	Mitä teen, jos sovellus kaatuu tai siinä on ongelma?	Que faire si l'application plante ou rencontre un problème ?	Was tun, wenn die App abstürzt oder ein Problem hat?	Τι να κάνω αν η εφαρμογή κολλήσει ή υπάρξει κάποιο πρόβλημα;	מה לעשות אם האפליקציה קורסת או יש בעיה?	अगर ऐप क्रैश हो जाए या कोई समस्या हो तो क्या करें?	Mit tegyek, ha az alkalmazás lefagy vagy probléma van?	Apa yang harus saya lakukan jika aplikasi macet atau ada masalah?	Cosa fare se l'app si blocca o presenta un problema?	アプリがクラッシュしたり問題が発生した場合はどうすればいいですか？	앱이 충돌하거나 문제가 발생하면 어떻게 해야 하나요?	Ko darīt, ja lietotne avarē vai rodas problēma?	Ką daryti, jei programa stringa arba kyla problema?	Apa yang perlu saya lakukan jika aplikasi ini rosak atau mempunyai masalah?	Hva gjør jeg hvis appen krasjer eller har et problem?	Co zrobić, jeśli aplikacja się zawiesza lub występuje problem?	O que fazer se o aplicativo travar ou apresentar algum problema?	Ce fac dacă aplicația se blochează sau apare o problemă?	Šta da radim ako aplikacija padne ili ima problem?	如果应用崩溃或出现问题，我该怎么办？	Čo robiť, ak aplikácia zlyhá alebo má problém?	Kaj storiti, če aplikacija zmrzne ali ima težave?	¿Qué hago si la aplicación falla o tiene algún problema?	Vad gör jag om appen kraschar eller har problem?	Ano ang gagawin kung nagka-crash o nagkaproblema ang app?	ถ้าแอปขัดข้องหรือมีปัญหาควรทำอย่างไร?	Uygulama çökerse veya bir sorun oluşursa ne yapmalıyım?	Що робити, якщо додаток дає збій або виникла проблема?	Nếu ứng dụng bị lỗi hoặc gặp sự cố thì phải làm gì?
for_parents_FAQ_12_answer_android	108	If you encounter any issues, you can contact our support team at {supportLink} or visit our help center at {websiteLink}. We are here to assist you!	Если вы столкнулись с проблемами, вы можете обратиться в нашу службу поддержки по адресу {supportLink} или посетить наш центр помощи на {websiteLink}. Мы здесь, чтобы вам помочь!	إذا واجهت أي مشاكل، يمكنك الاتصال بفريق الدعم الخاص بنا عبر {supportLink} أو زيارة مركز المساعدة على {websiteLink}. نحن هنا لمساعدتك!	Ако срещнете проблеми, можете да се свържете с нашия екип за поддръжка на {supportLink} или да посетите нашия център за помощ на {websiteLink}. Ние сме тук, за да ви помогнем!	Si tens algun problema, pots contactar amb el nostre equip de suport a {supportLink} o visitar el nostre centre d'ajuda a {websiteLink}. Estem aquí per ajudar-te!	Ako naiđete na bilo kakve probleme, možete kontaktirati naš tim za podršku na {supportLink} ili posjetiti naš centar za pomoć na {websiteLink}. Ovdje smo da vam pomognemo!	Pokud narazíte na nějaké problémy, můžete kontaktovat náš tým podpory na {supportLink} nebo navštívit naše centrum pomoci na {websiteLink}. Jsme tu, abychom vám pomohli!	Hvis du oplever problemer, kan du kontakte vores supportteam på {supportLink} eller besøge vores hjælpecenter på {websiteLink}. Vi er her for at hjælpe!	Als u problemen ondervindt, kunt u contact opnemen met ons ondersteuningsteam via {supportLink} of ons helpcentrum bezoeken op {websiteLink}. Wij staan klaar om u te helpen!	Kui esineb probleeme, võite võtta ühendust meie tugitiimiga aadressil {supportLink} või külastada meie abikeskust aadressil {websiteLink}. Oleme siin, et teid aidata!	Jos kohtaat ongelmia, voit ottaa yhteyttä tukitiimiimme osoitteessa {supportLink} tai käydä apukeskuksessamme osoitteessa {websiteLink}. Olemme täällä auttamassa!	Si vous rencontrez des problèmes, vous pouvez contacter notre équipe de support à {supportLink} ou visiter notre centre d'aide sur {websiteLink}. Nous sommes là pour vous aider !	Wenn Sie auf Probleme stoßen, können Sie unser Support-Team unter {supportLink} kontaktieren oder unser Hilfe-Center unter {websiteLink} besuchen. Wir sind für Sie da!	Αν αντιμετωπίσετε προβλήματα, μπορείτε να επικοινωνήσετε με την ομάδα υποστήριξής μας στο {supportLink} ή να επισκεφθείτε το κέντρο βοήθειας στο {websiteLink}. Είμαστε εδώ για να σας βοηθήσουμε!	אם אתם נתקלים בבעיה, תוכלו ליצור קשר עם צוות התמיכה שלנו בכתובת {supportLink} או לבקר במרכז העזרה שלנו בכתובת {websiteLink}. אנחנו כאן לעזור!	यदि आपको कोई समस्या आती है, तो आप हमारी सहायता टीम से {supportLink} पर संपर्क कर सकते हैं या हमारे सहायता केंद्र {websiteLink} पर जा सकते हैं। हम आपकी मदद करने के लिए यहां हैं!	Ha problémát tapasztal, lépjen kapcsolatba ügyfélszolgálatunkkal a {supportLink} címen, vagy látogasson el a segítségnyújtó központunkba a {websiteLink} oldalon. Azért vagyunk itt, hogy segítsünk!	Jika Anda mengalami masalah, Anda dapat menghubungi tim dukungan kami di {supportLink} atau kunjungi pusat bantuan kami di {websiteLink}. Kami siap membantu Anda!	Se incontri problemi, puoi contattare il nostro team di supporto all'indirizzo {supportLink} o visitare il nostro centro assistenza su {websiteLink}. Siamo qui per aiutarti!	問題が発生した場合は、{supportLink} までサポートチームに連絡するか、{websiteLink} のヘルプセンターをご覧ください。お手伝いするためにここにいます！	문제가 발생하면 {supportLink}으로 지원팀에 문의하거나 {websiteLink}의 도움말 센터를 방문하세요. 저희가 도와드리겠습니다!	Ja rodas problēmas, jūs varat sazināties ar mūsu atbalsta komandu pa e-pastu {supportLink} vai apmeklēt mūsu palīdzības centru vietnē {websiteLink}. Mēs esam šeit, lai jums palīdzētu!	Jei susidūrėte su problemomis, galite susisiekti su mūsų palaikymo komanda el. paštu {supportLink} arba apsilankyti mūsų pagalbos centre {websiteLink}. Mes esame čia, kad jums padėtume!	Jika anda menghadapi sebarang masalah, anda boleh menghubungi pasukan sokongan kami di {supportLink} atau lawati pusat bantuan kami di {websiteLink}. Kami sedia membantu anda!	Hvis du støter på problemer, kan du kontakte vårt supportteam på {supportLink} eller besøke hjelpesenteret vårt på {websiteLink}. Vi er her for å hjelpe deg!	Jeśli napotkasz problemy, możesz skontaktować się z naszym zespołem wsparcia pod adresem {supportLink} lub odwiedzić nasze centrum pomocy na {websiteLink}. Jesteśmy tutaj, aby Ci pomóc!	Se você encontrar algum problema, pode entrar em contato com nossa equipe de suporte pelo e-mail {supportLink} ou visitar nosso centro de ajuda em {websiteLink}. Estamos aqui para ajudar!	Dacă întâmpinați probleme, puteți contacta echipa noastră de suport la {supportLink} sau vizitați centrul nostru de ajutor la {websiteLink}. Suntem aici pentru a vă ajuta!	Ako naiđete na problem, možete se obratiti našem timu za podršku putem {supportLink} ili posetiti naš centar za pomoć na {websiteLink}. Tu smo da vam pomognemo!	如果您遇到问题，可以通过 {supportLink} 联系我们的支持团队，或者访问我们的网站 {websiteLink} 获取帮助。我们会尽力协助您！	Ak narazíte na problémy, môžete kontaktovať náš tím podpory na adrese {supportLink} alebo navštíviť naše centrum pomoci na {websiteLink}. Sme tu, aby sme vám pomohli!	Če naletite na težave, se lahko obrnete na našo podporno ekipo na naslovu {supportLink} ali obiščete naš center za pomoč na {websiteLink}. Tukaj smo, da vam pomagamo!	Si encuentras problemas, puedes contactar a nuestro equipo de soporte en {supportLink} o visitar nuestro centro de ayuda en {websiteLink}. ¡Estamos aquí para ayudarte!	Om du stöter på problem kan du kontakta vårt supportteam på {supportLink} eller besöka vårt hjälpcenter på {websiteLink}. Vi finns här för att hjälpa dig!	Kung may problema, maaari kang makipag-ugnayan sa aming support team sa {supportLink} o bisitahin ang aming help center sa {websiteLink}. Narito kami para tumulong!	หากคุณพบปัญหาใด ๆ คุณสามารถติดต่อทีมสนับสนุนของเราที่ {supportLink} หรือเยี่ยมชมศูนย์ช่วยเหลือของเราที่ {websiteLink}. เราพร้อมช่วยเหลือคุณ!	Bir sorunla karşılaşırsanız, {supportLink} adresinden destek ekibimizle iletişime geçebilir veya {websiteLink} adresindeki yardım merkezimizi ziyaret edebilirsiniz. Size yardımcı olmak için buradayız!	Якщо у вас виникли проблеми, ви можете звернутися до нашої служби підтримки за адресою {supportLink} або відвідати наш центр допомоги на {websiteLink}. Ми тут, щоб допомогти вам!	Nếu bạn gặp sự cố, bạn có thể liên hệ với nhóm hỗ trợ của chúng tôi qua email {supportLink} hoặc truy cập trung tâm trợ giúp của chúng tôi tại {websiteLink}. Chúng tôi ở đây để hỗ trợ bạn!
Key	Id	English(en)	Russian(ru)	Arabic(ar)	Bulgarian(bg)	Catalan(ca)	Croatian(hr)	Czech(cs)	Danish(da)	Dutch(nl)	Estonian(et)	Finnish(fi)	French(fr)	German(de)	Greek(el)	Hebrew(he)	Hindi(hi)	Hungarian(hu)	Indonesian(id)	Italian(it)	Japanese(ja)	Korean(ko)	Latvian(lv)	Lithuanian(lt)	Malay(ms)	Norwegian(no)	Polish(pl)	Portuguese(pt)	Romanian(ro)	Serbian(sr)	Chinese (Simplified)(zh-Hans)	Slovak(sk)	Slovenian(sl)	Spanish(es)	Swedish(sv)	Filipino (Philippines)(fil-PH)	Thai(th)	Turkİsh(tr)	Ukrainian(uk)	Vietnamese(vi)
parentalGate_pleaseCalculate	1	Please calculate	Пожалуйста, рассчитайте	من فضلك احسب	Моля, изчислете	Calcula si us plau	Molimo izračunajte	Počítejte prosím	Beregn venligst	Bereken alstublieft	Palun arvuta	Ole hyvä ja laske	Veuillez calculer	Bitte berechnen Sie	Υπολογίστε παρακαλώ	נא לחשב	कृपया गणना करें	Kérem számoljon	Silakan hitung	Per favore calcola	計算してください	계산해주세요	Lūdzu, aprēķiniet	Prašau paskaičiuoti	Sila kira	Vennligst beregn	Proszę obliczyć	Por favor calcule	Vă rog să calculați	Молимо израчунајте	请计算	Prosím vypočítajte	Prosim izračunajte	Por favor calcule	Vänligen beräkna	Mangyaring kalkulahin	กรุณาคำนวณ	Lütfen hesaplayın	Будь ласка, порахуйте	Hãy tính toán
settings_title	1	Settings	Настройки	إعدادات	Настройки	Configuració	postavke	Nastavení	Indstillinger	Instellingen	Seaded	Asetukset	Paramètres	Einstellungen	Ρυθμίσεις	הגדרות	सेटिंग्स	Beállítások elemre	Pengaturan	Impostazioni	設定	설정	Iestatījumi	Nustatymai	tetapan	Innstillinger	Ustawienia	Configurações	Setări	Подешавања	设置	Nastavenia	nastavitve	Ajustes	Inställningar	Mga setting	การตั้งค่า	Ayarlar	Налаштування	Cài đặt
settings_backgroundMusic	2	Background music	Фоновая музыка	موسيقى خلفية	Фонова музика	Música de fons	Pozadinska glazba	Hudba na pozadí	Baggrundsmusik	Achtergrondmuziek	Taustamuusika	Taustamusiikkia	Musique de fond	Hintergrundmusik	Μουσική φόντου	מוזיקת ​​רקע	पृष्ठभूमि संगीत	Háttérzene	Musik latar	Musica di sottofondo	バックグラウンドミュージック	배경음악	Fona mūzika	Fono muzika	Muzik latar belakang	Bakgrunnsmusikk	Muzyka w tle	Música de fundo	Muzica de fundal	Позадинска музика	背景音乐	Hudba na pozadí	Glasba v ozadju	Música de fondo	Bakgrundsmusik	Background music	เพลงพื้นหลัง	Arka plan müziği	Фонова музика	Nhạc nền
settings_notifications	3	Notifications	Уведомления	إشعارات	Известия	Notificacions	Obavijesti	Oznámení	Meddelelser	Meldingen	Märguanded	Ilmoitukset	Notifications	Benachrichtigungen	Ειδοποιήσεις	התראות	सूचनाएं	Értesítések	Pemberitahuan	Notifiche	通知	알림	Paziņojumi	Pranešimai	Pemberitahuan	Varsler	Powiadomienia	Notificações	Notificări	Обавештења	通知	Upozornenia	Obvestila	Notificaciones	Aviseringar	Mga abiso	การแจ้งเตือน	Bildirimler	Сповіщення	Thông báo

message_no-internet	1	No Internet Connection!	Нет подключения к Интернету!	لا يوجد اتصال بالإنترنت!	Няма интернет връзка!	Sense connexió a Internet!	Nema internetske veze!	Žádné připojení k internetu!	Ingen internetforbindelse!	Geen internetverbinding!	Internetiühendus puudub!	Ei internet-yhteyttä!	Pas de connexion Internet!	Keine Internetverbindung!	Δεν υπάρχει σύνδεση στο διαδίκτυο!	!אין חיבור לאינטרנט	इंटरनेट कनेक्शन नहीं है!	Nincs internetkapcsolat!	Tidak ada koneksi internet!	Nessuna connessione Internet!	インターネット接続がありません！	인터넷 연결이 없습니다!	Nav interneta savienojuma!	Nėra interneto ryšio!	Tiada sambungan internet!	Ingen internettforbindelse!	Brak połączenia z internetem!	Sem conexão com a Internet!	Fără conexiune la internet!	Nema internet konekcije!	没有网络连接！	Žiadne internetové pripojenie!	Ni internetne povezave!	¡Sin conexión a Internet!	Ingen internetanslutning!	Walang koneksyon sa internet!	ไม่มีการเชื่อมต่ออินเทอร์เน็ต!	İnternet bağlantısı yok!	Немає підключення до Інтернету!	Không có kết nối Internet!
message_check-connection	2	Check your internet connection and try again	Проверьте ваше подключение к интернету и попробуйте снова	تحقق من اتصالك بالإنترنت وحاول مرة أخرى	Проверете вашата интернет връзка и опитайте отново	Comprova la teva connexió a Internet i torna-ho a intentar	Provjerite svoju internetsku vezu i pokušajte ponovo	Zkontrolujte své připojení k internetu a zkuste to znovu	Tjek din internetforbindelse, og prøv igen	Controleer je internetverbinding en probeer het opnieuw	Kontrolli oma internetiühendust ja proovi uuesti	Tarkista internet-yhteytesi ja yritä uudelleen	Vérifiez votre connexion Internet et réessayez	Überprüfen Sie Ihre Internetverbindung und versuchen Sie es erneut	Ελέγξτε τη σύνδεσή σας στο διαδίκτυο και δοκιμάστε ξανά	בדוק את חיבור האינטרנט ונסה שוב	अपना इंटरनेट कनेक्शन जांचें और पुनः प्रयास करें	Ellenőrizze az internetkapcsolatát, és próbálja újra	Periksa koneksi internet Anda dan coba lagi	Controlla la tua connessione Internet e riprova	インターネット接続を確認して、もう一度お試しください	인터넷 연결을 확인하고 다시 시도하세요	Pārbaudiet savu interneta savienojumu un mēģiniet vēlreiz	Patikrinkite savo interneto ryšį ir bandykite dar kartą	Periksa sambungan internet anda dan cuba lagi	Sjekk internettforbindelsen din og prøv igjen	Sprawdź swoje połączenie internetowe i spróbuj ponownie	Verifique sua conexão com a Internet e tente novamente	Verifică-ți conexiunea la internet și încearcă din nou	Proverite vašu internet konekciju i pokušajte ponovo	检查您的网络连接，然后再试一次	Skontrolujte svoje internetové pripojenie a skúste to znova	Preverite svojo internetno povezavo in poskusite znova	Verifica tu conexión a Internet e inténtalo de nuevo	Kontrollera din internetanslutning och försök igen	Suriin ang iyong koneksyon sa internet at subukang muli	ตรวจสอบการเชื่อมต่ออินเทอร์เน็ตของคุณแล้วลองอีกครั้ง	İnternet bağlantınızı kontrol edin ve tekrar deneyin	Перевірте своє підключення до Інтернету та спробуйте ще раз	Kiểm tra kết nối internet của bạn và thử lại
settings_languages	4	Languages	Языки	اللغات	Езици	Idiomes	jezici	Jazyky	Sprog	Talen	Keeled	Kielet	Langues	Sprachen	Γλώσσες	שפות	बोली	Nyelvek	Bahasa	Lingue	言語	언어	Valodas	Kalbos	Bahasa	Språk	Języki	Idiomas	Limbi	Језици	语言	Jazyky	Jeziki	Idiomas	Språk	Mga wika	ภาษา	Diller	Мови	Ngôn ngữ